Internalizing the Revolution 



I got pregnant with my first child in the summer of 2004. At the time, I was running the online sales 
and operations groups at Google. I had joined the company three and a half years earlier when it was 
an obscure start-up with a few hundred employees in a run-down office building. By my first 
trimester, Google had grown into a company of thousands and moved into a multibuilding campus. 

My pregnancy was not easy. The typical morning sickness that often accompanies the first trimester 
affected me every day for nine long months. I gained almost seventy pounds, and my feet swelled two 
entire shoe sizes, turning into odd-shaped lumps I could see only when they were propped up on a 
coffee table. A particularly sensitive Google engineer announced that "Project Whale" was named 
after me. 

One day, after a rough morning spent staring at the bottom of the toilet, I had to rush to make an 
important client meeting. Google was growing so quickly that parking was an ongoing problem, and 
the only spot I could find was quite far away. I sprinted across the parking lot, which in reality meant 
lumbering a bit more quickly than my absurdly slow pregnancy crawl. This only made my nausea 
worse, and I arrived at the meeting praying that a sales pitch was the only thing that would come out 
of my mouth. That night, I recounted these troubles to my husband, Dave. He pointed out that Yahoo, 
where he worked at the time, had designated parking for expectant mothers at the front of each 
building. 

The next day, I marched in — or more like waddled in — to see Google founders Larry Page and 
Sergey Brin in their office, which was really just a large room with toys and gadgets strewn all over 
the floor. I found Sergey in a yoga position in the corner and announced that we needed pregnancy 
parking, preferably sooner rather than later. He looked up at me and agreed immediately, noting that 
he had never thought about it before. 

To this day, I'm embarrassed that I didn't realize that pregnant women needed reserved parking 
until I experienced my own aching feet. As one of Google's most senior women, didn't I have a 
special responsibility to think of this? But like Sergey, it had never occurred to me. The other pregnant 
women must have suffered in silence, not wanting to ask for special treatment. Or maybe they lacked 
the confidence or seniority to demand that the problem be fixed. Having one pregnant woman at the 
top — even one who looked like a whale — made the difference. 

Today in the United States and the developed world, women are better off than ever. We stand on 
the shoulders of the women who came before us, women who had to fight for the rights that we now 
take for granted. In 1947, Anita Summers, the mother of my longtime mentor Larry Summers, was 
hired as an economist by the Standard Oil Company. When she accepted the job, her new boss said to 
her, "I am so glad to have you. I figure I am getting the same brains for less money." Her reaction to 



this was to feel flattered. It was a huge compliment to be told that she had the same brains as a man. It 
would have been unthinkable for her to ask for equal compensation. 

We feel even more grateful when we compare our lives to those of other women around the world. 
There are still countries that deny women basic civil rights. Worldwide, about 4.4 million women and 
girls are trapped in the sex trade.' In places like Afghanistan and Sudan, girls receive little or no 
education, wives are treated as the property of their husbands, and women who are raped are routinely 
cast out of their homes for disgracing their families. Some rape victims are even sent to jail for 
committing a "moral crime."" We are centuries ahead of the unacceptable treatment of women in these 
countries. 

But knowing that things could be worse should not stop us from trying to make them better. When 
the suffragettes marched in the streets, they envisioned a world where men and women would be truly 
equal. A century later, we are still squinting, trying to bring that vision into focus. 

The blunt truth is that men still run the world. Of the 195 independent countries in the world, only 
17 are led by women. 3 Women hold just 20 percent of seats in parliaments globally. 4 In the United 
States, where we pride ourselves on liberty and justice for all, the gender division of leadership roles is 
not much better. Women became 50 percent of the college graduates in the United States in the early 
1980s. Since then, women have slowly and steadily advanced, earning more and more of the college 
degrees, taking more of the entry-level jobs, and entering more fields previously dominated by men. 
Despite these gains, the percentage of women at the top of corporate America has barely budged over 
the past decade. 6 A meager twenty-one of the Fortune 500 CEOs are women. 7 Women hold about 14 
percent of executive officer positions, 17 percent of board seats, and constitute 18 percent of our 
elected congressional officials. 8 The gap is even worse for women of color, who hold just 4 percent of 
top corporate jobs, 3 percent of board seats, and 5 percent of congressional seats. While women 
continue to outpace men in educational achievement, we have ceased making real progress at the top 
of any industry. This means that when it comes to making the decisions that most affect our world, 
women's voices are not heard equally. 

Progress remains equally sluggish when it comes to compensation. In 1970, American women were 
paid 59 cents for every dollar their male counterparts made. By 2010, women had protested, fought, 
and worked their butts off to raise that compensation to 77 cents for every dollar men made.' 0 As 
activist Mario Thomas wryly joked on Equal Pay Day 201 1, "Forty years and eighteen cents. A dozen 
eggs have gone up ten times that amount."" 

I have watched these disheartening events from a front-row seat. I graduated from college in 1991 
and from business school in 1995. In each entry-level job after graduation, my colleagues were a 
balanced mix of male and female. I saw that the senior leaders were almost entirely male, but I 
thought that was due to historical discrimination against women. The proverbial glass ceiling had been 
cracked in almost every industry, and I believed that it was just a matter of time until my generation 
took our fair share of the leadership roles. But with each passing year, fewer and fewer of my 
colleagues were women. More and more often, I was the only woman in the room. 

Being the sole woman has resulted in some awkward yet revealing situations. Two years after I 
joined Facebook as chief operating officer, our chief financial officer departed suddenly, and I had to 



step in to complete a funding round. Since I had spent my career in operations, not finance, the 
process of raising capital was new and a bit scary. My team and I flew to New York for the initial 
pitch to private equity firms. Our first meeting was held in the kind of corporate office featured in 
movies, complete with a sprawling view of Manhattan. I offered an overview of our business and 
answered questions. So far so good. Then someone suggested that we break for a few minutes. I 
turned to the senior partner and asked where the women's restroom was. He stared at me blankly. My 
question had completely stumped him. I asked, "How long have you been in this office?" And he said, 
"One year." "Am I the only woman to have pitched a deal here in an entire year?" "I think so," he 
said, adding, "or maybe you're the only one who had to use the bathroom." 

It has been more than two decades since I entered the workforce, and so much is still the same. It is 
time for us to face the fact that our revolution has stalled. 1 " The promise of equality is not the same as 
true equality. 

A truly equal world would be one where women ran half our countries and companies and men ran 
half our homes. I believe that this would be a better world. The laws of economics and many studies 
of diversity tell us that if we tapped the entire pool of human resources and talent, our collective 
performance would improve. Legendary investor Warren Buffett has stated generously that one of the 
reasons for his great success was that he was competing with only half of the population. The Warren 
Buffetts of my generation are still largely enjoying this advantage. When more people get in the race, 
more records will be broken. And the achievements will extend beyond those individuals to benefit us 
all. 

The night before Leymah Gbowee won the 201 1 Nobel Peace Prize for helping to lead the women's 
protests that toppled Liberia's dictator, she was at a book party in my home. We were celebrating the 
publication of her autobiography, Mighty Be Our Powers, but it was a somber night. A guest asked her 
how American women could help those who experienced the horrors and mass rapes of war in places 
like Liberia. Her response was four simple words: "More women in power." Leymah and I could not 
have come from more different backgrounds, and yet we have both arrived at the same conclusion. 
Conditions for all women will improve when there are more women in leadership roles giving strong 
and powerful voice to their needs and concerns.' 

This brings us to the obvious question — how? How are we going to take down the barriers that 
prevent more women from getting to the top? Women face real obstacles in the professional world, 
including blatant and subtle sexism, discrimination, and sexual harassment. Too few workplaces offer 
the flexibility and access to child care and parental leave that are necessary for pursuing a career while 
raising children. Men have an easier time finding the mentors and sponsors who are invaluable for 
career progression. Plus, women have to prove themselves to a far greater extent than men do. And 
this is not just in our heads. A 201 1 McKinsey report noted that men are promoted based on potential, 
while women are promoted based on past accomplishments.' 4 

In addition to the external barriers erected by society, women are hindered by barriers that exist 
within ourselves. We hold ourselves back in ways both big and small, by lacking self-confidence, by 
not raising our hands, and by pulling back when we should be leaning in. We internalize the negative 
messages we get throughout our lives — the messages that say it's wrong to be outspoken, aggressive, 



more powerful than men. We lower our own expectations of what we can achieve. We continue to do 
the majority of the housework and child care. We compromise our career goals to make room for 
partners and children who may not even exist yet. Compared to our male colleagues, fewer of us 
aspire to senior positions. This is not a list of things other women have done. I have made every 
mistake on this list. At times, I still do. 

My argument is that getting rid of these internal barriers is critical to gaining power. Others have 
argued that women can get to the top only when the institutional barriers are gone. This is the ultimate 
chicken- and-egg situation. The chicken: Women will tear down the external barriers once we achieve 
leadership roles. We will march into our bosses' offices and demand what we need, including 
pregnancy parking. Or better yet, we'll become bosses and make sure all women have what they need. 
The egg: We need to eliminate the external barriers to get women into those roles in the first place. 
Both sides are right. So rather than engage in philosophical arguments over which comes first, let's 
agree to wage battles on both fronts. They are equally important. I am encouraging women to address 
the chicken, but I fully support those who are focusing on the egg. 

Internal obstacles are rarely discussed and often underplayed. Throughout my life, I was told over 
and over about inequalities in the workplace and how hard it would be to have a career and a family. I 
rarely heard anything, however, about the ways I might hold myself back. These internal obstacles 
deserve a lot more attention, in part because they are under our own control. We can dismantle the 
hurdles in ourselves today. We can start this very moment. 

I never thought I would write a book. I am not a scholar, a journalist, or a sociologist. But I decided 
to speak out after talking to hundreds of women, listening to their struggles, sharing my own, and 
realizing that the gains we have made are not enough and may even be slipping. The first chapter of 
this book lays out some of the complex challenges women face. Each subsequent chapter focuses on 
an adjustment or difference that we can make ourselves: increasing our self-confidence ("Sit at the 
Table"), getting our partners to do more at home ("Make Your Partner a Real Partner"), not holding 
ourselves to unattainable standards ("The Myth of Doing It All"). I do not pretend to have perfect 
solutions to these deep and complicated issues. I rely on hard data, academic research, my own 
observations, and lessons I have learned along the way. 

This book is not a memoir, although I have included stories about my life. It is not a self-help book, 
although I truly hope it helps. It is not a book on career management, although I offer advice in that 
area. It is not a feminist manifesto — okay, it is sort of a feminist manifesto, but one that I hope inspires 
men as much as it inspires women. 

Whatever this book is, I am writing it for any woman who wants to increase her chances of making 
it to the top of her field or pursue any goal vigorously. This includes women at all stages of their lives 
and careers, from those who are just starting out to those who are taking a break and may want to 
jump back in. I am also writing this for any man who wants to understand what a woman — a 
colleague, wife, mother, or daughter — is up against so that he can do his part to build an equal world. 

This book makes the case for leaning in, for being ambitious in any pursuit. And while I believe that 
increasing the number of women in positions of power is a necessary element of true equality, I do not 
believe that there is one definition of success or happiness. Not all women want careers. Not all 



women want children. Not all women want both. I would never advocate that we should all have the 
same objectives. Many people are not interested in acquiring power, not because they lack ambition, 
but because they are living their lives as they desire. Some of the most important contributions to our 
world are made by caring for one person at a time. We each have to chart our own unique course and 
define which goals fit our lives, values, and dreams. 

I am also acutely aware that the vast majority of women are struggling to make ends meet and take 
care of their families. Parts of this book will be most relevant to women fortunate enough to have 
choices about how much and when and where to work; other parts apply to situations that women face 
in every workplace, within every community, and in every home. If we can succeed in adding more 
female voices at the highest levels, we will expand opportunities and extend fairer treatment to all. 

Some, especially other women in business, have cautioned me about speaking out publicly on these 
issues. When I have spoken out anyway, several of my comments have upset people of both genders. I 
know some believe that by focusing on what women can change themselves — pressing them to lean 
in — it seems like I am letting our institutions off the hook. Or even worse, they accuse me of blaming 
the victim. Far from blaming the victim, I believe that female leaders are key to the solution. Some 
critics will also point out that it is much easier for me to lean in, since my financial resources allow me 
to afford any help I need. My intention is to offer advice that would have been useful to me long 
before I had heard of Google or Facebook and that will resonate with women in a broad range of 
circumstances. 

I have heard these criticisms in the past and I know that I will hear them — and others — in the future. 
My hope is that my message will be judged on its merits. We can't avoid this conversation. This issue 
transcends all of us. The time is long overdue to encourage more women to dream the possible dream 
and encourage more men to support women in the workforce and in the home. 

We can reignite the revolution by internalizing the revolution. The shift to a more equal world will 
happen person by person. We move closer to the larger goal of true equality with each woman who 
leans in. 



1 



The Leadership Ambition Gap 

What Would You Do If You Weren't Afraid? 

My grandmother Rosalind Einhorn was born exactly fifty-two years before I was, on August 28, 1917. 
Like many poor Jewish families in the boroughs of New York City, hers lived in a small, crowded 
apartment close to their relatives. Her parents, aunts, and uncles addressed her male cousins by their 
given names, but she and her sister were referred to only as "Girlie." 

During the Depression, my grandmother was pulled out of Morris High School to help support the 
household by sewing fabric flowers onto undergarments that her mother could resell for a tiny profit. 
No one in the community would have considered taking a boy out of school. A boy's education was 
the family's hope to move up the financial and social ladder. Education for girls, however, was less 
important both financially, since they were unlikely to contribute to the family's income, and 
culturally, since boys were expected to study the Torah while girls were expected to run a "proper 
home." Luckily for my grandmother, a local teacher insisted that her parents put her back into school. 
She went on not only to finish high school but to graduate from U.C. Berkeley. 

After college, "Girlie" worked selling pocketbooks and accessories at David's Fifth Avenue. When 
she left her job to marry my grandfather, family legend has it that David's had to hire four people to 
replace her. Years later, when my grandfather's paint business was struggling, she jumped in and took 
some of the hard steps he was reluctant to take, helping to save the family from financial ruin. She 
displayed her business acumen again in her forties. After being diagnosed with breast cancer, she beat 
it and then dedicated herself to raising money for the clinic that treated her by selling knockoff 
watches out of the trunk of her car. Girlie ended up with a profit margin that Apple would envy. I have 
never met anyone with more energy and determination than my grandmother. When Warren Buffett 
talks about competing against only half of the population, I think about her and wonder how different 
her life might have been if she had been born half a century later. 

When my grandmother had children of her own — my mother and her two brothers — she 
emphasized education for all of them. My mother attended the University of Pennsylvania, where 
classes were coed. When she graduated in 1965 with a degree in French literature, she surveyed a 
workforce that she believed consisted of two career options for women: teaching or nursing. She chose 
teaching. She began a Ph.D. program, got married, and then dropped out when she became pregnant 
with me. It was thought to be a sign of weakness if a husband needed his wife's help to support their 
family, so my mother became a stay-at-home parent and an active volunteer. The centuries-old 
division of labor stood. 

Even though I grew up in a traditional home, my parents had the same expectations for me, my 
sister, and my brother. All three of us were encouraged to excel in school, do equal chores, and engage 
in extracurricular activities. We were all supposed to be athletic too. My brother and sister joined 



sports teams, but I was the kid who got picked last in gym. Despite my athletic shortcomings, I was 
raised to believe that girls could do anything boys could do and that all career paths were open to me. 

When I arrived at college in the fall of 1987, my classmates of both genders seemed equally focused 
on academics. I don't remember thinking about my future career differently from the male students. I 
also don't remember any conversations about someday balancing work and children. My friends and I 
assumed that we would have both. Men and women competed openly and aggressively with one 
another in classes, activities, and job interviews. Just two generations removed from my grandmother, 
the playing field seemed to be level. 

But more than twenty years after my college graduation, the world has not evolved nearly as much 
as I believed it would. Almost all of my male classmates work in professional settings. Some of my 
female classmates work full-time or part-time outside the home, and just as many are stay-at-home 
mothers and volunteers like my mom. This mirrors the national trend. In comparison to their male 
counterparts, highly trained women are scaling back and dropping out of the workforce in high 
numbers. In turn, these diverging percentages teach institutions and mentors to invest more in men, 
who are statistically more likely to stay. 

Judith Rodin, president of the Rockefeller Foundation and the first woman to serve as president of 
an Ivy League university, once remarked to an audience of women my age, "My generation fought so 
hard to give all of you choices. We believe in choices. But choosing to leave the workforce was not 
the choice we thought so many of you would make."" 

So what happened? My generation was raised in an era of increasing equality, a trend we thought 
would continue. In retrospect, we were naive and idealistic. Integrating professional and personal 
aspirations proved far more challenging than we had imagined. During the same years that our careers 
demanded maximum time investment, our biology demanded that we have children. Our partners did 
not share the housework and child rearing, so we found ourselves with two full-time jobs. The 
workplace did not evolve to give us the flexibility we needed to fulfill our responsibilities at home. 
We anticipated none of this. We were caught by surprise. 

If my generation was too naive, the generations that have followed may be too practical. We knew 
too little, and now girls know too much. Girls growing up today are not the first generation to have 
equal opportunity, but they are the first to know that all that opportunity does not necessarily translate 
into professional achievement. Many of these girls watched their mothers try to "do it all" and then 
decide that something had to give. That something was usually their careers. 

There's no doubt that women have the skills to lead in the workplace. Girls are increasingly 
outperforming boys in the classroom, earning about 57 percent of the undergraduate and 60 percent of 
the master's degrees in the United States. This gender gap in academic achievement has even caused 
some to worry about the "end of men." 4 But while compliant, raise-your-hand-and-speak-when-called- 
on behaviors might be rewarded in school, they are less valued in the workplace. Career progression 
often depends upon taking risks and advocating for oneself — traits that girls are discouraged from 
exhibiting. This may explain why girls' academic gains have not yet translated into significantly 
higher numbers of women in top jobs. The pipeline that supplies the educated workforce is chock-full 



of women at the entry level, but by the time that same pipeline is filling leadership positions, it is 
overwhelmingly stocked with men. 

There are so many reasons for this winnowing out, but one important contributor is a leadership 
ambition gap. Of course, many individual women are as professionally ambitious as any individual 
man. Yet drilling down, the data clearly indicate that in field after field, more men than women aspire 
to the most senior jobs. A 2012 McKinsey survey of more than four thousand employees of leading 
companies found that 36 percent of the men wanted to reach the C-suite, compared to only 18 percent 
of the women. 6 When jobs are described as powerful, challenging, and involving high levels of 

7 

responsibility, they appeal to more men than women. And while the ambition gap is most pronounced 
at the highest levels, the underlying dynamic is evident at every step of the career ladder. A survey of 
college students found that more men than women chose "reaching a managerial level" as a career 
priority in the first three years after graduating. 8 Even among highly educated professional men and 
women, more men than women describe themselves as "ambitious."'' 

There is some hope that a shift is starting to occur in the next generation. A 2012 Pew study found 
for the first time that among young people ages eighteen to thirty-four, more young women (66 
percent) than young men (59 percent) rated "success in a high-paying career or profession" as 
important to their lives. 10 A recent survey of Millennial s" found that women were just as likely to 
describe themselves as ambitious as men. Although this is an improvement, even among this 
demographic, the leadership ambition gap remains. Millennial women are less likely than Millennial 
men to agree that the statement "I aspire to a leadership role in whatever field I ultimately work" 
describes them very well. Millennial women were also less likely than their male peers to characterize 

12 

themselves as "leaders," "visionaries," "self-confident," and "willing to take risks." 

Since more men aim for leadership roles, it is not surprising that they obtain them, especially given 
all the other obstacles that women have to overcome. This pattern starts long before they enter the 
workforce. Author Samantha Ettus and her husband read their daughter's kindergarten yearbook, 
where each child answered the question "What do you want to be when you grow up?" They noted 
that several of the boys wanted to be president. None of the girls did. (Current data suggest that when 

14 

these girls become women, they will continue to feel the same way.) In middle school, more boys 
than girls aspire to leadership roles in future careers. 15 At the top fifty colleges, less than a third of 
student government presidents are women. 6 

Professional ambition is expected of men but is optional — or worse, sometimes even a negative — 
for women. "She is very ambitious" is not a compliment in our culture. Aggressive and hard-charging 
women violate unwritten rules about acceptable social conduct. Men are continually applauded for 
being ambitious and powerful and successful, but women who display these same traits often pay a 

17 

social penalty. Female accomplishments come at a cost. 

And for all the progress, there is still societal pressure for women to keep an eye on marriage from a 
young age. When I went to college, as much as my parents emphasized academic achievement, they 
emphasized marriage even more. They told me that the most eligible women marry young to get a 
"good man" before they are all taken. I followed their advice and throughout college, I vetted every 
date as a potential husband (which, trust me, is a sure way to ruin a date at age nineteen). 



When I was graduating, my thesis advisor, Larry Summers, suggested that I apply for international 
fellowships. I rejected the idea on the grounds that a foreign country was not a likely place to turn a 
date into a husband. Instead, I moved to Washington, D.C., which was full of eligible men. It worked. 
My first year out of college, I met a man who was not just eligible, but also wonderful, so I married 
him. I was twenty-four and convinced that marriage was the first — and necessary — step to a happy 
and productive life. 

It didn't work out that way. I was just not mature enough to have made this lifelong decision, and 
the relationship quickly unraveled. By the age of twenty-five, I had managed to get married ... and 
also divorced. At the time, this felt like a massive personal and public failure. For many years, I felt 
that no matter what I accomplished professionally, it paled in comparison to the scarlet letter D 
stitched on my chest. (Almost ten years later, I learned that the "good ones" were not all taken, and I 
wisely and very happily married Dave Goldberg.) 

Like me, Gayle Tzemach Lemmon, deputy director of the Council on Foreign Relations' Women 
and Foreign Policy Program, was encouraged to prioritize marriage over career. As she described in 
The Atlantic, "When I was 27, 1 received a posh fellowship to travel to Germany to learn German and 
work at the Wall Street Journal.... It was an incredible opportunity for a 20-something by any 
objective standard, and I knew it would help prepare me for graduate school and beyond. My 
girlfriends, however, expressed shock and horror that I would leave my boyfriend at the time to live 
abroad for a year. My relatives asked whether I was worried that I'd never get married. And when I 
attended a barbecue with my then-beau, his boss took me aside to remind me that 'there aren't many 
guys like that out there.' " The result of these negative reactions, in Gayle's view, is that many women 
"still see ambition as a dirty word."' 

Many have argued with me that ambition is not the problem. Women are not less ambitious than 
men, they insist, but more enlightened with different and more meaningful goals. I do not dismiss or 
dispute this argument. There is far more to life than climbing a career ladder, including raising 
children, seeking personal fulfillment, contributing to society, and improving the lives of others. And 
there are many people who are deeply committed to their jobs but do not — and should not have to — 
aspire to run their organizations. Leadership roles are not the only way to have profound impact. 

I also acknowledge that there are biological differences between men and women. I have breast-fed 
two children and noted, at times with great disappointment, that this was simply not something my 
husband was equipped to do. Are there characteristics inherent in sex differences that make women 
more nurturing and men more assertive? Quite possibly. Still, in today's world, where we no longer 
have to hunt in the wild for our food, our desire for leadership is largely a culturally created and 
reinforced trait. How individuals view what they can and should accomplish is in large part formed by 
our societal expectations. 

19 

From the moment we are born, boys and girls are treated differently. Parents tend to talk to girl 

20 

babies more than boy babies." Mothers overestimate the crawling ability of their sons and 

21 

underestimate the crawling ability of their daughters." Reflecting the belief that girls need to be helped 
more than boys, mothers often spend more time comforting and hugging infant girls and more time 

22 

watching infant boys play by themselves."" 



Other cultural messages are more blatant. Gymboree once sold onesies proclaiming "Smart like 
Daddy" for boys and "Pretty like Mommy" for girls." The same year, J. C. Penney marketed a T-shirt 

24 

to teenage girls that bragged, "I'm too pretty to do homework so my brother has to do it for me."" 
These things did not happen in 1951. They happened in 201 1. 

Even worse, the messages sent to girls can move beyond encouraging superficial traits and veer into 
explicitly discouraging leadership. When a girl tries to lead, she is often labeled bossy. Boys are 
seldom called bossy because a boy taking the role of a boss does not surprise or offend. As someone 
who was called this for much of my childhood, I know that it is not a compliment. 

The stories of my childhood bossiness are told (and retold) with great amusement. Apparently, 
when I was in elementary school, I taught my younger siblings, David and Michelle, to follow me 
around, listen to my monologues, and scream the word "Right!" when I concluded. I was the eldest of 
the neighborhood children and allegedly spent my time organizing shows that I could direct and clubs 
that I could run. People laugh at these accounts, but to this day I always feel slightly ashamed of my 
behavior (which is remarkable given that I have now written an entire book about why girls should not 
be made to feel this way, or maybe this partially explains my motivation). 

Even when we were in our thirties, pointing out this behavior was still the best way for my siblings 
to tease me. When Dave and I got married, David and Michelle gave a beautiful, hilarious toast, which 
kicked off with this: "Hi! Some of you think we are Sheryl's younger siblings, but really we were 
Sheryl's first employees — employee number one and employee number two. Initially, as a one-year- 
old and a three- year-old, we were worthless and weak. Disorganized, lazy. We would just as soon spit 
up on ourselves as read the morning paper. But Sheryl could see that we had potential. For more than 
ten years, Sheryl took us under her wing and whipped us into shape." Everyone laughed. My siblings 
continued, "To the best of our knowledge Sheryl never actually played as a child, but really just 
organized other children's play. Sheryl supervised adults as well. When our parents went away on 
vacation, our grandparents used to babysit. Before our parents left, Sheryl protested, 'Now I have to 
take care of David and Michelle and Grandma and Grandpa too. It's not fair!' " Everyone laughed 
even louder. 

I laughed too, but there is still some part of me that feels it was unseemly for a little girl to be 
thought of as so ... domineering. Cringe. 

From a very early age, boys are encouraged to take charge and offer their opinions. Teachers 
interact more with boys, call on them more frequently, and ask them more questions. Boys are also 
more likely to call out answers, and when they do, teachers usually listen to them. When girls call out, 
teachers often scold them for breaking the rules and remind them to raise their hands if they want to 
speak." 5 

I was recently reminded that these patterns persist even when we are all grown up. Not long ago, at 
a small dinner with other business executives, the guest of honor spoke the entire time without taking 
a breath. This meant that the only way to ask a question or make an observation was to interrupt. 
Three or four men jumped in, and the guest politely answered their questions before resuming his 
lecture. At one point, I tried to add something to the conversation and he barked, "Let me finish! You 
people are not good at listening!" Eventually, a few more men interjected and he allowed it. Then the 



only other female executive at the dinner decided to speak up — and he did it again! He chastised her 
for interrupting. After the meal, one of the male CEOs pulled me aside to say that he had noticed that 
only the women had been silenced. He told me he empathized, because as a Hispanic, he has been 
treated like this many times. 

The danger goes beyond authority figures silencing female voices. Young women internalize 
societal cues about what defines "appropriate" behavior and, in turn, silence themselves. They are 
rewarded for being "pretty like Mommy" and encouraged to be nurturing like Mommy too. The album 
Free to Be ... You and Me was released in 1972 and became a staple of my childhood. My favorite 
song, "William's Doll," is about a five-year-old boy who begs his reluctant father to buy him a 
traditional girl's toy. Almost forty years later, the toy industry remains riddled with stereotypes. Right 
before Christmas 2011, a video featuring a four- year-old girl named Riley went viral. Riley paces in a 
toy store, upset because companies are trying to "trick the girls into buying the pink stuff instead of 
stuff that boys want to buy, right?" Right. As Riley reasons, "Some girls like superheroes, some girls 
like princesses. Some boys like superheroes, some boys like princesses. So why do all the girls have to 
buy pink stuff and all the boys have to buy different color stuff?"" 6 It takes a near act of rebellion for 
even a four-year-old to break away from society's expectations. William still has no doll, while Riley 
is drowning in a sea of pink. I now play Free to Be ... You and Me for my children and hope that if 
they ever play it for their children, its message will seem quaint. 

The gender stereotypes introduced in childhood are reinforced throughout our lives and become 
self-fulfilling prophesies. Most leadership positions are held by men, so women don't expect to 
achieve them, and that becomes one of the reasons they don't. The same is true with pay. Men 
generally earn more than women, so people expect women to earn less. And they do. 

Compounding the problem is a social-psychological phenomenon called "stereotype threat." Social 
scientists have observed that when members of a group are made aware of a negative stereotype, they 
are more likely to perform according to that stereotype. For example, stereotypically, boys are better at 
math and science than girls. When girls are reminded of their gender before a math or science test, 
even by something as simple as checking off an M or F box at the top of the test, they perform worse." 
Stereotype threat discourages girls and women from entering technical fields and is one of the key 
reasons that so few study computer science." 8 As a Facebook summer intern once told me, "In my 
school's computer science department, there are more Daves than girls." 

The stereotype of a working woman is rarely attractive. Popular culture has long portrayed 
successful working women as so consumed by their careers that they have no personal life (think 
Sigourney Weaver in Working Girl and Sandra Bullock in The Proposal). If a female character divides 
her time between work and family, she is almost always harried and guilt ridden (think Sarah Jessica 
Parker in I Don 't Know How She Does It). And these characterizations have moved beyond fiction. A 
study found that of Millennial men and women who work in an organization with a woman in a senior 

29 

role, only about 20 percent want to emulate her career." 

This unappealing stereotype is particularly unfortunate since most women have no choice but to 
remain in the workforce. About 41 percent of mothers are primary breadwinners and earn the majority 
of their family's earnings. Another 23 percent of mothers are co-breadwinners, contributing at least a 



quarter of the family's earnings. The number of women supporting families on their own is 
increasing quickly; between 1973 and 2006, the proportion of families headed by a single mother grew 
from one in ten to one in five. ' These numbers are dramatically higher in Hispanic and African- 
American families. Twenty-seven percent of Latino children and 52 percent of African-American 
children are being raised by a single mother. 

Our country lags considerably behind others in efforts to help parents take care of their children and 
stay in the workforce. Of all the industrialized nations in the world, the United States is the only one 
without a paid maternity leave policy. As Ellen Bravo, director of the Family Values @ Work 
consortium, observed, most "women are not thinking about 'having it all,' they're worried about 
losing it all — their jobs, their children's health, their families' financial stability — because of the 

34 

regular conflicts that arise between being a good employee and a responsible parent." 

For many men, the fundamental assumption is that they can have both a successful professional life 
and a fulfilling personal life. For many women, the assumption is that trying to do both is difficult at 
best and impossible at worst. Women are surrounded by headlines and stories warning them that they 
cannot be committed to both their families and careers. They are told over and over again that they 
have to choose, because if they try to do too much, they'll be harried and unhappy. Framing the issue 
as "work-life balance" — as if the two were diametrically opposed — practically ensures work will lose 
out. Who would ever choose work over life? 

The good news is that not only can women have both families and careers, they can thrive while 
doing so. In 2009, Sharon Meers and Joanna Strober published Getting to 50/50, a comprehensive 
review of governmental, social science, and original research that led them to conclude that children, 
parents, and marriages can all flourish when both parents have full careers. The data plainly reveal that 
sharing financial and child-care responsibilities leads to less guilty moms, more involved dads, and 
thriving children. 1 Professor Rosalind Chait Barnett of Brandeis University did a comprehensive 
review of studies on work-life balance and found that women who participate in multiple roles 
actually have lower levels of anxiety and higher levels of mental well-being. 36 Employed women reap 
rewards including greater financial security, more stable marriages, better health, and, in general, 

37 

increased life satisfaction. 

It may not be as dramatic or funny to make a movie about a woman who loves both her job and her 
family, but that would be a better reflection of reality. We need more portrayals of women as 
competent professionals and happy mothers — or even happy professionals and competent mothers. 
The current negative images may make us laugh, but they also make women unnecessarily fearful by 
presenting life's challenges as insurmountable. Our culture remains baffled: I don't know how she 
does it. 

Fear is at the root of so many of the barriers that women face. Fear of not being liked. Fear of 
making the wrong choice. Fear of drawing negative attention. Fear of overreaching. Fear of being 
judged. Fear of failure. And the holy trinity of fear: the fear of being a bad mother/wife/daughter. 

Without fear, women can pursue professional success and personal fulfillment — and freely choose 
one, or the other, or both. At Facebook, we work hard to create a culture where people are encouraged 
to take risks. We have posters all around the office that reinforce this attitude. In bright red letters, one 



declares, "Fortune favors the bold." Another insists, "Proceed and be bold." My favorite reads, "What 
would you do if you weren't afraid?" 

In 2011, Debora Spar, president of Barnard College, an all-women's liberal arts school in New 
York City, invited me to deliver its commencement address. This speech was the first time I openly 
discussed the leadership ambition gap. Standing on the podium, I felt nervous. I told the members of 
the graduating class that they should be ambitious not just in pursuing their dreams but in aspiring to 
become leaders in their fields. I knew this message could be misinterpreted as my judging women for 
not making the same choices that I have. Nothing could be farther from the truth. I believe that choice 
means choice for all of us. But I also believe that we need to do more to encourage women to reach for 
leadership roles. If we can't tell women to aim high at a college graduation, when can we? 

As I addressed the enthusiastic women, I found myself fighting back tears. I made it through the 
speech and concluded with this: 

You are the promise for a more equal world. So my hope for everyone here is that after you walk 
across this stage, after you get your diploma, after you go out tonight and celebrate hard — you 
then will lean way in to your career. You will find something you love doing and you will do it 
with gusto. Find the right career for you and go all the way to the top. 

As you walk off this stage today, you start your adult life. Start out by aiming high. Try — and 
try hard. 

Like everyone here, I have great hopes for the members of this graduating class. I hope you 
find true meaning, contentment, and passion in your life. I hope you navigate the difficult times 
and come out with greater strength and resolve. I hope you find whatever balance you seek with 
your eyes wide open. And I hope that you — yes, you — have the ambition to lean in to your 
career and run the world. Because the world needs you to change it. Women all around the world 
are counting on you. 

So please ask yourself: What would I do if I weren't afraid? And then go do it. 

As the graduates were called to the stage to collect their diplomas, I shook every hand. Many 
stopped to give me a hug. One young woman even told me I was "the baddest bitch" (which, having 
checked with someone later, actually did turn out to be a compliment). 

I know my speech was meant to motivate them, but they actually motivated me. In the months that 
followed, I started thinking that I should speak up more often and more publicly about these issues. I 
should urge more women to believe in themselves and aspire to lead. I should urge more men to 
become part of the solution by supporting women in the workforce and at home. And I should not just 
speak in front of friendly crowds at Barnard. I should seek out larger, possibly less sympathetic 
audiences. I should take my own advice and be ambitious. 

Writing this book is not just me encouraging others to lean in. This is me leaning in. Writing this 
book is what I would do if I weren't afraid. 



2 



Sit at the Table 



A few years ago, I hosted a meeting for Treasury Secretary Tim Geithner at Facebook. We invited 
fifteen executives from across Silicon Valley for breakfast and a discussion about the economy. 
Secretary Geithner arrived with four members of his staff, two senior and two more junior, and we all 
gathered in our one nice conference room. After the usual milling around, I encouraged the attendees 
to help themselves to the buffet and take a seat. Our invited guests, mostly men, grabbed plates and 
food and sat down at the large conference table. Secretary Geithner' s team, all women, took their food 
last and sat in chairs off to the side of the room. I motioned for the women to come sit at the table, 
waving them over so they would feel welcomed. They demurred and remained in their seats. 

The four women had every right to be at this meeting, but because of their seating choice, they 
seemed like spectators rather than participants. I knew I had to say something. So after the meeting, I 
pulled them aside to talk. I pointed out that they should have sat at the table even without an 
invitation, but when publicly welcomed, they most certainly should have joined. At first, they seemed 
surprised, then they agreed. 

It was a watershed moment for me. A moment when I witnessed how an internal barrier can alter 
women's behavior. A moment when I realized that in addition to facing institutional obstacles, women 
face a battle from within. 

When I gave a TEDTalk on how women can succeed in the workforce, I told this story to illustrate 
how women hold themselves back, literally choosing to watch from the sidelines. And yet as 
disappointed as I was that these women made that choice, I also deeply understood the insecurities 
that drew them to the side of the room and kept them glued to those chairs. 

My senior year of college, I was inducted into the Phi Beta Kappa honor society. At that time, 
Harvard and Radcliffe had separate chapters, so my ceremony was for women only. The keynote 
speaker, Dr. Peggy Mcintosh from the Wellesley Centers for Women, gave a talk called "Feeling Like 
a Fraud."' She explained that many people, but especially women, feel fraudulent when they are 
praised for their accomplishments. Instead of feeling worthy of recognition, they feel undeserving and 
guilty, as if a mistake has been made. Despite being high achievers, even experts in their fields, 
women can't seem to shake the sense that it is only a matter of time until they are found out for who 
they really are — impostors with limited skills or abilities. 

I thought it was the best speech I had ever heard. I was leaning forward in my chair, nodding 
vigorously. Carrie Weber, my brilliant and totally-not-a-fraud roommate, was doing the same. At last, 
someone was articulating exactly how I felt. Every time I was called on in class, I was sure that I was 
about to embarrass myself. Every time I took a test, I was sure that it had gone badly. And every time I 



didn't embarrass myself — or even excelled — I believed that I had fooled everyone yet again. One day 
soon, the jig would be up. 

At the joint reception that followed the ceremony — an after-party for nerds, so I fit right in — I told 
one of my male classmates about Dr. Mcintosh's fantastic speech explaining how we all feel like 
frauds. He looked at me, confused, and asked, "Why would that be interesting?" Carrie and I later 
joked that the speech to the men was probably something like "How to Cope in a World Where Not 
Everyone Is as Smart as You." 

This phenomenon of capable people being plagued by self-doubt has a name — the impostor 
syndrome. Both men and women are susceptible to the impostor syndrome, but women tend to 
experience it more intensely and be more limited by it. 2 Even the wildly successful writer and actress 
Tina Fey has admitted to these feelings. She once explained to a British newspaper, "The beauty of the 
impostor syndrome is you vacillate between extreme egomania, and a complete feeling of: 'I'm a 
fraud! Oh god, they're on to me! I'm a fraud!' So you just try to ride the egomania when it comes and 
enjoy it, and then slide through the idea of fraud. Seriously, I've just realized that almost everyone is a 
fraud, so I try not to feel too bad about it." 

For women, feeling like a fraud is a symptom of a greater problem. We consistently underestimate 
ourselves. Multiple studies in multiple industries show that women often judge their own performance 
as worse than it actually is, while men judge their own performance as better than it actually is. 
Assessments of students in a surgery rotation found that when asked to evaluate themselves, the 
female students gave themselves lower scores than the male students despite faculty evaluations that 

4 

showed the women outperformed the men. A survey of several thousand potential political candidates 
revealed that despite having comparable credentials, the men were about 60 percent more likely to 
think that they were "very qualified" to run for political office. A study of close to one thousand 
Harvard law students found that in almost every category of skills relevant to practicing law, women 
gave themselves lower scores than men. 6 Even worse, when women evaluate themselves in front of 
other people or in stereotypically male domains, their underestimations can become even more 
pronounced. 7 

Ask a man to explain his success and he will typically credit his own innate qualities and skills. Ask 
a woman the same question and she will attribute her success to external factors, insisting she did well 
because she "worked really hard," or "got lucky," or "had help from others." Men and women also 
differ when it comes to explaining failure. When a man fails, he points to factors like "didn't study 
enough" or "not interested in the subject matter." When a woman fails, she is more likely to believe it 
is due to an inherent lack of ability. 8 And in situations where a man and a woman each receive 
negative feedback, the woman's self-confidence and self-esteem drop to a much greater degree. 9 The 
internalization of failure and the insecurity it breeds hurt future performance, so this pattern has 
serious long-term consequences. 10 

And it's not just women who are tough on themselves. Colleagues and the media are also quick to 
credit external factors for a woman's achievements. When Facebook filed to go public, The New York 
Times ran an article that kindly reminded me — and everyone else — that I had "been lucky" and "had 
powerful mentors along the way."" Journalists and bloggers rose up to highlight the double standard, 



pointing out that The New York Times rarely ascribed men's success to having been lucky. But the 
Times didn't say anything that I had not already told myself a thousand times. At every stage of my 
career, I have attributed my success to luck, hard work, and help from others. 

My insecurity began, as most insecurities do, in high school. I attended a big public school in 
Miami — think Fast Times at Ridgemont High — that was far more concerned with preventing fights in 
the halls and keeping drugs out of the bathrooms than with academics. When I was accepted into 
Harvard, many of my high school classmates asked me why I would want to go to a school filled with 
geeks. Then they would stop short, remember who they were talking to, and sheepishly walk away 
without waiting for an answer, realizing they already had it. 

Freshman year of college was a huge shock for me. First semester, I took a course called The 
Concept of the Hero in Hellenic Civilization, which was nicknamed Heroes for Zeroes. I didn't have a 
burning desire to study Greek mythology, but it was the easiest way to fulfill the literature 
requirement. The professor began the first lecture by asking which students had read these books 
before. I whispered to my friend next to me, "What books?" u The Iliad and The Odyssey, of course," 
she replied. Almost every single hand went up. Not mine. The professor then asked, 'And who has 
read these books in the original?" "What original?" I asked my friend. "Homeric Greek," she replied. 
A good third of the class kept their hands up. It seemed pretty clear that I was one of the zeroes. 

A few weeks later, my professor of political philosophy assigned a five-page paper. I was panicked. 
Five whole pages ! I had only written one paper of that length in high school, and it was a year- long 
project. How could anyone write five pages in just one week? I stayed in every night, plugging away, 
and based on the time I put in, I should have gotten an A for effort. I got a C. It is virtually impossible 
to get a C at Harvard if the assignment is turned in. I am not exaggerating — this was the equivalent of 
a failing grade. I went to see my dorm proctor, who worked at the admissions office. She told me that 
I had been admitted to Harvard for my personality, not my academic potential. Very comforting. 

I buckled down, worked harder, and by the end of the semester, I learned how to write five-page 
papers. But no matter how well I did academically, I always felt like I was about to get caught for not 
really knowing anything. It wasn't until I heard the Phi Beta Kappa speech about self-doubt that it 
struck me: the real issue was not that I felt like a fraud, but that I could feel something deeply and 
profoundly and be completely wrong. 

I should have understood that this kind of self-doubt was more common for females from growing 
up with my brother. David is two years younger than I am and one of the people in the world whom I 
respect and love the most. At home, he splits child care duties with his wife fifty-fifty; at work, he's a 
pediatric neurosurgeon whose days are filled with heart- wrenching life-and-death decisions. Although 
we had the same upbringing, David has always been more confident. Once, back in high school, we 
both had Saturday night dates who canceled on us in the late afternoon. I spent the rest of the weekend 
moping around the house, wondering what was wrong with me. David laughed off the rejection, 
announcing, "That girl missed out on a great thing," and went off to play basketball with his friends. 
Luckily, I had my younger sister, wise and empathetic way beyond her years, to console me. 

A few years later, David joined me at college. When I was a senior and he was a sophomore, we 
took a class in European intellectual history together. My roommate, Carrie, also took the class, which 



was a huge help since she was a comparative literature major. Carrie went to all of the lectures and 
read all ten of the assigned books — in the original languages (and by then, I knew what those were). I 
went to almost all of the lectures and read all of the books — in English. David went to two lectures, 
read one book, and then marched himself up to our room to get tutored for the final exam. We all sat 
together for the test, scribbling furiously for three hours in our little blue books. When we walked out, 
we asked one another how it went. I was upset. I had forgotten to connect the Freudian id to 
Schopenhauer's conception of the will. Carrie, too, was concerned and confessed that she hadn't 
adequately explained Kant's distinction between the sublime and the beautiful. We turned to my 
brother. How did he feel about the test? "I got the flat one," he announced. "The flat one?" we asked. 
"Yeah," he said, "the flat A." 

He was right. He did get the flat one. Actually, we all got flat A's on the exam. My brother was not 
overconfident. Carrie and I were overly insecure. 

These experiences taught me that I needed to make both an intellectual and an emotional 
adjustment. I learned over time that while it was hard to shake feelings of self-doubt, I could 
understand that there was a distortion. I would never possess my brother's effortless confidence, but I 
could challenge the notion that I was constantly headed for failure. When I felt like I was not capable 
of doing something, I'd remind myself that I did not fail all of my exams in college. Or even one. I 
learned to undistort the distortion. 

We all know supremely confident people who have no right to feel that way. We also all know 
people who could do so much more if only they believed in themselves. Like so many things, a lack of 
confidence can become a self-fulfilling prophecy. I don't know how to convince anyone to believe 
deep down that she is the best person for the job, not even myself. To this day, I joke that I wish I 
could spend a few hours feeling as self-confident as my brother. It must feel so, so good — like 
receiving a cosmic flat one every day. 

When I don't feel confident, one tactic I've learned is that it sometimes helps to fake it. I discovered 
this when I was an aerobics instructor in the 1980s (which meant a silver leotard, leg warmers, and a 
shiny headband, all of which went perfectly with my big hair). Influenced by the gospel of Jane 
Fonda, aerobics also meant smiling solidly for a full hour. Some days, the smile came naturally. Other 
days, I was in a lousy mood and had to fake it. Yet after an hour of forced smiling, I often felt 
cheerful. 

Many of us have experienced being angry with someone and then having to pretend everything's 
great in public. My husband, Dave, and I have our moments, and just when we are getting into it, it 
will be time to go to a friend's house for dinner. We put on our "everything's great" smiles, and 
amazingly, after a few hours, it often is. 

Research backs up this "fake it till you feel it" strategy. One study found that when people assumed 
a high-power pose (for example, taking up space by spreading their limbs) for just two minutes, their 
dominance hormone levels (testosterone) went up and their stress hormone levels (Cortisol) went 
down. As a result, they felt more powerful and in charge and showed a greater tolerance for risk. A 
simple change in posture led to a significant change in attitude. 1 " 



I would not suggest that anyone move beyond feeling confident into arrogance or boastfulness. No 
one likes that in men or women. But feeling confident — or pretending that you feel confident — is 
necessary to reach for opportunities. It's a cliche, but opportunities are rarely offered; they're seized. 
During the six and a half years I worked at Google, I hired a team of four thousand employees. I did 
not know all of them personally, but I knew the top hundred or so. What I noticed over the years was 
that for the most part, the men reached for opportunities much more quickly than the women. When 
we announced the opening of a new office or the launch of a new project, the men were banging down 
my door to explain why they should lead the charge. Men were also more likely to chase a growth 
opportunity even before a new opening was announced. They were impatient about their own 
development and believed that they were capable of doing more. And they were often right — just like 
my brother. The women, however, were more cautious about changing roles and seeking out new 
challenges. I often found myself trying to persuade them to work in new areas. I have had countless 
conversations where women responded to this encouragement by saying, "I'm just not sure I'd be 
good at that." Or "That sounds exciting, but I've never done anything like it before." Or "I still have a 
lot to learn in my current role." I rarely, if ever, heard these kinds of comments from men. 

Given how fast the world moves today, grabbing opportunities is more important than ever. Few 
managers have the time to carefully consider all the applicants for a job, much less convince more 
reticent people to apply. And increasingly, opportunities are not well defined but, instead, come from 
someone jumping in to do something. That something then becomes his job. 

When I first joined Facebook, I was working with a team to answer the critical question of how best 
to grow our business. The conversations were getting heated, with many people arguing their own 
positions strongly. We ended the week without consensus. Dan Rose, leader of our deal team, spent 
the weekend gathering market data that allowed us to reframe the conversation in analytics. His effort 
broke the logjam. I then expanded Dan's responsibilities to include product marketing. Taking 
initiative pays off. It is hard to visualize someone as a leader if she is always waiting to be told what to 
do. 

Padmasree Warrior, Cisco's chief technology officer, was asked by The Huffington Post, "What's 
the most important lesson you've learned from a mistake you've made in the past?" She responded, "I 
said no to a lot of opportunities when I was just starting out because I thought, 'That's not what my 
degree is in' or 'I don't know about that domain.' In retrospect, at a certain point it's your ability to 
learn quickly and contribute quickly that matters. One of the things I tell people these days is that 
there is no perfect fit when you're looking for the next big thing to do. You have to take opportunities 
and make an opportunity fit for you, rather than the other way around. The ability to learn is the most 
important quality a leader can have."' 

Virginia Rometty, IBM's first female CEO, told the audience at the 2011 Fortune Most Powerful 
Women Summit that early in her career, she was offered a "big job." She worried that she lacked the 
proper experience and told the recruiter that she needed to think about it. That night, she discussed the 
offer with her husband, who pointed out, "Do you think a man would have ever answered that 
question that way?" 



"What it taught me was you have to be very confident," Ginni said. "Even though you're so self- 

14 

critical inside about what it is you may or may not know. And that, to me, leads to taking risks." 

I continue to be alarmed not just at how we as women fail to put ourselves forward, but also at how 
we fail to notice and correct for this gap. And that "we" includes me. A few years ago, I gave a talk on 
gender issues to a few hundred employees at Facebook. After my speech, I took questions for as long 
as time permitted. Later that afternoon, I came back to my desk, where a young woman was waiting to 
talk to me. "I learned something today," she said. "What?" I asked, feeling good, as I figured she was 
about to tell me how my words had touched her. Instead, she said, "I learned to keep my hand up." 
She explained that toward the end of my talk, I had said that I would take only two more questions. I 
did so, and then she put her hand down, along with all of the other women. But several men kept their 
hands up. And since hands were still waving in the air, I took more questions — only from the men. 
Instead of my words touching her, her words hit me like a ton of bricks. Even though I was giving a 
speech on gender issues, I had been blind to one myself. 

If we want a world with greater equality, we need to acknowledge that women are less likely to 
keep their hands up. We need institutions and individuals to notice and correct for this behavior by 
encouraging, promoting, and championing more women. And women have to learn to keep their 
hands up, because when they lower them, even managers with the best intentions might not notice. 

When I first started working for Larry Summers, then chief economist at the World Bank, he was 
married to a tax attorney, Vicki. He was very supportive of Vicki's career and used to urge her to "bill 
like a boy." His view was that the men considered any time they spent thinking about an issue — even 
time in the shower — as billable hours. His wife and her female colleagues, however, would decide that 
they were not at their best on a given day and discount hours they spent at their desks to be fair to the 
client. Which lawyers were more valuable to that firm? To make his point, Larry told them the story of 
a renowned Harvard Law School professor who was asked by a judge to itemize a bill. The professor 
responded that he could not because he was so often thinking about two things at once. 

Even now, I'm a long way from mastering the art of feeling confident. In August 2011, Forbes put 
out its annual World's 100 Most Powerful Women list.' 5 I'm savvy enough to know that the list wasn't 
based on a scientific formula and that magazines love these features because they generate lots of page 
views as readers click through each name. Still, I was shocked — no, horrified — to learn that Forbes 
ranked me as the fifth most powerful woman in the world, right after German chancellor Angela 
Merkel, Secretary of State Hillary Clinton, Brazilian president Dilma Rousseff, and the CEO of 
PepsiCo, Indra Nooyi. This put me ahead of First Lady Michelle Obama and Indian politician Sonia 
Gandhi. Absurd. My own mother called to say, "Well, dear, I do think you are very powerful, but I am 
not sure you are more powerful than Michelle Obama." You think? 

Far from feeling powerful, I felt embarrassed and exposed. When colleagues at Facebook stopped 
me in the halls to say congratulations, I pronounced the list "ridiculous." When friends posted the link 
on Facebook, I asked them to take it down. After a few days, my longtime executive assistant, Camille 
Hart, summoned me into a conference room and closed the door. This was serious. She told me that I 
was handling the Forbes thing poorly and that I needed to stop subjecting anyone who brought up the 



list to a diatribe on its absurdity. I was showing too many people how uncomfortable I felt and 
revealing my insecurity. Instead, I needed to simply say, "Thank you." 

We all need colleagues like Camille, who was honest enough to point out my less-than-gracious 
response. She was right. Whether the list was ridiculous or not, I didn't write it and I didn't have to 
react negatively to it. I doubt a man would have felt so overwhelmed by others' perception of his 
power. 

I know that my success comes from hard work, help from others, and being at the right place at the 
right time. I feel a deep and enduring sense of gratitude to those who have given me opportunities and 
support. I recognize the sheer luck of being born into my family in the United States rather than one of 
the many places in the world where women are denied basic rights. I believe that all of us — men and 
women alike — should acknowledge good fortune and thank the people who have helped us. No one 
accomplishes anything all alone. 

But I also know that in order to continue to grow and challenge myself, I have to believe in my own 
abilities. I still face situations that I fear are beyond my capabilities. I still have days when I feel like a 
fraud. And I still sometimes find myself spoken over and discounted while men sitting next to me are 
not. But now I know how to take a deep breath and keep my hand up. I have learned to sit at the table. 



3 



Success and Likeability 



Okay, so all a woman has to do is ignore society's expectations, be ambitious, sit at the table, work 
hard, and then it's smooth sailing all the way. What could possibly go wrong? 

In 2003, Columbia Business School professor Frank Flynn and New York University professor 
Cameron Anderson ran an experiment to test perceptions of men and women in the workplace. 1 They 
started with a Harvard Business School case study about a real-life entrepreneur named Heidi Roizen. 
The case described how Roizen became a successful venture capitalist by using her "outgoing 
personality . . . and vast personal and professional network [that] included many of the most powerful 
business leaders in the technology sector."" Flynn and Anderson assigned half of the students to read 
Heidi's story and gave the other half the same story with just one difference — they changed the name 
"Heidi" to "Howard." 

Professors Flynn and Anderson then polled the students about their impressions of Heidi or 
Howard. The students rated Heidi and Howard as equally competent, which made sense since "their" 
accomplishments were completely identical. Yet while students respected both Heidi and Howard, 
Howard came across as a more appealing colleague. Heidi, on the other hand, was seen as selfish and 
not "the type of person you would want to hire or work for." The same data with a single difference — 
gender — created vastly different impressions. 

This experiment supports what research has already clearly shown: success and likeability are 
positively correlated for men and negatively correlated for women. When a man is successful, he is 
liked by both men and women. When a woman is successful, people of both genders like her less. This 
truth is both shocking and unsurprising: shocking because no one would ever admit to stereotyping on 
the basis of gender and unsurprising because clearly we do. 

Decades of social science studies have confirmed what the Heidi/Howard case study so blatantly 
demonstrates: we evaluate people based on stereotypes (gender, race, nationality, and age, among 

4 

others). Our stereotype of men holds that they are providers, decisive, and driven. Our stereotype of 
women holds that they are caregivers, sensitive, and communal. Because we characterize men and 
women in opposition to each other, professional achievement and all the traits associated with it get 
placed in the male column. By focusing on her career and taking a calculated approach to amassing 
power, Heidi violated our stereotypical expectations of women. Yet by behaving in the exact same 
manner, Howard lived up to our stereotypical expectations of men. The end result? Liked him, 
disliked her. 

I believe this bias is at the very core of why women are held back. It is also at the very core of why 
women hold themselves back. For men, professional success comes with positive reinforcement at 
every step of the way. For women, even when they're recognized for their achievements, they're often 



regarded unfavorably. Journalist Shankar Vedantam once cataloged the derogatory descriptions of 
some of the first female world leaders. "England's Margaret Thatcher," he wrote, "was called 'Attila 
the Hen.' Golda Meir, Israel's first female Prime Minister, was 'the only man in the Cabinet.' 
President Richard Nixon called Indira Gandhi, India's first female Prime Minister, 'the old witch.' 
And Angela Merkel, the current chancellor of Germany, has been dubbed 'the iron frau.' " 5 

I have seen this dynamic play out over and over. When a woman excels at her job, both male and 
female coworkers will remark that she may be accomplishing a lot but is "not as well-liked by her 
peers." She is probably also "too aggressive," "not a team player," "a bit political," "can't be trusted," 
or "difficult." At least, those are all things that have been said about me and almost every senior 
woman I know. The world seems to be asking why we can't be less like Heidi and more like Howard. 

Most women have never heard of the Heidi/Howard study. Most of us are never told about this 
downside of achievement. Still, we sense this punishment for success. We're aware that when a 
woman acts forcefully or competitively, she's deviating from expected behavior. If a woman pushes to 
get the job done, if she's highly competent, if she focuses on results rather than on pleasing others, 
she's acting like a man. And if she acts like a man, people dislike her. In response to this negative 
reaction, we temper our professional goals. Author Ken Auletta summarized this phenomenon in The 
New Yorker when he observed that for women, "self-doubt becomes a form of self-defense." 6 In order 
to protect ourselves from being disliked, we question our abilities and downplay our achievements, 
especially in the presence of others. We put ourselves down before others can. 

During the summer between my first and second year in business school, I received a letter in the 
mail congratulating me on becoming a Henry Ford Scholar for having the highest first-year academic 
record. The check was for $714.28, an odd number that immediately signaled that several students had 
split the prize. When we returned to school for our second year, six men let it be known that they had 
won this award. I multiplied my check by seven and it revealed a nearly round number. Mystery 
solved. There were seven of us — six men and me. 

Unlike the other six winners, I didn't let my award status become general knowledge. I told only 
my closest friend, Stephen Paul, and knew he would keep my secret. On the surface, this decision 
might have worked against me, since grades at Harvard Business School are based 50 percent on class 
participation. Professors teach ninety-minute classes and are not allowed to write anything down, so 
they have to rely on their memory of class discussion. When a student makes a comment that others 
refer to — "If I can build on what Tom said ..." — that helps the professor remember the critical points 
and who made them. Just as in real life, performance is highly dependent upon the reaction people 
have to one another. The other six Ford Scholars quickly became the most-quoted speakers as their 
academic standing gave them instant credibility. They also received early job offers from prestigious 
employers before the official recruiting period even began. One day in class, one of the exalted six 
made a comment that, to my mind, demonstrated that he had not even read the case being discussed. 
Everyone fawned all over him. I wondered if I was making a huge mistake not letting people know 
that I was the seventh student. It would have been nice to float through my second year of business 
school without even reading the material. 



But I never really considered going public. I instinctively knew that letting my academic 
performance become known was a bad idea. Years later, when I learned about the Heidi/Howard case 
study, I understood the reason why. Being at the top of the class may have made life easier for my 
male peers, but it would have made my life harder. 

I did not reach this conclusion in a vacuum. All through my life, culturally reinforced signals 
cautioned me against being branded as too smart or too successful. It starts young. As a girl, you know 
that being smart is good in lots of ways, but it doesn't make you particularly popular or attractive to 
boys. In school, I was called the "smartest girl in the class." I hated that description. Who wants to go 
to the prom with the smartest girl in the class? Senior year, my class voted me "most likely to 
succeed," along with a boy. I wasn't going to take any chances with the prom, so I convinced my 
friend, who worked on the yearbook, to remove my name. I got a prom date who was fun and loved 
sports. In fact, he loved sports so much that two days before the prom, he canceled on me to go to a 
basketball game, saying, "I know you'll understand since going to the playoffs is a once-in-a-lifetime 
opportunity." I did not point out that as a high school girl, I thought going to the prom was a once-in- 
a-lifetime opportunity. Luckily, I found a new date who was less of a sports fan. 

I never really thought about why I went to such efforts to mute my achievements from such a young 
age. Then, about ten years after I graduated from business school, I was seated at dinner next to 
Deborah Gruenfeld, a professor of leadership and organizational behavior at Stanford, and our friendly 
small talk quickly turned into an intense discussion. Having studied this issue, Professor Gruenfeld 
was able to explain the price women pay for success. "Our entrenched cultural ideas associate men 
with leadership qualities and women with nurturing qualities and put women in a double bind," she 
said. "We believe not only that women are nurturing, but that they should be nurturing above all else. 
When a woman does anything that signals she might not be nice first and foremost, it creates a 

7 

negative impression and makes us uncomfortable." 

If a woman is competent, she does not seem nice enough. If a woman seems really nice, she is 
considered more nice than competent. Since people want to hire and promote those who are both 
competent and nice, this creates a huge stumbling block for women. Acting in stereotypically 
feminine ways makes it difficult to reach for the same opportunities as men, but defying expectations 
and reaching for those opportunities leads to being judged as undeserving and selfish. Nothing has 
changed since high school; intelligence and success are not clear paths to popularity at any age. This 
complicates everything, because at the same time that women need to sit at the table and own their 
success, doing so causes them to be liked less. s 

Most people, myself included, really want to be liked — and not just because it feels good. Being 
liked is also a key factor in both professional and personal success. A willingness to make an 
introduction or advocate for or promote someone depends upon having positive feelings about that 
person. We need to believe in her ability to do the job and get along with everyone while doing it. 
That's why, instinctively, many of us feel pressure to mute our accomplishments. 

In October 2011, Jocelyn Goldfein, one of the engineering directors at Facebook, held a meeting 
with our female engineers where she encouraged them to share the progress they had made on the 
products they were building. Silence. No one wanted to toot her own horn. Who would want to speak 



up when self-promoting women are disliked? Jocelyn switched her approach. Instead of asking the 
women to talk about themselves, she asked them to tell one another's stories. The exercise became 
communal, which put everyone at ease. 

Owning one's success is key to achieving more success. Professional advancement depends upon 
people believing that an employee is contributing to good results. Men can comfortably claim credit 
for what they do as long as they don't veer into arrogance. For women, taking credit comes at a real 
social and professional cost. In fact, a woman who explains why she is qualified or mentions previous 

9 

successes in a job interview can lower her chances of getting hired. 

As if this double bind were not enough to navigate, gendered stereotypes can also lead to women 
having to do additional work without additional reward. When a man helps a colleague, the recipient 
feels indebted to him and is highly likely to return the favor. But when a woman helps out, the feeling 
of indebtedness is weaker. She's communal, right? She wants to help others. Professor Flynn calls this 
the "gender discount" problem, and it means that women are paying a professional penalty for their 
presumed desire to be communal. " On the other hand, when a man helps a coworker, it's considered 
an imposition and he is compensated with more favorable performance evaluations and rewards like 
salary increases and bonuses. Even more frustrating, when a woman declines to help a colleague, she 
often receives less favorable reviews and fewer rewards. But a man who declines to help? He pays no 
penalty. 

Because of these unfair expectations, women find themselves in "damned if they do" and "doomed 
if they don't" situations.'" This is especially true when it comes to negotiations concerning 
compensation, benefits, titles, and other perks. By and large, men negotiate more than women.' A 
study that looked at the starting salaries of students graduating with a master's degree from Carnegie 
Mellon University found that 57 percent of the male students, but only 7 percent of the female 

14 

students, tried to negotiate for a higher offer. But instead of blaming women for not negotiating 
more, we need to recognize that women often have good cause to be reluctant to advocate for their 
own interests because doing so can easily backfire. 

There is little downside when men negotiate for themselves. People expect men to advocate on their 
own behalf, point out their contributions, and be recognized and rewarded for them. For men, there is 
truly no harm in asking. But since women are expected to be concerned with others, when they 
advocate for themselves or point to their own value, both men and women react unfavorably. 
Interestingly, women can negotiate as well as or even more successfully than men when negotiating 
for others (such as their company or a colleague), because in these cases, their advocacy does not 
make them appear self-serving.' 6 However, when a woman negotiates on her own behalf, she violates 
the perceived gender norm. Both male and female colleagues often resist working with a woman who 
has negotiated for a higher salary because she's seen as more demanding than a woman who refrained 

17 

from negotiating. Even when a woman negotiates successfully for herself, she can pay a longer-term 
cost in goodwill and future advancement.' 8 Regrettably, all women are Heidi. Try as we might, we just 
can't be Howard. 

When I was negotiating with Facebook's founder and CEO Mark Zuckerberg for my compensation, 
he made me an offer that I thought was fair. We had been having dinner several nights a week for 



more than a month and a half, discussing Facebook's mission and his vision for the future. I was ready 
to accept the job. No, I was dying to accept the job. My husband, Dave, kept telling me to negotiate, 
but I was afraid of doing anything that might botch the deal. I could play hardball, but then maybe 
Mark would not want to work with me. Was it worth it when I knew that ultimately I was going to 
accept the offer? I concluded it was not. But right before I was about to say yes, my exasperated 
brother-in-law, Marc Bodnick, blurted out, "Damn it, Sheryl! Why are you going to make less than 
any man would make to do the same job?" 

My brother-in-law didn't know the details of my deal. His point was simply that no man at my level 
would consider taking the first offer. This was motivating. I went back to Mark and said that I couldn't 
accept, but I prefaced it by telling him, "Of course you realize that you're hiring me to run your deal 
teams, so you want me to be a good negotiator. This is the only time you and I will ever be on 
opposite sides of the table." Then I negotiated hard, followed by a nervous night wondering if I had 
blown it. But Mark called me the next day. He resolved the gap by improving my offer, extending the 
terms of my contract from four to five years and allowing me to buy into the company as well. His 
creative solution not only closed the deal, but also set us up for a longer-term alignment of interests. 

The goal of a successful negotiation is to achieve our objectives and continue to have people like us. 
Professor Hannah Riley Bowles, who studies gender and negotiations at Harvard's Kennedy School of 
Government, believes that women can increase their chances of achieving a desired outcome by doing 

19 

two things in combination. First, women must come across as being nice, concerned about others, 
and "appropriately" female. When women take a more instrumental approach ("This is what I want 
and deserve"), people react far more negatively. 

There is a saying, "Think globally, act locally." When negotiating, "Think personally, act 
communally." I have advised many women to preface negotiations by explaining that they know that 
women often get paid less than men so they are going to negotiate rather than accept the original offer. 
By doing so, women position themselves as connected to a group and not just out for themselves; in 
effect, they are negotiating for all women. And as silly as it sounds, pronouns matter. Whenever 
possible, women should substitute "we" for "I." A woman's request will be better received if she 

20 

asserts, "We had a great year," as opposed to "I had a great year."" 

But a communal approach is not enough. According to Professor Bowles, the second thing women 
must do is provide a legitimate explanation for the negotiation."' Men don't have to legitimize their 
negotiations; they are expected to look out for themselves. Women, however, have to justify their 
requests. One way of doing this is to suggest that someone more senior encouraged the negotiation 
("My manager suggested I talk with you about my compensation") or to cite industry standards ("My 
understanding is that jobs that involve this level of responsibility are compensated in this range"). 
Still, every negotiation is unique, so women must adjust their approach accordingly. 

Telling a current employer about an offer from another company is a common tactic but works for 
men more easily than for women. Men are allowed to be focused on their own achievements, while 
loyalty is expected from women. Also, just being nice is not a winning strategy. Nice sends a message 
that the woman is willing to sacrifice pay to be liked by others. This is why a woman needs to 
combine niceness with insistence, a style that Mary Sue Coleman, president of the University of 



Michigan, calls "relentlessly pleasant."" This method requires smiling frequently, expressing 
appreciation and concern, invoking common interests, emphasizing larger goals, and approaching the 
negotiation as solving a problem as opposed to taking a critical stance." Most negotiations involve 
drawn-out, successive moves, so women need to stay focused ... and smile. 

No wonder women don't negotiate as much as men. It's like trying to cross a minefield backward in 
high heels. So what should we do? Should we play by the rules that others created? Should we figure 
out a way to put on a friendly expression while not being too nice, displaying the right levels of 
loyalty and using "we" language? I understand the paradox of advising women to change the world by 
adhering to biased rules and expectations. I know it is not a perfect answer but a means to a desirable 
end. It is also true, as any good negotiator knows, that having a better understanding of the other side 
leads to a superior outcome. So at the very least, women can enter these negotiations with the 
knowledge that showing concern for the common good, even as they negotiate for themselves, will 
strengthen their position. 

In addition, there are huge benefits to communal effort in and of itself. By definition, all 
organizations consist of people working together. Focusing on the team leads to better results for the 
simple reason that well-functioning groups are stronger than individuals. Teams that work together 
well outperform those that don't. And success feels better when it's shared with others. So perhaps 
one positive result of having more women at the top is that our leaders will have been trained to care 
more about the well-being of others. My hope, of course, is that we won't have to play by these 
archaic rules forever and that eventually we can all just be ourselves. 

We still have a long way to go. In November 201 1, San Francisco magazine ran a story on female 
entrepreneurs in Silicon Valley and illustrated it by superimposing the featured women's heads onto 
male bodies." 4 The only body type they could imagine for successful entrepreneurship was wearing a 
tie or a hoodie. Our culture needs to find a robust image of female success that is first, not male, and 
second, not a white woman on the phone, holding a crying baby. In fact, these "bad mother with a 
briefcase" images are so prevalent that writer Jessica Valenti collected them in a funny and poignant 
blog post called "Sad White Babies with Mean Feminist Mommies." 25 

Until we can get there, I fear that women will continue to sacrifice being liked for being successful. 
When I first arrived at Facebook, a local blog devoted some serious pixels to trashing me. They posted 
a picture of me and superimposed a gun into my hand. They wrote "liar" in big red letters across my 
face. Anonymous sources labeled me "two-faced" and "about to ruin Facebook forever." I cried. I lost 
some sleep. I worried that my career was over. Then I told myself it didn't matter. Then everyone else 
told me it didn't matter — which only reminded me that they were reading these awful comments too. I 
fantasized about all sorts of rejoinders, but in the end, my best response was to ignore the attacks and 
do my job. 

Arianna Huffington, founder of The Huffington Post, believes that learning to withstand criticism is 
a necessity for women. Early in her career, Arianna realized that the cost of speaking her mind was 
that she would inevitably offend someone. She does not believe it is realistic or even desirable to tell 
women not to care when we are attacked. Her advice is that we should let ourselves react emotionally 
and feel whatever anger or sadness being criticized evokes for us. And then we should quickly move 



on. She points to children as her role model. A child can cry one moment and ran off to play the next. 
For me, this has been good advice. I wish I were strong enough to ignore what others say, but 
experience tells me I often can't. Allowing myself to feel upset, even really upset, and then move on — 
that's something I can do. 

It also helps to lean on one another. We can comfort ourselves with the knowledge that the attacks 
are not personal. We can joke, as Mario Thomas did, that "a man has to be Joe McCarthy in order to 
be called ruthless. All a woman needs to do is put you on hold." Real change will come when 
powerful women are less of an exception. It is easy to dislike senior women because there are so few. 
If women held 50 percent of the top jobs, it would just not be possible to dislike that many people. 

Sharon Meers was motivated to write Getting to 50/50 after observing this kind of tipping point 
firsthand. In the late 1990s, Amy Goodfriend was chosen to lead Goldman Sachs's U.S. derivatives 
team (and later became the first female partner in the Equities Division). It was a seismic event and 
caused four senior men to quit the group. Amy faced a lot of skepticism and criticism. Before Sharon 
joined the team, a male friend told her, "Amy's a bitch, but an honest bitch." Sharon found that Amy 
was a great boss, and over the next few years, the derivatives group was transformed under her 
leadership. Once there were more than five female managing directors in the division — a critical 
mass — the negativity and grumbling began to die down. It became normal to have female leaders, and 
by 2000, the stigma seemed to have dissipated. Sadly, when those senior women later left and the 
critical mass shrank, the faith that women could be as successful as their male peers shrank with it. 

Everyone needs to get more comfortable with female leaders — including female leaders themselves. 
Since 1999, editor Pattie Sellers of Fortune magazine has overseen an annual conference that she calls 
the Most Powerful Women Summit. On my first night there in 2005, I was in the lounge with two 
close friends, Diana Farrell, then head of the McKinsey Global Institute, and Sue Decker, then CFO of 
Yahoo. We were talking about the name of the conference, and I mentioned that when I saw the title 
on Google's corporate calendar, I ran to find Camille to ask her to change the name to "Fortune 
Women's Conference." Diana and Sue laughed and said that they had done the exact same thing. 

Later, Pattie explained that she and her colleagues chose this name on purpose to force women to 
confront their own power and feel more comfortable with that word. I still struggle with this. I am fine 
applying the word "powerful" to other women — the more the better — but I still shake my head in 
denial when it is applied to me. The nagging voice in the back of my head reminds me, as it did in 
business school, "Don't flaunt your success, or even let people know about your success. If you do, 
people won't like you." 

Less than six months after I started at Facebook, Mark and I sat down for my first formal review. 
One of the things he told me was that my desire to be liked by everyone would hold me back. He said 
that when you want to change things, you can't please everyone. If you do please everyone, you aren't 
making enough progress. Mark was right. 



4 



It's a Jungle Gym, 
Not a Ladder 



About a month after I joined Facebook, I got a call from Lori Goler, a highly regarded senior director of 
marketing at eBay. I knew Lori a bit socially, but she made it clear this was a business call and cut to 
the chase. "I want to apply to work with you at Facebook," she said. "So I thought about calling you 
and telling you all of the things Fm good at and all of the things I like to do. Fhen I figured that 
everyone was doing that. So instead, I want to ask you: What is your biggest problem, and how can I 
solve it?" 

My jaw hit the floor. I had hired thousands of people over the previous decade and no one had ever 
said anything remotely like that. People usually focus on finding the right role for themselves, with the 
implication that their skills will help the company. Lori put Facebook' s needs front and center. It was 
a killer approach. I responded, "Recruiting is my biggest problem. And, yes, you can solve it." 

Lori never dreamed she would work in recruiting, but she jumped in. She even agreed to drop down 
a level, since this was a new field for her and she was willing to trade seniority for acquiring new 
skills. Lori did a great job running recruiting and within months was promoted to her current job, 
leading People ©Facebook. When I asked her recently if she wanted to go back to marketing someday, 
she responded that she believes human resources allows her to have a greater overall impact. 

The most common metaphor for careers is a ladder, but this concept no longer applies to most 
workers. As of 2010, the average American had eleven jobs from the ages of eighteen to forty-six 
alone.' This means that the days of joining an organization or corporation and staying there to climb 
that one ladder are long gone. Lori often quotes Pattie Sellers, who conceived a much better metaphor: 
"Careers are a jungle gym, not a ladder." 

As Lori describes it, ladders are limiting — people can move up or down, on or off. Jungle gyms 
offer more creative exploration. There's only one way to get to the top of a ladder, but there are many 
ways to get to the top of a jungle gym. The jungle gym model benefits everyone, but especially 
women who might be starting careers, switching careers, getting blocked by external barriers, or 
reentering the workforce after taking time off. The ability to forge a unique path with occasional dips, 
detours, and even dead ends presents a better chance for fulfillment. Plus, a jungle gym provides great 
views for many people, not just those at the top. On a ladder, most climbers are stuck staring at the 
butt of the person above. 

A jungle gym scramble is the best description of my career. Younger colleagues and students 
frequently ask me how I planned my path. When I tell them that I didn't, they usually react with 
surprise followed by relief. They seem encouraged to know that careers do not need to be mapped out 
from the start. This is especially comforting in a tough market where job seekers often have to accept 



what is available and hope that it points in a desirable direction. We all want a job or role that truly 
excites and engages us. This search requires both focus and flexibility, so I recommend adopting two 
concurrent goals: a long-term dream and an eighteen-month plan. 

I could never have connected the dots from where I started to where I am today. For one thing, 
Mark Zuckerberg was only seven years old when I graduated from college. Also, back then, 
technology and I did not exactly have a great relationship. I used Harvard's computer system only 
once as an undergraduate, to run regressions for my senior thesis on the economics of spousal abuse. 
The data was stored on large, heavy magnetic tapes that I had to lug in big boxes across campus, 
cursing the entire way and arriving in a sweaty mess at the sole computer center, which was populated 
exclusively with male students. I then had to stay up all night spinning the tapes to input the data. 
When I tried to execute my final calculations, I took down the entire system. That's right. Years 
before Mark famously crashed that same Harvard system, I beat him to it. 

When I graduated from college, I had only the vaguest notion of where I was headed. This 
confusion was in deep contrast to my father's clear conviction of what he wanted to do from a young 
age. When my dad was sixteen, he felt a sharp abdominal pain during a basketball practice. My 
grandmother — good Jewish mother that she was — assumed it was hunger and fed him a big dinner. 
That made it worse. He ended up in the hospital, where he was diagnosed with acute appendicitis, but 
because he had eaten, they couldn't operate for twelve excruciating hours. The next morning, a 
surgeon removed his appendix and, along with it, the pain. My father chose his career that day, 
deciding that he would become a physician so he could help ease other people's suffering. 

My mother shared my father's desire to help others. She was only eleven when she heard her rabbi 
give a sermon on the importance of civil rights and tikkun olam, a Hebrew phrase that means 
"repairing the world." She responded to the call, grabbing a tin can and knocking on doors to support 
civil rights workers in the South. She has remained a passionate volunteer and human rights activist 
ever since. I grew up watching my mother work tirelessly on behalf of persecuted Jews in the Soviet 
Union. She and her friend Margery Sanford would write heartfelt appeals calling for the release of 
political prisoners. In the evenings, my dad would join them. Thanks to the collective efforts of 
concerned people all over the world, many lives were saved. 

Throughout my childhood, my parents emphasized the importance of pursuing a meaningful life. 
Dinner discussions often centered on social injustice and those fighting to make the world a better 
place. As a child, I never thought about what I wanted to be, but I thought a lot about what I wanted to 
do. As sappy as it sounds, I hoped to change the world. My sister and brother both became doctors, 
and I always believed I would work at a nonprofit or in government. That was my dream. And while I 
don't believe in mapping out each step of a career, I do believe it helps to have a long-term dream or 
goal. 

A long-term dream does not have to be realistic or even specific. It may reflect the desire to work in 
a particular field or to travel throughout the world. Maybe the dream is to have professional autonomy 
or a certain amount of free time. Maybe it's to create something lasting or win a coveted prize. Some 
goals require more traditional paths; anyone who aspires to become a Supreme Court justice should 



probably start by attending law school. But even a vague goal can provide direction, a far-off 
guidepost to move toward. 

With an eye on my childhood dream, the first job I took out of college was at the World Bank as 
research assistant to Larry Summers, who was serving a term as chief economist. Based in 
Washington, D.C., the Bank's mission is to reduce global poverty. I spent my first nine months in the 
stacks of the Bank library on the corner of Nineteenth and Pennsylvania, looking up facts and figures 
for Larry's papers and speeches. Larry then generously arranged for me to join an India health field 
mission to get a closer look at what the Bank actually did. 

Flying to India took me into an entirely different world. The team was working to eradicate leprosy, 
which was endemic in India's most remote and poorest regions. The conditions were appalling. Due to 
the stigma of the disease, patients were often exiled from their villages and ended up lying on dirt 
floors in awful places that passed for clinics. Facts and figures could never have prepared me for this 
reality. I have the deepest respect for people who provide hands-on help to those in crises. It is the 
most difficult work in the world. 

I returned to D.C. with a plan to attend law school, but Lant Pritchett, an economist in Larry's office 
who has devoted his life to the study of poverty, persuaded me that business school would be a better 
alternative. I headed back to Cambridge. I tried to stay socially conscious by joining the highly 
unpopular Nonprofit Club. I also spent my second year studying social marketing — how marketing 
can be used to solve social problems — with Professor Kash Rangan. One of the cases we worked on 
concerned the shortage of organ donations, which results in eighteen deaths each day in the United 
States alone. I never forgot this case, and seventeen years later, Facebook worked with organ registries 
around the world to launch a tool to encourage donor registration. 

After business school, I took a job as a consultant at McKinsey & Company in Los Angeles. The 
work never entirely suited me, so I stayed for only a year and then moved back to D.C. to join Larry, 
who was now deputy secretary of the Treasury Department. At first, I served as his special assistant. 
Then, when he was named secretary, I became his chief of staff. My job consisted of helping Larry 
manage the operations of the department and its $14 billion budget. It gave me the opportunity to 
participate in economic policy at both a national and an international level. I also ran point on some 
smaller projects, including the administration's proposal to promote the development of vaccines for 
infectious diseases. 

During my four years at Treasury, I witnessed the first technology boom from a distance. Its impact 
was obvious and appealing even beyond being able to wear jeans to work. Technology was 
transforming communication and changing lives not just in the United States and developed countries, 
but everywhere. My long-term dream instinct kicked in. When President Clinton's administration 
ended, I was out of a job and decided to move to Silicon Valley. In retrospect, this seems like a 
shrewd move, but in 2001, it was questionable at best. The tech bubble had burst, and the industry was 
still reeling from the aftershocks. I gave myself four months to find a job but hoped it would take 
fewer. It took almost a year. 

My Silicon Valley job search had some highs, like getting to meet my business crush, eBay CEO 
Meg Whitman. It also had some lows, like meeting with a high-level executive who started my 



interview by stating that her company would never even consider hiring someone like me because 
government experience could not possibly prepare anyone to work in the tech industry. It would have 
been so cool to have thanked her for being honest and walked out of her office. But alas, I was never 
cool. I sat there hemming and hawing until every last molecule of oxygen had been sucked from the 
room. True to her word, she never even considered hiring me. 

Fortunately, not everyone shared her view. Eric Schmidt and I had met several times during my 
Treasury years, and I went to see him just after he became CEO of the then relatively unknown 
Google. After several rounds of interviews with Google's founders, they offered me a job. My bank 
account was diminishing quickly, so it was time to get back to paid employment, and fast. In typical — 
and yes, annoying — MBA fashion, I made a spreadsheet and listed my various opportunities in the 
rows and my selection criteria in the columns. I compared the roles, the level of responsibility, and so 
on. My heart wanted to join Google in its mission to provide the world with access to information, but 
in the spreadsheet game, the Google job fared the worst by far. 

I went back to Eric and explained my dilemma. The other companies were recruiting me for real 
jobs with teams to run and goals to hit. At Google, I would be the first "business unit general 
manager," which sounded great except for the glaring fact that Google had no business units and 
therefore nothing to actually manage. Not only was the role lower in level than my other options, but it 
was entirely unclear what the job was in the first place. 

Eric responded with perhaps the best piece of career advice that I have ever heard. He covered my 
spreadsheet with his hand and told me not to be an idiot (also a great piece of advice). Then he 
explained that only one criterion mattered when picking a job — fast growth. When companies grow 
quickly, there are more things to do than there are people to do them. When companies grow more 
slowly or stop growing, there is less to do and too many people to not be doing them. Politics and 
stagnation set in, and everyone falters. He told me, "If you're offered a seat on a rocket ship, you don't 
ask what seat. You just get on." I made up my mind that instant. Google was tiny and disorganized, 
but it was a rocket ship. And even more important to me, it was a rocket ship with a mission I believed 
in deeply. 

Over the years, I have repeated Eric's advice to countless people, encouraging them to reduce their 
career spreadsheets to one column: potential for growth. Of course, not everyone has the opportunity 
or the desire to work in an industry like high tech. But within any field, there are jobs that have more 
potential for growth than others. Those in more established industries can look for the rocket ships 
within their companies — divisions or teams that are expanding. And in careers like teaching or 
medicine, the corollary is to seek out positions where there is high demand for those skills. For 
example, in my brother's field of pediatric neurosurgery, there are some cities with too many 
physicians, while others have too few. My brother has always elected to work where his expertise 
would be in demand so he can have the greatest impact. 

Just as I believe everyone should have a long-term dream, I also believe everyone should have an 
eighteen-month plan. (I say eighteen months because two years seems too long and one year seems 
too short, but it does not have to be any exact amount of time.) Typically, my eighteen -month plan 
sets goals on two fronts. First and most important, I set targets for what my team can accomplish. 



Employees who concentrate on results and impact are the most valuable — like Lori, who wisely 
focused on solving Facebook's recruiting problem before focusing on herself. This is not just thinking 
communally — the expected and often smart choice for a woman — but simply good business. 

Second, I try to set more personal goals for learning new skills in the next eighteen months. It's 
often painful, but I ask myself, "How can I improve?" If I am afraid to do something, it is usually 
because I am not good at it or perhaps am too scared even to try. After working at Google for more 
than four years, managing well over half of the company's revenues, I was embarrassed to admit that I 
had never negotiated a business deal. Not one. So I gathered my courage and came clean to my boss, 
Omid Kordestani, then head of sales and business development. Omid was willing to give me a chance 
to run a small deal team. In the very first deal I attempted, I almost botched the whole thing by making 
an offer to our potential partner before fully understanding their business. Fortunately, my team 
included a talented negotiator, Shailesh Rao, who stepped in to teach me the obvious: letting the other 
side make the first offer is often crucial to achieving favorable terms. 

Everyone has room to improve. Most people have a style in the workplace that overshoots in one 
direction — too aggressive or too passive, too talkative or too shy. In that first deal, I said too much. 
This was not a shock to anyone who knows me. Once I identified this weakness, I sought help to 
correct it. I turned to Maureen Taylor, a communications coach, who gave me an assignment. She told 
me that for one week I couldn't give my opinion unless asked. It was one of the longest weeks of my 
life. If I had bitten my tongue each time I started to express my opinion, I would have had no tongue 
left. 

Trying to overcorrect is a great way to find middle ground. In order for me to speak the right 
amount in a meeting, I have to feel as if I am saying very little. People who are shy will have to feel 
like they are saying way too much. I know a woman who naturally talks softly and forces herself to 
"shout" in business meetings just to speak at an average volume. Overriding our natural tendencies is 
very difficult. In all the years I've been trying, I can only think of a few times when someone said to 
me, "Sheryl, I wish you had spoken up more in that meeting." Omid did it once and I hugged him. 

Eric turned out to be absolutely right about Google, and I will always be grateful to him and to 
Larry Page and Sergey Brin for taking a chance on me. My eighteen-month plan at the company 
extended into six and a half years, and I learned more than I ever could have hoped while working 
with true visionaries. But eventually I felt that it was time to make a move on the jungle gym. 

In my personal life, I am not someone who embraces uncertainty. I like things to be in order. I file 
documents in colored folders (yes, still) and my enthusiasm for reorganizing my closet continually 
baffles Dave. But in my professional life, I have learned to accept uncertainty and even embrace it. 
Risk — and a great deal of luck — landed me at Google. That worked out so well that I decided to 
embrace risk again, which led me to Facebook. At the time, other companies were willing to hire me 
as CEO, but I joined Facebook as COO. At first, people questioned why I would take a "lower level" 
job working for a twenty-three-year-old. No one asks me that anymore. As I did when I joined 
Google, I prioritized potential for fast growth and the mission of the company above title. 

I have seen both men and women miss out on great opportunities by focusing too much on career 
levels. A friend of mine had been working as a lawyer for four years when she realized that instead of 



shooting for partner, she'd rather join a company in a sales or marketing role. One of her clients was 
willing to hire her in this new capacity but wanted her to start at the ground level. Since she could 
afford the temporary pay cut, I urged her to make the jump, but she decided against taking a job that 
put her "back four years." I understood how painful it was for her to lose hard-earned ground. Still, 
my argument was that if she was going to work for the next thirty years, what difference does going 
"back" four years really make? If the other path made her happier and offered her a chance to learn 
new skills, that meant she was actually moving forward. 

In many cases, women need to be more open to taking risks in their careers. 2 When I left Google to 
join Facebook, as a percentage of my team, fewer women tried to follow me. As they had been all 
along, the men were more interested in new and, as we say in tech, higher beta opportunities — where 
the risks were great but the potential rewards even greater. Many of the women on my team eventually 
showed interest in joining Facebook, but not until a few years later, when the company was more 
established. The cost of stability is often diminished opportunities for growth. 

Of course, there are times in life when being risk averse is a good thing; adolescent and adult males 
drown in much greater numbers than adolescent and adult females. But in business, being risk averse 
can result in stagnation. An analysis of senior corporate management appointments found that women 
are significantly more likely than men to continue to perform the same function even when they take 
on new duties. And when female managers move up, they are more likely to do so internally instead of 

4 

switching to a different company. At times, staying in the same functional area and in the same 
organization creates inertia and limits opportunity to expand. Seeking out diverse experiences is useful 
preparation for leadership. 

I understand the external pressures that force women to play it safe and stay put. Gender stereotypes 
can make it hard to move into positions traditionally held by men. Women are also more likely to 
accommodate a partner's career than the other way around. A job change that includes moving to 
another city may be a nonstarter for a woman in a relationship. The result is the unfortunate tautology 
that the tendency to stay put leads to staying put. 

Being risk averse in the workplace can also cause women to be more reluctant to take on 
challenging tasks. In my experience, more men look for stretch assignments and take on high- visibility 
projects, while more women hang back. Research suggests that this is particularly true for women in 
environments that emphasize individual performance or when women are working closely with men. 6 

One reason women avoid stretch assignments and new challenges is that they worry too much about 
whether they currently have the skills they need for a new role. This can become a self-fulfilling 
prophecy, since so many abilities are acquired on the job. An internal report at Hewlett-Packard 
revealed that women only apply for open jobs if they think they meet 100 percent of the criteria listed. 
Men apply if they think they meet 60 percent of the requirements. 7 This difference has a huge ripple 
effect. Women need to shift from thinking "I'm not ready to do that" to thinking "I want to do that — 
and I'll learn by doing it." 

My first day at work at the World Bank, Larry Summers asked me to perform some calculations. I 
was at a loss on how to proceed, so I turned to Lant Pritchett for help. "Just put it into Lotus 1-2-3," he 
advised. I told him that I didn't know how to do that. "Wow," he exclaimed. "I can't believe you've 



gotten this far, or even how you can understand basic economics, without knowing how to use Lotus." 
I went home convinced that I was going to get fired. The next day, Lant sat me down. My heart was 
pounding. But instead of firing me, he taught me how to use the program. That's a great boss. 

Women are also more reluctant to apply for promotions even when deserved, often believing that 
good job performance will naturally lead to rewards. 8 Carol Frohlinger and Deborah Kolb, founders of 
Negotiating Women, Inc., describe this as the "Tiara Syndrome," where women "expect that if they 
keep doing their job well someone will notice them and place a tiara on their head." In a perfect 
meritocracy, tiaras would be doled out to the deserving, but I have yet to see one floating around an 
office. Hard work and results should be recognized by others, but when they aren't, advocating for 
oneself becomes necessary. As discussed earlier, this must be done with great care. But it must be 
done. 

Taking risks, choosing growth, challenging ourselves, and asking for promotions (with smiles on 
our faces, of course) are all important elements of managing a career. One of my favorite quotes 
comes from author Alice Walker, who observed, "The most common way people give up their power 
is by thinking they don't have any." 

Do not wait for power to be offered. Like that tiara, it might never materialize. And anyway, who 
wears a tiara on a jungle gym? 



5 



Are You My Mentor? 



When i was a child, one of my favorite books was Are You My Mother?, the story of a baby bird that 
emerges from its shell to discover an empty nest. The hatchling heads off in search of its missing 
mother, asking a kitten, a hen, a dog, and a cow the burning question: "Are you my mother?" Each 
animal responds, "No." The hatchling grows more desperate, eventually shouting, "Are you my 
mother?" at a car, a boat, a plane, and even a steam shovel, which can only respond with a loud 
"Snort!" Stuck in the shovel's jaws, the hatchling appears doomed until, miraculously, the shovel lifts 
the bird back to its nest. The mother returns and the hatchling announces, "You are a bird, and you are 
my mother." 

This children's book poignantly mirrors the professional question "Are you my mentor?" If 
someone has to ask the question, the answer is probably no. When someone finds the right mentor, it 
is obvious. The question becomes a statement. Chasing or forcing that connection rarely works, and 
yet I see women attempt this all the time. When I give speeches or attend meetings, a startling number 
of women introduce themselves and, in the same breath, ask me to be their mentor. I cannot recall a 
single man asking me to do the same (although men have asked me to mentor their wives or 
girlfriends). 

The question is a total mood killer — the equivalent of turning to a pensive date and asking, "What 
are you thinking?" Every senior woman I have talked to about this is deluged with the same request. 
Their reaction is unanimous: "Oh, I never know what to say when people I don't know ask me to be 
their mentor." The interaction is flattering, but awkward. Even media mogul Oprah Winfrey, who has 
taught so much to an entire generation, admits that she feels uncomfortable when someone asks her to 
be a mentor. She once explained, "I mentor when I see something and say, 'I want to see that grow.' " 

In part, we've brought this on ourselves. For the past decade, talk of mentorship and sponsorship 
has been topic number one at any women's career seminar. It is the focus of blogs, newspaper articles, 
and research reports. Many of these young women are responding to the often repeated advice that if 
they want to scale the corporate ladder, they need to find mentors (people who will advise them) as 
well as sponsors (people who will use their influence to advocate for them).' 

The emphasis on finding a mentor became especially clear to me when I went back to speak at 
Harvard Business School in the spring of 2011. I was invited by Dean Nitin Nohria, who joined me 
onstage and conducted the interview. His first questions centered on Facebook and what it was like to 
work for Mark. I told him that I loved it, except on days when coworkers said things like, "Sheryl, can 
you look at this? We need to know what old people will think of this feature." We discussed the Arab 
Spring and a slew of other timely topics. Dean Nohria then asked me a question about women in the 
workforce. I'm not sure what possessed me, but I turned to look at the audience, paused, and answered 
with brutal honesty. "If current trends continue, fifteen years from today, about one-third of the 



women in this audience will be working full-time and almost all of you will be working for the guy 
you are sitting next to." 

Dead silence in the large auditorium. I continued, "I'm sorry if this sounds harsh or surprises 
anyone, but this is where we are. If you want the outcome to be different, you will have to do 
something about it." 

On that strained note, Dean Nohria ended the interview and turned to the audience for a Q&A. A 
number of men leapt to the microphone and posed thoughtful, big-picture questions like "What did 
you learn at Google that you are applying at Facebook?" and "How do you run a platform company 
and ensure stability for your developers?" Then two women rose to the microphone. The first asked, 
"Do you think it's okay to work for a company that competes with the company you worked for 
before business school?" The second asked, "How can I get a mentor?" My heart sank. 

The men were focusing on how to manage a business and the women were focusing on how to 
manage a career. The men wanted answers and the women wanted permission and help. I realized that 
searching for a mentor has become the professional equivalent of waiting for Prince Charming. We all 
grew up on the fairy tale "Sleeping Beauty," which instructs young women that if they just wait for 
their prince to arrive, they will be kissed and whisked away on a white horse to live happily ever after. 
Now young women are told that if they can just find the right mentor, they will be pushed up the 
ladder and whisked away to the corner office to live happily ever after. Once again, we are teaching 
women to be too dependent on others. 

To be clear, the issue is not whether mentorship is important. It is. Mentorship and sponsorship are 
crucial for career progression. Both men and women with sponsors are more likely to ask for stretch 
assignments and pay raises than their peers of the same gender without sponsors. Unfortunately for 
women, men often have an easier time acquiring and maintaining these relationships. One recent 
study shows that men are significantly more likely than women to be sponsored and that those with 

4 

sponsors are more satisfied with their rates of advancement. 

Because it is harder for young women to find mentors and sponsors, they are taking a more active 
role in seeking them out. And while normally I applaud assertive behavior, this energy is sometimes 
misdirected. No matter how crucial these connections are, they probably won't develop from asking a 
virtual stranger, "Will you be my mentor?" The strongest relationships spring out of a real and often 
earned connection felt by both sides. 

I've been lucky to have strong mentors and sponsors over the course of my career. The 
acknowledgments in this book include a long list of people who have been generous enough to guide 
and advise me. During my junior year of college, I took Larry Summers's public sector economics 
class. He offered to supervise my senior thesis — something very few Harvard professors volunteer to 
do for undergraduates. Larry has been a major part of my life ever since. I met Don Graham, chairman 
of the Washington Post Company, more than fifteen years ago when I was working in D.C., and he 
has helped me navigate some of my most challenging professional situations. If it hadn't been for 
Paley Center CEO Pat Mitchell's encouragement and support, I might never have spoken publicly 
about women in the workplace. These three, among so many others, have encouraged me, made 



introductions, and taught me by example. Their wisdom helped me avoid mistakes — and clean up the 
ones I wasn't smart enough to avoid. 

In turn, I have tried to mentor others, including friends of friends, and as I get older, children of 
friends. I get so much joy out of watching the career of Emily White, who started working with me 
right out of college and now runs mobile partnerships for Facebook. When I first met Bryan Schreier, 
he had never worked in a tech company or traveled abroad, but he displayed unusually strong 
leadership and analytical skills. I hired him to help build Google's global operations, and he exceeded 
every expectation. Years later, when he wanted to pursue a new career as an investor, I introduced him 
to his current partners at Sequoia Capital. He is now a highly successful early stage venture capitalist, 
and I can see the impact he has on the companies he advises. I am fortunate to have Emily and Bryan 
and so many other talented people in my life. 

Studies show that mentors select proteges based on performance and potential. 5 Intuitively, people 
invest in those who stand out for their talent or who can really benefit from help. Mentors continue to 
invest when mentees use their time well and are truly open to feedback. It may turn into a friendship, 
but the foundation is a professional relationship. Given this, I believe we have sent the wrong message 
to young women. We need to stop telling them, "Get a mentor and you will excel." Instead, we need 
to tell them, "Excel and you will get a mentor." 

Clara Shih is a superb example. I met Clara about five years ago at a conference and was 
immediately impressed by her ideas about social media. She went on to write a thoughtful book on the 
subject and founded Hearsay Social, a software company that helps businesses manage their social 
media presence. Every so often, Clara would contact me, always with an interesting point or a 
thoughtful question. She never asked to get together to "catch up." She never asked a question that she 
could have found the answer to on her own. When I was leaving the Starbucks board of directors in 
2012, I gave them a few names of social media experts who might join in my place and included 
Clara. She was only twenty-nine years old at the time, but she was invited to join the board. 

While asking a stranger to be a mentor rarely, if ever, works, approaching a stranger with a pointed, 
well-thought-out inquiry can yield results. Garrett Neiman stopped me after I gave a speech at 
Stanford to explain that he had founded CollegeSpring, a nonprofit that provides SAT tutoring and 
college counseling to low-income students. He wanted to meet with me and made it clear that he only 
needed a few minutes of my time to ask for introductions to some people who could help expand his 
organization. He had done his homework and knew that I care deeply about education. In our first 
meeting and in every interaction we've had since, Garrett has been respectful of my time. He is crisp, 
focused, and gracious. And he always follows up to let me know the results of our discussion. 

Capturing someone's attention or imagination in a minute can be done, but only when planned and 
tailored to that individual. Leading with a vague question such as, "What is Facebook's culture like?" 
shows more ignorance than interest in the company, since there are hundreds of articles that provide 
this answer. Preparation is especially important when looking for a job. When I left the Treasury 
Department, former chief of staff Josh Steiner gave me great advice about asking for advice. He told 
me to figure out what I wanted to do before I went to see the people who had the ability to hire me. 



That way I would not waste my one shot seeking general guidance, but would be able to discuss 
specific opportunities that they could offer. 

Mentorship is often a more reciprocal relationship than it may appear, especially in situations where 
people are already working at the same company. The mentee may receive more direct assistance, but 
the mentor receives benefits too, including useful information, greater commitment from colleagues, 
and a sense of fulfillment and pride. Sociologists and psychologists have long observed our deep 
desire to participate in reciprocal behavior. The fact that humans feel obligated to return favors has 
been documented in virtually all societies and underpins all kinds of social relationships. 6 The 
mentor/mentee relationship is no exception. When done right, everybody flourishes. 

Erin Burnett, now a well-known CNN journalist, credits Willow Bay, a veteran TV correspondent 
and editor, for mentoring her when she first started out. Willow was a brand-new anchor of Moneyline 
but did not have deep financial experience. Erin had worked at Goldman Sachs, which made her an 
ideal person for Willow to hire as an assistant. Erin impressed Willow with her ambition, work ethic, 
and talent. Meanwhile, Erin got to watch a savvy, established journalist up close and personal. Each 
benefited from the other's expertise. 

Justin Osofsky caught my attention at Facebook years ago when we were getting ready for our first 
senior-level meeting with the Walt Disney Company. Each of our teams, including sales, business 
development, and marketing, had submitted ideas for the partnership, but no one was coordinating, 
which left our presentation disjointed and unwieldy. Rather than just submitting his section, Justin 
took the initiative to pull the group together and integrate all the ideas. I have been "mentoring" him 
ever since, which in his case means that I often turn to Justin to solve problems. This helps the 
company and creates ongoing opportunities for him. 

Getting the attention of a senior person with a virtuoso performance works, but it's not the only way 
to get a mentor. I have seen lower-level employees nimbly grab a moment after a meeting or in the 
hall to ask advice from a respected and busy senior person. The exchange is casual and quick. After 
taking that advice, the would-be mentee follows up to offer thanks and then uses that opportunity to 
ask for more guidance. Without even realizing it, the senior person becomes involved and invested in 
the junior person's career. The word "mentor" never needs to be uttered. The relationship is more 
important than the label. 

The label itself is open to interpretation. For years, I kept an eye on an enormously talented young 
woman on my team at Google and advised her each time she had a major decision to make. I never 
used the word "mentor," but I invested a lot of time in her development. So I was surprised one day 
when she stated flatly that she had "never had a mentor or anyone really looking out" for her. I asked 
what a mentor meant to her. She explained that it would be someone she spoke to for at least an hour 
every week. I smiled, thinking, That 's not a mentor — that 's a therapist. 

Few mentors have time for excessive hand-holding. Most are dealing with their own high-stress 
jobs. A mentee who is positive and prepared can be a bright spot in a day. For this same reason, 
mentees should avoid complaining excessively to a mentor. Using a mentor's time to validate feelings 
may help psychologically, but it's better to focus on specific problems with real solutions. Most 
people in the position to mentor are quite adept at problem solving. Give them a problem to solve. 



Sometimes high-potential women have a difficult time asking for help because they don't want to 
appear stumped. Being unsure about how to proceed is the most natural feeling in the world. I feel that 
way all the time. Asking for input is not a sign of weakness but often the first step to finding a path 
forward. 

Mentoring and sponsoring relationships often form between individuals who have common interests 
or when the junior members remind the more senior members of themselves. 7 This means that men 
will often gravitate toward sponsoring younger men, with whom they connect more naturally. Since 
there are so many more men at the top of every industry, the proverbial old-boy network continues to 
flourish. And since there are already a reduced number of women in leadership roles, it is not possible 
for the junior women to get enough support unless senior men jump in too. We need to make male 
leaders aware of this shortage and encourage them to widen their circle. 

It's wonderful when senior men mentor women. It's even better when they champion and sponsor 
them. Any male leader who is serious about moving toward a more equal world can make this a 
priority and be part of the solution. It should be a badge of honor for men to sponsor women. And 
since we know that different perspectives improve performance, companies should foster and reward 
this behavior. 

Of course, there are some tricky issues to be solved here, including the perceived sexual context of 
male-female relationships. Once during my Treasury years, Larry Summers and I traveled together to 
South Africa, where we holed up in the living room of his hotel suite to work on his speech on fiscal 
policy for the next day. Jet-lagged and oblivious to the time change, we suddenly noticed it was 3:00 
a.m. We both knew it would look awful if anyone saw me leaving his hotel suite at that time. We 
discussed the options. Maybe he should check to see if anyone was in the hall? Then we realized we 
were stuck because there is no difference between trying not to be seen leaving someone's hotel room 
late at night and actually leaving someone's hotel room late at night. I strode into the (luckily) empty 
hall and made it to my room undetected. 

Junior women and senior men often avoid engaging in mentoring or sponsoring relationships out of 
fear of what others might think. A study published by the Center for Work-Life Policy and the 
Harvard Business Review reported that 64 percent of men at the level of vice president and above are 
hesitant to have a one-on-one meeting with a more junior woman. For their part, half of the junior 
women avoided close contact with senior men. 8 This evasiveness must end. Personal connections lead 
to assignments and promotions, so it needs to be okay for men and women to spend informal time 
together the same way men can. A senior man and junior man at a bar is seen as mentoring. A senior 
man and a junior woman at a bar can also be mentoring ... but it looks like dating. This interpretation 
holds women back and creates a double bind. If women try to cultivate a close relationship with a 
male sponsor, they risk being the target of workplace gossip. If women try to get to the top without a 
sponsor's help, their careers will often stall. We cannot assume that interactions between men and 
women have a sexual component. And everyone involved has to make sure to behave professionally 
so women — and men — feel safe in all settings. 

At Goldman Sachs in the late 1990s, management committee partner Bob Steel recognized this 
perception problem and came up with an admirable solution. The father of three daughters, Steel told a 



training class that he had a "breakfast or lunch only policy" with employees because he felt 
uncomfortable going out to dinner with female employees and wanted to make access equal. Sharon 
Meers worked at Goldman at the time and said Steel's decision caused a bit of a stir, but she thought 
his candor was heroic. Anything that evens out the opportunities for men and women is the right 
practice. Some will get there by adopting a no-dinner policy; others may adopt a dinner-with-anyone 
policy. In either case, we need practices that can be applied evenly. 

Many companies are starting to move from informal mentoring that relies on individual initiative to 
more formal programs. When taken seriously, these formal mentorship/sponsorship programs can be 
remarkably successful. Structured programs also take the pressure off junior women from having to 
ask the difficult "Are you my mentor?" question. One study showed that women who found mentors 
through formal programs were 50 percent more likely to be promoted than women who found mentors 

9 

on their own. The most effective formal programs help educate men about the need to mentor women 
and establish guidelines for appropriate behavior. These programs can be a great way to help 
normalize the senior man/junior woman model. 

Official mentorship programs are not sufficient by themselves and work best when combined with 
other kinds of development and training. Deloitte's Leading to WIN Women's Initiative is a good 
example. Deloitte had already established a program to support female employees, who still remained 
underrepresented at the highest levels of the company. This prompted Chet Wood, CEO of Deloitte 
Tax, to ask, "Where are all the women?" In response, Deloitte launched a leadership development 
program in 2008. The program targeted senior women in the tax division who were close to 
promotion. The women were assigned sponsors, received executive coaching, shadowed members of 
the executive committee, and took on global assignments. Of the twenty-one members of the inaugural 
group, eighteen have since been promoted. 

As helpful as these formal programs can be, they are not always offered, and in some situations, 
senior people are not available to give guidance. The good news is that guidance can come from all 
levels. When I first joined Facebook, one of my biggest challenges was setting up the necessary 
business processes without harming the freewheeling culture. The company operated by moving 
quickly and tolerating mistakes, and lots of people were nervous that I would not just ruin the party, 
but squash innovation. Naomi Gleit had joined Facebook right out of college several years earlier. As 
one of Facebook's earliest employees, she had a deep understanding of how the company worked. 
Naomi and I became close. I bet most people, including Naomi herself, probably assumed that I was 
mentoring her. But the truth is she mentored me. She helped me implement the changes that needed to 
be made and jumped in to stop me from getting things wrong. Naomi always told me the truth, even if 
she thought it would be hard for me to hear. She still does this for me today. 

Peers can also mentor and sponsor one another. There is a saying that "all advice is 
autobiographical." Friends at the same stage of their careers may actually provide more current and 
useful counsel. Several of my older mentors advised me against taking a job at Google in 2001. Yet 
almost all my peers understood the potential of Silicon Valley. Peers are also in the trenches and may 
understand problems that superiors do not, especially when those problems are generated by superiors 
in the first place. 



As an associate at McKinsey & Company, my first assignment was on a team that consisted of a 
male senior engagement manager (SEM) and two other male associates, Abe Wu and Derek Holley. 
When the SEM wanted to talk to Abe or Derek, he would walk over to their desks. When he wanted to 
talk to me, he would sit at his desk and shout, "Sandberg, get over here!" with the tone one might use 
to call a child or, even worse, a dog. It made me cringe every time. I never said anything, but one day 
Abe and Derek started calling each other "Sandberg" in that same loud voice. The self-absorbed SEM 
never seemed to notice. They kept it up. When having too many Sandbergs got confusing, they 
decided we needed to differentiate. Abe started calling himself "Asian Sandberg," Derek dubbed 
himself "good-looking Sandberg," and I became "Sandberg Sandberg." My colleagues turned an 
awful situation into one where I felt protected. They stood up for me and made me laugh. They were 
the best mentors I could have had. 

Since when it rains, it pours, on that same project, the senior client leader wanted to fix me up with 
his son. He declared this intention in front of his team over and over. I knew he meant it as a 
compliment, but it undermined my professional authority. How could I get my clients to take me 
seriously if their boss was constantly reminding everyone that I was his son's age — oh, and that I 
should date him? One day, I gathered my courage and asked to speak to him in private. I told him 
(nicely) that I did not think it was appropriate for him to keep bringing up his son. He laughed it off 
and kept doing it. 

Having tried to deal with the situation myself, I went to my manager — the same "Sandberg"- 
shouting SEM. He listened to my complaint and then told me that I should think about what I was 
"doing to send these signals." Yup, it was my fault. I told the two other Sandbergs, who were 
outraged. They encouraged me to go over the SEM's head and talk to the senior partner, Robert 
Taylor. Robert understood my discomfort immediately. He explained that sometimes those of us who 
are different (he is African American) need to remind people to treat us appropriately. He said he was 
glad I told the client no on my own and that the client should have listened. He then talked to the client 
and explained that his behavior had to stop. He also spoke with my SEM about his insensitive 
response. I could not have been more grateful for Robert's protection. I knew exactly how that baby 
bird felt when he finally found his mother. 



6 



Seek and Speak Your Truth 

My friend Betsy Cohen was pregnant with her second child when her toddler, Sam, became curious 
about where the baby was in her body. "Mommy," he asked, "are the baby's arms in your arms?" "No, 
the baby is in my tummy," she replied. "Are the baby's legs in your legs?" "No, the whole baby is in 
my tummy." "Really, the whole baby is in your tummy? Are you sure?" "Yes, the whole baby is in my 
tummy." "Then, Mommy, what's growing in your butt?" 

This kind of honesty is common from children and virtually unheard of from adults. As kids grow 
up, we teach them to be polite, watch what they say, not hurt others' feelings. This is not a bad thing. 
As a former pregnant "whale," I'm glad that most people keep some observations to themselves. But 
as we learn to speak appropriately, we lose something in authenticity. 

Authentic communication is not always easy, but it is the basis for successful relationships at home 
and real effectiveness at work. Yet people constantly back away from honesty to protect themselves 
and others. This reticence causes and perpetuates all kinds of problems: uncomfortable issues that 
never get addressed, resentment that builds, unfit managers who get promoted rather than fired, and on 
and on. Often these situations don't improve because no one tells anyone what is really happening. We 
are so rarely brave enough to tell the truth. 

Being honest in the workplace is especially difficult. All organizations have some form of 
hierarchy, which means that someone's performance is assessed by someone else's perception. This 
makes people even less likely to tell the truth. Every organization faces this challenge, no matter how 
flat it tries to be. At Facebook, we work hard to be nonhierarchical. Everyone sits at open desks in big 
open spaces — no offices, cubes, or partitions for any of us. We hold a company-wide Q&A every 
Friday where anyone can ask a question or make a comment. When people disagree with decisions, 
they post to the company-wide Facebook group. Still, I would be an idiot, or not telling myself the 
truth, if I thought that my coworkers always felt free to criticize me, Mark, or even their peers. 

When psychologists study power dynamics, they find that people in low-power positions are more 
hesitant to share their views and often hedge their statements when they do.' This helps explain why 
for many women, speaking honestly in a professional environment carries an additional set of fears: 
Fear of not being considered a team player. Fear of seeming negative or nagging. Fear that 
constructive criticism will come across as just plain old criticism. Fear that by speaking up, we will 
call attention to ourselves, which might open us up to attack (a fear brought to us by that same voice in 
the back of our heads that urges us not to sit at the table). 

Communication works best when we combine appropriateness with authenticity, finding that sweet 
spot where opinions are not brutally honest but delicately honest. Speaking truthfully without hurting 
feelings comes naturally to some and is an acquired skill for others. I definitely needed help in this 
area. Fortunately, I found it. 



When Dave was at Yahoo, he attended a management training program taught by Fred Kofman, a 
former MIT professor and author of Conscious Business. Dave hates training of any kind, and the 
human resources team at Yahoo had to force him to attend the two-day session. When he came home 
after the first day, he surprised me by describing the training as "not too bad." By the end of the 
second day, he started quoting Fred and making observations about our communication. I was in 
shock; this guy must be good. So I called Fred, introduced myself, and said, "I don't know what you 
do, but I want you to do it for my team at Google." 

Fred showed up at Google, and his teachings changed my career and my life. He is one of the most 
extraordinary thinkers on leadership and management I have ever encountered. Many of the concepts 
discussed in this chapter originated with him and reflect his belief that great leadership is "conscious" 
leadership. 

I learned from Fred that effective communication starts with the understanding that there is my 
point of view (my truth) and someone else's point of view (his truth). Rarely is there one absolute 
truth, so people who believe that they speak the truth are very silencing of others. When we recognize 
that we can see things only from our own perspective, we can share our views in a nonthreatening 
way. Statements of opinion are always more constructive in the first person "I" form. Compare these 
two statements: "You never take my suggestions seriously" and "I feel frustrated that you have not 
responded to my last four e-mails, which leads me to believe that my suggestions are not that 
important to you. Is that so?" The former can elicit a quick and defensive "That's not true!" The latter 
is much harder to deny. One triggers a disagreement; the other sparks a discussion. I wish I could 
always maintain this perspective in all my communications. I don't — but I continue to try. 

Truth is also better served by using simple language. Office-speak often contains nuances and 
parentheticals that can bury not just the lead but the entire point. Comedies like Office Space ring true 
for a reason. People fear insulting others, especially the boss, so they hedge. Rather than stating, "I 
disagree with our expansion strategy," they say, "While I think there are many good reasons why we 
are opening this new line of business and I feel confident that the management team has done a 
thorough ROI analysis, I am not sure we have completely thought through all of the downstream 
effects of taking this step forward at this time." Huh? With all of these caveats, it's hard to decipher 
what the speaker actually thinks. 

When communicating hard truths, less is often more. A few years ago, Mark Zuckerberg decided to 
learn Chinese. To practice, he spent time with a group of Facebook employees who were native 
speakers. One might think that Mark's limited language skills would have kept these conversations 
from being substantively useful. Instead, they gave him greater insight into what was going on in the 
company. For example, one of the women was trying to tell Mark something about her manager. Mark 
didn't understand so he said, "Simpler, please." Then she spoke again, but he still didn't understand, 
so he had to ask her to simplify further. This happened a few more times. Eventually, she got 
frustrated and just blurted out, "My manager is bad!" She was still speaking Chinese, but simply 
enough that Mark understood. If more people were this clear, the performance of many organizations 
would improve dramatically. 



The ability to listen is as important as the ability to speak. From the time my siblings and I were 
very young, whenever we had arguments, our mother taught us — or more like forced us — to mirror 
each other, which means restating the other person's point before responding to it. For example, one 
day my sister and I were fighting over a lollipop. "Sheryl ate the last lollipop!" Michelle screamed. 
"But she had a lollipop yesterday and I didn't!" I screamed back, making an excellent point. My 
mother sat us down facing each other. I was not allowed to explain how gravely inequitable the 
lollipop allocation was until I acknowledged my sister's feelings. "Michelle, I understand that you are 
upset because I ate the last lollipop and you wanted it." As painful as this was at the time, reflecting 
someone's viewpoint clarifies the disagreement and becomes a starting point for resolution. We all 
want to be heard, and when we focus on showing others that we are listening, we actually become 
better listeners. I now do this with my children. And while they probably dislike the process as much 
as I did when I was their age, I love hearing my son explain to my daughter, "I'm sorry you're upset 
because you lost at Monopoly, but I'm older than you so I should win." Not bad for a seven-year-old. 
(Although Fred would caution my son to take out the "but" and everything after, since it tends to deny 
the preceding statement. Imagine someone saying, "I really like you, but ...") 

Being aware of a problem is the first step to correcting it. It is nearly impossible to know how our 
actions are perceived by others. We can try to guess what they're thinking, but asking directly is far 
more effective. With real knowledge, we can adjust our actions and avoid getting tripped up. Still, 
people rarely seek enough input. A few years ago, Tom Brokaw interviewed me for a piece on 
Facebook. Tom is a magnificent interviewer, and I felt that I stumbled through some of my answers. 
After we wrapped, I asked him how I could have done better. He seemed surprised by my question, so 
I asked him again. He then told me that in his entire career, I was only the second person to ask him 
for feedback. 

The strategy of soliciting input broadly was first demonstrated for me by Robert Rubin, secretary of 
the Treasury when I joined the department in 1996. During my first week there, I was invited to a 
meeting on restructuring the IRS. About ten senior staffers were sitting at the table when we entered. 
Since I knew nothing about the topic, I took a seat in the back corner of the room (yup, not even close 
to the table). Toward the end of the meeting, Secretary Rubin suddenly turned and asked, "Sheryl, 
what do you think?" I was stunned silent — my mouth opened but nothing came out. When he saw how 
shocked I was, Secretary Rubin explained why he had put me on the spot: "Because you're new and 
not fully up to speed on how we do things, I thought you might see something we were missing." 
Apparently not in my case. But Secretary Rubin sent a powerful message to all of us about the value 
of soliciting ideas from every corner (literally). 

Secretary Rubin was also aware of the dangers of blindly following leaders, or in his case, being 
blindly followed. Before becoming Treasury secretary, Rubin served as co-chairman of the board of 
Goldman Sachs. At the end of his first week as co-chairman, he noticed that Goldman was heavily 
invested in gold. He asked someone why the firm had taken such a big position. The startled employee 
answered, "That was you, sir." "Me?" Rubin replied. Apparently, the day before he had been taking 
his initial tour of the trading floor and commented, "Gold looks interesting." This got repeated as 
"Rubin likes gold," and someone spent millions of dollars to please the new boss. 



More than a decade later, I experienced my own "Rubin likes gold" moment. When I joined 
Facebook, I faced a dilemma: I needed to bolster the business side of the company while respecting its 
unconventional culture. Most corporations love PowerPoint presentations, so I encouraged people not 
to prepare them for meetings with me, but instead to come with a simple list of topics. I repeated this 
frequently, but every meeting seemed to include a detailed PowerPoint presentation anyway. After 
more than two years of frustration, I announced that although I hated making rules, I was making one: 
no more PowerPoint in my meetings. 

A few weeks later, as I was getting ready to speak to our global sales team, Kirsten Nevill-Manning, 
a skilled human resources leader at Facebook, came to find me. Kirsten thought I should know that 
everyone in Europe was upset with me. Really? I angered an entire continent? She explained that 
client meetings were very difficult without PowerPoint and asked why I would make such a stupid 
rule. I explained that I had intended the rule to apply only to presentations to me. But just as the 
Goldman team heard "Gold = good," the Facebook team heard "PowerPoint = bad." I got onstage in 
front of our entire sales team and apologized for the misunderstanding. I also let them know that if 
they hear a bad idea, even one they believe is coming from me or Mark, they should either fight it or 
ignore it. 

As hard as it is to have an honest dialogue about business decisions, it is even harder to give 
individuals honest feedback. This is true for entry-level employees, senior leaders, and everyone in 
between. One thing that helps is to remember that feedback, like truth, is not absolute. Feedback is an 
opinion, grounded in observations and experiences, which allows us to know what impression we 
make on others. The information is revealing and potentially uncomfortable, which is why all of us 
would rather offer feedback to those who welcome it. If I make an observation or recommendation 
and someone reacts badly — or even just visibly tenses up — I quickly learn to save my comments for 
things that really matter. This is why I so admire Molly Graham's approach. Molly joined Facebook in 
2008 and held a number of jobs throughout the company in communications, human resources, and 
mobile products. She performed extraordinarily well in all of these very different roles, not just 
because she is uniquely talented but because she is always learning. One day, she and I hosted a tricky 
client meeting. She navigated the discussion effectively, and after the clients left, I praised her effort. 
She paused and said, "Thanks, but you must have ideas for me on what more I could have done." 

"How can I do better?" "What am I doing that I don't know?" "What am I not doing that I don't 
see?" These questions can lead to many benefits. And believe me, the truth hurts. Even when I have 
solicited feedback, any judgment can feel harsh. But the upside of painful knowledge is so much 
greater than the downside of blissful ignorance. 

Requesting advice can also help build relationships. At Facebook, I knew that the most important 
determinant of my success would be my relationship with Mark. When I joined, I asked Mark for a 
commitment that he would give me feedback every week so that anything that bothered him would be 
aired and discussed quickly. Mark not only said yes but immediately added that he wanted it to be 
reciprocal. For the first few years, we stuck to this routine and voiced concerns big and small every 
Friday afternoon. As the years went by, sharing honest reactions became part of our ongoing 
relationship. Now we do so in real time rather than waiting for the end of the week. I wouldn't suggest 



that all relationships need this much feedback — there is such a thing as asking for too much — but for 
us, it has been critically important. 

I have also learned the hard way that being open to hearing the truth means taking responsibility for 
mistakes. In my first week as chief of staff at Treasury, I had the chance to work directly with the 
heads of the department bureaus. There is a right and a wrong way to start a working relationship. I 
chose the wrong way. My first call was to Ray Kelly, who was then commissioner of the U.S. 
Customs Service and now serves as New York City's police commissioner. Instead of reaching out to 
offer assistance, I called Commissioner Kelly with a request from the secretary. The impression I 
made was that my job was to demand and his job was to listen. It was a mistake. Ray's response was 
quick and clear. "[Expletive], Sheryl," he explained. "Just because I'm not in Larry Summers's 
[expletive] thirty-year-old brain trust doesn't mean that I don't know what I'm doing! If Secretary 
Summers wants something from me, tell him to [expletive] call me himself!" Then he hung up the 
phone. I thought, This is not going well. My first week on the job and I'd angered a man who knows a 
thing or two about firearms. 

After I stopped shaking, I realized that Commissioner Kelly had done me a huge favor. His 
"feedback" was extremely helpful and delivered in a way that I would never forget. I reassessed my 
outreach strategy. With the other bureau chiefs, I initiated conversation by asking what I could do to 
help them achieve their goals. It's no surprise that they reacted more positively and with far fewer 
expletives. And after I employed my "What have I done for you lately?" approach, they were far more 
eager to return the favor. 

As often as I try to persuade people to share their honest views, it is still a challenge to elicit them. 
When I started building my team at Google, I interviewed every candidate before we made an offer. 
Even when the team had grown to about one hundred people, I still spoke with each finalist. One day 
at a meeting of my direct reports, I offered to stop interviewing, fully expecting everyone to insist that 
my input was an essential part of the process. Instead, they applauded. They all jumped in to explain — 
in unison — that my insistence on speaking personally to every candidate had become a huge 
bottleneck. I had no idea that I had been holding the team back and was upset that no one had told me. 
I spent a few hours quietly fuming, which, given that I have no poker face, was probably obvious to 
everyone. Then I realized that if my colleagues had kept this to themselves, I was clearly not 
communicating that I was open to their input. Miscommunication is always a two-way street. If I 
wanted more suggestions, I would have to take responsibility for making that clear. So I went back to 
my team and agreed that I would not interview anymore. And more important, I told them that I 
wanted their input early and often. 

Another way I try to foster authentic communication is to speak openly about my own weaknesses. 
To highlight just one, I have a tendency to get impatient about unresolved situations. My reaction is to 
push for people to resolve them quickly, in some cases before they realistically can. David Fischer and 
I have worked closely together for fifteen years at Treasury, Google, and Facebook. He jokes that he 
can tell from my tone of voice whether he should bother to complete a task or if I'm about to just do it 
myself. I acknowledge my impatience openly and ask my colleagues to let me know when I need to 
chill out. By mentioning this myself, I give others permission to bring up my impatience — and joke 
about it too. My colleagues will say to me, "Sheryl, you asked us to tell you when you get nervous and 



push the teams too hard. I think you're doing that now." But if I never said anything, would anyone at 
Facebook walk up to me and announce, "Hey, Sheryl, calm down! You're driving everyone nuts!" 
Somehow I doubt it. They would think it. They might even say it to one another. But they wouldn't 
say it to me. 

When people are open and honest, thanking them publicly encourages them to continue while 
sending a powerful signal to others. At a meeting with about sixty Facebook engineers, I mentioned 
that I was interested in opening more Facebook offices around the world, especially in one particular 
region. Since the group included members of the security team, I asked what they were most worried 
about. Without being called on, Chad Greene blurted out, "Opening a Facebook office in that region." 
He explained why it wouldn't work and why I was dead wrong in front of the entire group. I loved it. 
We had never met before, and I will never forget that strong introduction. I ended the meeting by 
thanking Chad for his candor and then posted the story on Facebook to encourage the rest of the 
company to follow his example. Mark feels the same way. At a summer barbecue four years ago, an 
intern told Mark that he should work on his public speaking skills. Mark thanked him in front of 
everyone and then encouraged us to extend him a full-time job offer. 

Humor can be an amazing tool for delivering an honest message in a good-natured way. A recent 
study even found that "sense of humor" was the phrase most frequently used to describe the most 

2 

effective leaders." I have seen humor get results so many times. After working in the Obama White 
House, Marne Levine joined Facebook to run global public policy. Marne is polished, professional, 
and highly competent. During her first week at her job, she needed a colleague from another team to 
finish drafting a few paragraphs for an upcoming congressional testimony. The colleague was 
dragging his heels. He kept coming to Marne to ask questions, which she would duly answer, then she 
would wait, but still no paragraphs. When he came to her again with yet another question, she turned 
to him with a huge smile and said, "I am going to answer all of your questions. I really am. But right 
now, the only thing that is going to keep me from falling down on the floor and having a heart attack 
right in front of you is for you to get out of your chair, go back to your desk, and write the paragraphs 
we need for Congress." It worked beautifully. 

A colleague at Google, Adam Freed, and I were frustrated by someone at work who was making 
our jobs very difficult. I met with her several times and earnestly explained that I felt that she was 
second-guessing our every move and preventing progress. During each heartfelt discussion, she would 
listen and nod and thank me for raising the matter. I would leave feeling better. Then the situation 
would get worse. Adam took a totally different approach. He invited her to lunch. They met at the 
Google cafe, chatted a bit, and then he looked at her and jokingly asked, "Why do you hate me?" 
Where I had failed repeatedly, Adam broke through. She asked why he would make that joke, which 
gave him a chance to explain in a way she was able to hear. 

Unfortunately, our sense of humor sometimes fails us when we need it most. When I get emotional, 
it's very hard for me to treat a problem lightly. I had been at Google about three months when an 
uncomfortable situation erupted. I had started at the company reporting to Eric Schmidt but was 
transitioning to work for Omid Kordestani. During that process, Omid and I had a major 
misunderstanding. I went to discuss it with him, intending to explain calmly why I was upset, but as 
soon as I started talking, I burst into tears. I was horrified to be crying in front of my new boss whom I 



barely knew — which just made more tears flow. But I got lucky. Omid was patient and reassuring, 
insisting, "Everyone gets upset at work. It's okay." 

Most women believe — and research suggests — that it is not a good idea to cry at work. 3 It is never 
something that I plan to do and is hardly recommended in The Seven Habits of Highly Effective 
People, but on those rare occasions when I have felt really frustrated, or worse, betrayed, tears have 
filled my eyes. Even as I have gotten older and more experienced, it still happens every so often. 

I had been working at Facebook for almost a year when I learned that someone had said something 
about me that was not just false, but cruel. I started telling Mark about it and, despite my best efforts, 
started to cry. He assured me that the accusation was so untrue that no one could possibly believe it. 
And then he asked, "Do you want a hug?" I did. It was a breakthrough moment for us. I felt closer to 
him than ever before. I then recounted this story publicly, figuring that it might make it easier for 
others who have faced unwanted tears. The press reported the incident as "Sheryl Sandberg cried on 
Mark Zuckerberg's shoulder," which is not exactly what happened. What happened was that I 
expressed my feelings and Mark responded with compassion. 

Sharing emotions builds deeper relationships. Motivation comes from working on things we care 
about. It also comes from working with people we care about. To really care about others, we have to 
understand them — what they like and dislike, what they feel as well as think. Emotion drives both men 
and women and influences every decision we make. Recognizing the role emotions play and being 
willing to discuss them makes us better managers, partners, and peers. 

I did not always understand this. I used to think that being professional meant being organized and 
focused and keeping my personal life separate. Early on at Google, Omid and I would have a one-on- 
one meeting each week. I would enter his office with a typed agenda and get right to it. I thought I was 
being so efficient, but my colleague Tim Armstrong (who later became CEO of AOL) kindly pulled 
me aside one day to give me some advice. He told me that I should take a moment to connect with 
Omid before diving in. Since Omid and I were the only people in those meetings, it was clear who had 
mentioned this to Tim. I made the adjustment and started asking Omid how he was before leaping into 
my to-do list. It was a good lesson. An all-business approach is not always good business. 

It has been an evolution, but I am now a true believer in bringing our whole selves to work. I no 
longer think people have a professional self for Mondays through Fridays and a real self for the rest of 
the time. That type of separation probably never existed, and in today's era of individual expression, 
where people constantly update their Facebook status and tweet their every move, it makes even less 
sense. Instead of putting on some kind of fake "all-work persona," I think we benefit from expressing 
our truth, talking about personal situations, and acknowledging that professional decisions are often 
emotionally driven. I should have learned this lesson years earlier. When I was graduating from 
business school in 1995, Larry Summers offered me a job at Treasury. I wanted the job desperately, 
but there was an issue: I did not want to move back to D.C., where my soon-to-be ex-husband lived. 
One of the hardest calls I've ever had to make was to tell Larry that I could not accept the job. Larry 
pressed me on why, and I thought about telling him that I really wanted to try consulting in Los 
Angeles. Instead, I opened up. I explained that I was getting divorced and wanted to move far away 
from D.C., which held too many painful memories. Larry argued that it was a big city, but it didn't 



seem big enough for me. A year later, when enough time had passed and I felt ready to return to D.C., 
I called Larry and asked if the opportunity was still available. It was one of the easiest calls I have 
ever made, in part because I had been honest the year before. If I had told Larry that I was passing on 
the job for professional reasons, I would have appeared impulsive when I reversed that decision. Since 
the real reason was personal, sharing it honestly was the best thing to do. 

People often pretend that professional decisions are not affected by their personal lives. They are 
afraid to talk about their home situations at work as if one should never interfere with the other, when 
of course they can and do. I know many women who won't discuss their children at work out of fear 
that their priorities will be questioned. I hope this won't always be the case. 

My sister-in-law, Amy Schefler, had a college roommate, Abby Hemani, who is a partner in one of 
Boston's most prestigious law firms. The line between personal and professional was erased for Abby 
when her seven-month-old daughter was diagnosed with Dravet syndrome, a rare and severe form of 
epilepsy. Abby explained that her mostly male partners got used to seeing her cry at the office and 
their response was heartwarming. "It was as if they envisioned me as one of their own daughters and 
wanted to comfort me," she said. Abby insists that her public emotion improved her work situation 
both by turning her colleagues into a source of support and by leading to more flexible hours. "I know 
several men at my firm who have had similar experiences with sick children, but they didn't feel they 
could be as forthcoming as I was," she said. "So, in the end, I think my female manner of relating 
served me well." 

Not every workplace and every colleague will be as generous and caring. But I do think we are 
moving toward at least blurring the line between personal and professional. Increasingly, prominent 
thinkers in the field of leadership studies like Marcus Buckingham are challenging traditional notions 
of leadership. Their research suggests that presenting leadership as a list of carefully defined qualities 
(like strategic, analytical, and performance-oriented) no longer holds. Instead, true leadership stems 

4 

from individuality that is honestly and sometimes imperfectly expressed. They believe leaders should 
strive for authenticity over perfection. This shift is good news for women, who often feel obliged to 
suppress their emotions in the workplace in an attempt to come across as more stereotypically male. 
And it's also good news for men, who may be doing the exact same thing. 

I had the opportunity to see the power of authentic communication in a leader firsthand when I 
served on the board of Starbucks. Howard Schultz was CEO of Starbucks from 1987 through 2000, 
and during his tenure, the company grew from just a few stores into a global retail powerhouse. 
Howard stepped down as CEO in 2000, and over the next eight years Starbucks' performance faltered. 
When Howard returned as CEO in 2008, he held a meeting with all of the company's global managers 
in New Orleans. He openly admitted that the company was in serious trouble. Then he allowed his 
emotions to show, tearing up as he confessed that he felt that he had let down his employees and their 
families. The entire company rose to the challenge. Starbucks turned around and delivered its highest 
revenue and earnings a few years later. 

Maybe someday shedding tears in the workplace will no longer be viewed as embarrassing or weak, 
but as a simple display of authentic emotion. And maybe the compassion and sensitivity that have 



historically held some women back will make them more natural leaders in the future. In the 
meantime, we can all hasten this change by committing ourselves to both seek — and speak — our truth. 



7 



Don't Leave Before You Leave 



A few years ago, a young woman at Facebook came to my desk and asked if she could speak to me 
privately. We headed into a conference room, where she began firing off questions about how I 
balance work and family. As the questions came faster and faster, I started to wonder about her 
urgency. I interrupted to ask if she had a child. She said no, but she liked to plan ahead. I inquired if 
she and her partner were considering having a child. She replied that she did not have a husband, then 
added with a little laugh, "Actually, I don't even have a boyfriend." 

It seemed to me that she was jumping the gun — big time — but I understood why. From an early age, 
girls get the message that they will have to choose between succeeding at work and being a good 
mother. By the time they are in college, women are already thinking about the trade-offs they will 
make between professional and personal goals.' When asked to choose between marriage and career, 

2 

female college students are twice as likely to choose marriage as their male classmates." And this 
concern can start even younger. Peggy Orenstein, the author of Cinderella Ate My Daughter, related 
the story of a five-year-old girl who came home distraught from her after-school program and told her 
mother that both she and the boy she had a crush on wanted to be astronauts. When her mother asked 
why that was a problem, the little girl replied, "When we go into space together, who will watch our 
kids?" At five, she thought the most challenging aspect of space travel would be dependable child 
care. 

As I've mentioned, I'm a big believer in thoughtful preparation. Everywhere I go, I carry a little 
notebook with my to-do list — an actual notebook that I write in with an actual pen. (In the tech world, 
this is like carrying a stone tablet and chisel.) But when it comes to integrating career and family, 
planning too far in advance can close doors rather than open them. I have seen this happen over and 
over. Women rarely make one big decision to leave the workforce. Instead, they make a lot of small 
decisions along the way, making accommodations and sacrifices that they believe will be required to 
have a family. Of all the ways women hold themselves back, perhaps the most pervasive is that they 
leave before they leave. 

The classic scenario unfolds like this. An ambitious and successful woman heads down a 
challenging career path with the thought of having children in the back of her mind. At some point, 
this thought moves to the front of her mind, typically once she finds a partner. The woman considers 



how hard she is working and reasons that to make room for a child she will have to scale back. A law 
associate might decide not to shoot for partner because someday she hopes to have a family. A teacher 
might pass on leading curriculum development for her school. A sales representative might take a 
smaller territory or not apply for a management role. Often without even realizing it, the woman stops 
reaching for new opportunities. If any are presented to her, she is likely to decline or offer the kind of 
hesitant "yes" that gets the project assigned to someone else. The problem is that even if she were to 
get pregnant immediately, she still has nine months before she has to care for an actual child. And 
since women usually start this mental preparation well before trying to conceive, several years often 
pass between the thought and conception, let alone birth. In the case of my Facebook questioner, it 
might even be a decade. 

By the time the baby arrives, the woman is likely to be in a drastically different place in her career 
than she would have been had she not leaned back. Before, she was a top performer, on par with her 
peers in responsibility, opportunity, and pay. By not finding ways to stretch herself in the years 
leading up to motherhood, she has fallen behind. When she returns to the workplace after her child is 
born, she is likely to feel less fulfilled, underutilized, or unappreciated. She may wonder why she is 
working for someone (usually a man) who has less experience than she does. Or she may wonder why 
she does not have the exciting new project or the corner office. At this point, she probably scales her 
ambitions back even further since she no longer believes that she can get to the top. And if she has the 
financial resources to leave her job, she is more likely to do so. 

The more satisfied a person is with her position, the less likely she is to leave. 3 So the irony — and, 
to me, the tragedy — is that women wind up leaving the workforce precisely because of things they did 
to stay in the workforce. With the best of intentions, they end up in a job that is less fulfilling and less 
engaging. When they finally have a child, the choice — for those who have one — is between becoming 
a stay-at-home mother or returning to a less-than-appealing professional situation. 

Joanna Strober, co-author of Getting to 50/50, credits a compelling job for her decision to return to 
the workforce after becoming a mother. "When I first started working, there were lots of scary stories 
about female executives who ignored their kids or weren't home enough," she told me. "Everyone in 
our office talked about one executive whose daughter supposedly told her that when she grew up she 
wanted to be a client because they got all the attention. I found these stories so depressing that I gave 
up before even really starting down the partner track. However, when five years later I was in a job I 
really loved, I found myself wanting to return to work after a few weeks of maternity leave. I realized 
those executives weren't scary at all. Like me, they loved their kids a lot. And, like me, they also 
loved their jobs." 

There are many powerful reasons to exit the workforce. Being a stay-at-home parent is a wonderful, 
and often necessary, choice for many people. Not every parent needs, wants, or should be expected to 
work outside the home. In addition, we do not control all of the factors that influence us, including the 
health of our children. Plus, many people welcome the opportunity to get out of the rat race. No one 
should pass judgment on these highly personal decisions. I fully support any man or woman who 
dedicates his or her life to raising the next generation. It is important and demanding and joyful work. 



What I am arguing is that the time to scale back is when a break is needed or when a child arrives — 
not before, and certainly not years in advance. The months and years leading up to having children are 
not the time to lean back, but the critical time to lean in. 

Several years ago, I approached an employee at Facebook to manage an important new project. She 
seemed flattered at first but then became noticeably hesitant. She told me that she wasn't sure she 
should take on more responsibility. Obviously, something else was going on, so I quietly asked, "Are 
you worried about taking this on because you're considering having a child sometime soon?" A few 
years earlier, I would have been afraid to ask this question. Managers are not supposed to factor 
childbearing plans into account in hiring or management decisions. Raising this topic in the workplace 
would give most employment lawyers a heart attack. But after watching so many talented women pass 
on opportunities for unspoken reasons, I started addressing this issue directly. I always give people the 
option of not answering, but so far, every woman I have asked has appeared grateful for a chance to 
discuss the subject. I also make it clear that I am only asking for one reason: to make sure they aren't 
limiting their options unnecessarily. 

In 2009, we were recruiting Priti Choksi to join Facebook's business development team. After we 
extended an offer, she came in to ask some follow-up questions about the role. She did not mention 
lifestyle or hours, but she was the typical age when women have children. So as we were wrapping up, 
I went for it. "If you think you might not take this job because you want to have a child soon, I am 
happy to talk about this." I figured if she didn't want to discuss it, she would just keep heading for the 
door. Instead, she turned around, sat back down, and said, "Let's talk." I explained that although it 
was counterintuitive, right before having a child can actually be a great time to take a new job. If she 
found her new role challenging and rewarding, she'd be more excited to return to it after giving birth. 
If she stayed put, she might decide that her job was not worth the sacrifice. Priti accepted our offer. By 
the time she started at Facebook, she was already expecting. Eight months later, she had her baby, 
took four months off, and came back to a job she loved. She later told me that if I had not raised the 
topic, she would have turned us down. 

Like so many women, Caroline O'Connor believed that someday she'd have to choose between 
career and family. That day came sooner than she expected. Caroline was finishing up at Stanford's 
Institute of Design when she was offered the chance to start a company at the same time that she 
learned she was pregnant. Her knee-jerk reaction was to think that she could not do both. But then she 
decided to question this assumption. "I began thinking of my dilemma as I would a design challenge," 
O'Connor wrote. "Rather than accepting that launching a successful start-up and having a baby are 
utterly incompatible, I framed it as a question and then set about using tools I've developed as a 
designer to begin forming an answer." O'Connor gathered data from dozens of mothers about their 
experiences and coping mechanisms. She did fieldwork on sleep deprivation by taking a night shift 
with foster infants. She concluded that with a team culture that drew support from her husband and 
friends, it would be possible to proceed with both. O'Connor now refers to herself as "a career-loving 
parent," a nice alternative to "working mom." 4 

Given life's variables, I would never recommend that every woman lean in regardless of 
circumstances. There have been times when I chose not to. In the summer of 2006, a tiny start-up 
called Linkedln was looking for a new CEO, and Reid Hoffman, Linkedln's founder, reached out to 



me. I thought it was a great opportunity, and after five years in the same position at Google I was 
ready for a new challenge. But the timing was tricky. I was thirty-seven years old and wanted to have 
a second child. I told Reid the truth: regrettably, I had to pass because I didn't think I could handle 
both a pregnancy and a new job. His reaction was incredibly kind and supportive. He tried to talk me 
into it, even volunteering to work full-time at the company to support me during that period, but it was 
hard to see a path through. 

For some women, pregnancy does not slow them down at all, but rather serves to focus them and 
provides a firm deadline to work toward. My childhood friend Elise Scheck looks back fondly on 
being pregnant, saying she has never felt so productive. She not only worked her usual hours as an 
attorney but organized her house and put five years of photos into albums. For others, like me, 
pregnancy is very difficult, making it impossible to be as effective as normal. I tried writing e-mails 
while hovering over the toilet, but the situation didn't lend itself to effective multitasking. Because I 
had already been through this with my first pregnancy, I knew what I was in for. I turned down Reid's 
offer and got pregnant — and extremely nauseated — a few months later. 

Any regrets I had about not taking that job evaporated when, about seven months after my daughter 
was born, Mark offered me the opportunity to join Facebook. The timing was still not ideal. As many 
people had warned, and I quickly discovered to be true, having two children was more than double the 
work of having one. I was not looking for new challenges but simply trying to get through each day. 
Still, Dave and I recognized that if I waited until the timing was exactly right, the opportunity would 
be gone. My decision to take the job was personal, as these decisions always are. And there were days 
in my first six months at Facebook when I wondered whether I'd made the right choice. By the end of 
my first year, I knew I had ... for me. 

The birth of a child instantly changes how we define ourselves. Women become mothers. Men 
become fathers. Couples become parents. Our priorities shift in fundamental ways. Parenting may be 
the most rewarding experience, but it is also the hardest and most humbling. If there were a right way 
to raise kids, everyone would do it. Clearly, that is not the case. 

One of the immediate questions new parents face is who will provide primary care for a child. The 
historical choice has been the mother. Breast-feeding alone has made this both the logical and the 
biological choice. But the advent of the modern-day breast pump has changed the equation. At 
Google, I would lock my office door and pump during conference calls. People would ask, "What's 
that sound?" I would respond, "What sound?" When they would insist that there was a loud beeping 
noise that they could hear on the phone, I would say, "Oh, there's a fire truck across the street." I 
thought I was pretty clever until I realized that others on the call were sometimes in the same building 
and knew there was no fire truck. Busted. 

Despite modern methods that can minimize the impact of biological imperatives, women still do the 
vast majority of child care. As a result, becoming a parent decreases workforce participation for 
women but not men. Forty-three percent of highly qualified women with children are leaving careers, 
or "off-ramping," for a period of time. 6 

Women who are the most likely to leave the workforce are concentrated at opposite ends of the 
earning scale, married to men who earn the least and the most. In 2006, only 20 percent of mothers 



whose husband's earnings landed in the middle (between the twenty-fifth and seventy-fifth 
percentiles) were out of the labor force. In contrast, a whopping 52 percent of mothers with husbands 
in the bottom quarter and 40 percent of mothers with husbands in the top 5 percent were out of the 

7 

labor force. Obviously, their reasons for staying home are vastly different. Mothers married to the 
lowest-earning men struggle to find jobs that pay enough to cover child care costs, which are 
increasingly unaffordable. Over the past decade, child care costs have risen twice as fast as the median 
income of families with children. 8 The cost for two children (an infant and a four- year-old) to go to a 

9 

day care center is greater than the annual median rent payment in every state in the country. 

Women married to men with greater resources leave for a variety of reasons, but one important 
factor is the number of hours that their husbands work. When husbands work fifty or more hours per 
week, wives with children are 44 percent more likely to quit their jobs than wives with children whose 
husbands work less.' 0 Many of these mothers are those with the highest levels of education. A 2007 
survey of Harvard Business School alumni found that while men's rates of full-time employment 
never fell below 91 percent, only 81 percent of women who graduated in the early 2000s and 49 
percent of women who graduated in the early 1990s were working full-time." Of Yale alumni who 
had reached their forties by 2000, only 56 percent of the women remained in the workforce, compared 
with 90 percent of the men. 12 This exodus of highly educated women is a major contributor to the 
leadership gap. 

While it's hard to predict how an individual will react to becoming a parent, it's easy to predict 
society's reaction. When a couple announces that they are having a baby, everyone says 
"Congratulations!" to the man and "Congratulations! What are you planning on doing about work?" to 
the woman. The broadly held assumption is that raising their child is her responsibility. In more than 
thirty years, this perception has changed very little. A survey of the Princeton class of 1975 found that 
54 percent of the women foresaw work-family conflict compared to 26 percent of the men. The same 
survey of the Princeton class of 2006 found that 62 percent of the women anticipated work-family 
conflict compared to only 33 percent of the men. Three decades separate the studies and still nearly 
twice as many women as men enter the workforce anticipating this stumbling block. Even in 2006, 46 
percent of the men who anticipated this conflict expected their spouse to step off her career track to 
raise their children. Only 5 percent of the women believed their spouse would alter his career to 
accommodate their child.' 

Personal choices are not always as personal as they appear. We are all influenced by social 
conventions, peer pressure, and familial expectations. On top of these forces, women who can afford 
to drop out of the workplace often receive not just permission but encouragement to do so from all 
directions. 

Imagine that a career is like a marathon — a long, grueling, and ultimately rewarding endeavor. Now 
imagine a marathon where both men and women arrive at the starting line equally fit and trained. The 
gun goes off. The men and women run side by side. The male marathoners are routinely cheered on: 
"Lookin' strong! On your way!" But the female runners hear a different message. "You know you 
don't have to do this!" the crowd shouts. Or "Good start — but you probably won't want to finish." The 
farther the marathoners run, the louder the cries grow for the men: "Keep going! You've got this!" But 
the women hear more and more doubts about their efforts. External voices, and often their own 



internal voice, repeatedly question their decision to keep running. The voices can even grow hostile. 
As the women struggle to endure the rigors of the race, spectators shout, "Why are you running when 
your children need you at home?" 

Back in 1997, Debi Hemmeter was a rising executive at Sara Lee who aspired to someday lead a 
major corporation like her role model, Pepsi-Cola North America CEO Brenda Barnes. Even after 
starting a family, Debi continued to pursue her career at full speed. Then one day when Debi was on a 
business trip, she opened her hotel door to find USA Today with the startling headline "Pepsi Chief 
Trades Work for Family." The subhead elaborated: "22 -Year Veteran Got Burned Out." In that 
moment, Debi said she felt her own ambitions shift. As Debi told me, "It seemed like if this 
extraordinary woman couldn't make it work, who could? Soon after, I was offered a big job at a bank 
and I turned it down because my daughter was just a year old and I didn't think I could do it. Almost a 
decade later, I took a similar job and did it well, but I lost a decade. I actually saved that clipping and 
still have it today. It's a reminder of what I don't want another generation to go through." 

If a female marathoner can ignore the shouts of the crowd and get past the tough middle of the race, 
she will often hit her stride. Years ago, I met an investment banker in New York whose husband 
worked in public service. She told me that over the years all of her female friends in banking quit, but 
because she was her family's primary breadwinner, she had to stick it out. There were days when she 
was jealous and wished she could leave, days when there was just too much to do or too much crap to 
put up with. But she did not have that option. Eventually, she landed in a position that had less crap 
and more impact. Now when she looks back, she is glad that even in the hard times, she continued in 
her career. Today, she has a close relationship with her children and now that they have grown up and 
moved away, she's especially grateful to have a fulfilling job. 

Although pundits and politicians, usually male, often claim that motherhood is the most important 
and difficult work of all, women who take time out of the workforce pay a big career penalty. Only 74 
percent of professional women will rejoin the workforce in any capacity, and only 40 percent will 

14 

return to full-time jobs. Those who do rejoin will often see their earnings decrease dramatically. 
Controlling for education and hours worked, women's average annual earnings decrease by 20 percent 
if they are out of the workforce for just one year.' 5 Average annual earnings decline by 30 percent after 
two to three years, 16 which is the average amount of time that professional women off-ramp from the 

17 

workforce. If society truly valued the work of caring for children, companies and institutions would 
find ways to reduce these steep penalties and help parents combine career and family responsibilities. 
All too often rigid work schedules, lack of paid family leave, and expensive or undependable child 
care derail women's best efforts. Governmental and company policies such as paid personal time off, 
affordable high-quality child care, and flexible work practices would serve families, and society, well. 

One miscalculation that some women make is to drop out early in their careers because their salary 
barely covers the cost of child care. Child care is a huge expense, and it's frustrating to work hard just 
to break even. But professional women need to measure the cost of child care against their future 
salary rather than their current salary. Anna Fieler describes becoming a mom at thirty-two as "the 
time when the rubber hit the road." A rising star in marketing, Anna was concerned that her after-tax 
salary barely covered her child care expenses. "With husbands often making more than wives, it 
seems like higher ROI to just invest in his career," she told me. But she thought about all the time and 



money she had already invested in her career and didn't see how walking away made economic sense 
either. So she made what she called "a leap of blind faith" and stayed in the workforce. Years later, 
her income is many times greater than when she almost withdrew. Wisely, Anna and other women 
have started to think of paying for child care as a way of investing in their families' future. As the 
years go by, compensation often increases. Flexibility typically increases, too, as senior leaders often 
have more control over their hours and schedules. 

And what about men who want to leave the workforce? If we make it too easy for women to drop 
out of the career marathon, we also make it too hard for men. Just as women feel that they bear the 
primary responsibility of caring for their children, many men feel that they bear the primary 
responsibility of supporting their families financially. Their self-worth is tied mainly to their 
professional success, and they frequently believe that they have no choice but to finish that marathon. 

Choosing to leave a child in someone else's care and return to work is a difficult decision. Any 
parent who has done this, myself included, knows how heart wrenching it can be. Only a compelling, 
challenging, and rewarding job will begin to make that choice a fair contest. And even after a choice is 
made, parents have every right to reassess along the way. 

Anyone lucky enough to have options should keep them open. Don't enter the workforce already 
looking for the exit. Don't put on the brakes. Accelerate. Keep a foot on the gas pedal until a decision 
must be made. That's the only way to ensure that when that day comes, there will be a real decision to 
make. 



8 



Make Your Partner a Real Partner 



Being a mother has been an amazing experience for me. Giving birth was not. After nine months of 
serious nausea, I could not wait to move on to the next phase. Unfortunately, my son was in no such 
rush. When my due date arrived, my OB decided I should be induced. My parents and my sister, 
Michelle, joined me and Dave at the hospital. Some say it takes a village to raise a child, but in my 
case, it took a village just to get the child out of me. My hours in labor went on . . . and on . . . and on. 
For my supporters, excitement gave way to boredom. At one point, I needed help through a 
contraction but couldn't get anyone's attention because they were all on the other side of the room, 
showing family photos to my doctor. It has been a running joke in my family that it's hard to hold 
anyone's attention for too long. Labor was no exception to that rule. 

After three and half hours of pushing, my son finally emerged, weighing nine pounds, seven 
ounces. Half of that weight was in his head. My sister is a pediatrician and has attended hundreds of 
deliveries. She kindly did not tell me until much later that mine was one of the hardest she had ever 
witnessed. It was all worth it when my son was pronounced healthy and the nausea that I had felt for 
nine straight months vanished within an hour. The worst was over. 

The next morning, I got out of bed in my hospital room, took one step, and fell to the floor. 
Apparently I had yanked my leg back so hard during labor that I had pulled a tendon. I was on 
crutches for a week. Being unable to stand added a degree of difficulty to my first week of 
motherhood but also provided one unforeseen benefit: Dave became the primary caregiver for our 
newborn. Dave had to get up when the baby cried, bring him to me to be fed, change him, and then get 
him back to sleep. Normally, the mother becomes the instant baby care expert. In our case, Dave 
taught me how to change a diaper when our son was eight days old. If Dave and I had planned this, we 
would have been geniuses. But we didn't and we aren't. 

In fact, we should have planned a lot more. When I was six months pregnant, a Ph.D. candidate 
interviewed me by phone for her dissertation on working couples. She began by asking, "How do you 
do it all?" I said, "I don't. I don't even have a child," and suggested that she interview someone who 



actually did. She said, "You're just a few months away from having a baby, so surely you and your 
husband have thought about who is going to pick up your child if he is sick at school? Who is going to 
arrange for child care?" And so on. I couldn't answer a single one of her questions. By the end of the 
caU, I was in full panic, overwhelmed by how truly unprepared Dave and I were to handle these 
responsibilities. As soon as Dave walked in the door that night, I pounced. "Ohmigod!" I said. "We 
are just a few months away from having a baby, and we have never talked about any of this!" Dave 
looked at me like I was crazy. "What?" he said. "This is all we talk about." 

In dissecting this discrepancy, Dave and I figured out that we had spent a lot of time talking about 
how we would do things, but almost always in the abstract. So Dave was right that we had discussed 
parenthood often, and I was right that the discussion had not been that practical. Part of the problem 
was that our inexperience made it hard even to know what specifics to cover. We had very little idea 
what we were in for. 

I also think that we were in denial about the tremendous shift in our lives that was rapidly 
approaching. Dave and I were not even working in the same city when I got pregnant (although just to 
be clear, we were in the same place when I got pregnant). Dave had founded a company, Launch 
Media, in LA. and sold it to Yahoo years earlier. Yahoo's headquarters were in Northern California, 
where I lived and worked, but Dave's team remained in Los Angeles, where he lived and worked. 
When we started dating, we decided to base our life together in the Bay Area, so Dave began 
commuting, typically spending Monday through Thursday in Southern California and then flying 
north to spend weekends with me. This pattern continued even after we were married. 

After the birth of our son, Dave began flying back and forth several times a week. It was great that 
we had the ability for him to commute, but it was far from ideal. Even though he was making an 
exhausting effort to be with me and our baby, he was still gone a lot. Since I was with the baby full- 
time, the great majority of child care fell to me. The division of labor felt uneven and strained our 
marriage. We hired a nanny, but she couldn't solve all our problems; the emotional support and shared 
experience that a spouse provides cannot be bought. After a few short months of parenthood, we had 
already fallen into traditional, lopsided gender roles. 

We were not unique. In the last thirty years, women have made more progress in the workforce than 
in the home. According to the most recent analysis, when a husband and wife both are employed full- 
time, the mother does 40 percent more child care and about 30 percent more housework than the 
father.' A 2009 survey found that only 9 percent of people in dual-earner marriages said that they 
shared housework, child care, and breadwinning evenly." So while men are taking on more household 
responsibilities, this increase is happening very slowly, and we are still far from parity. (Perhaps 

4 

unsurprisingly, same-sex couples divide household tasks much more evenly.) 

Public policy reinforces this gender bias. The U.S. Census Bureau considers mothers the 
"designated parent," even when both parents are present in the home. When mothers care for their 
children, it's "parenting," but when fathers care for their children, the government deems it a "child 
care arrangement." 6 1 have even heard a few men say that they are heading home to "babysit" for their 
children. I have never heard a woman refer to taking care of her own children as "babysitting." A 
friend of mine ran a team-building exercise during a company retreat where people were asked to fill 



in their hobbies. Half of the men in the group listed "their children" as hobbies. A hobby? For most 
mothers, kids are not a hobby. Showering is a hobby. 

My friends Katie and Scott Mitic flip this pattern. Katie and Scott are both Silicon Valley 
entrepreneurs who work full-time. About a year ago, Scott traveled to the East Coast for work. He was 
starting a late-morning meeting when his phone rang. His team only heard one side of the 
conversation. "A sandwich, carrot sticks, a cut-up apple, pretzels, and a cookie," Scott said. He hung 
up smiling and explained that his wife was asking what she should put in the kids' lunch boxes. 
Everyone laughed. A few months later, Scott was back east with the same work colleagues. They were 
in a cab late that morning when Scott's phone rang. His team listened in disbelief as he patiently 
repeated the lunch list all over again: "A sandwich, carrot sticks, a cut-up apple, pretzels, and a 
cookie." 

When Scott tells this story, it's sweet and funny. But take this same story and switch the genders 
and it loses its charm. That's just reality for most couples. Scott and Katie buck expectations with their 
division of household duties. There's an epilogue to their story. Scott went on a third trip and 
discovered that Katie forgot to make the kids' lunches altogether. She realized her slipup midmorning 
and solved the problem by having a pizza delivered to the school cafeteria. Their kids were thrilled, 
but Scott was not. Now when he travels, he packs lunches in advance and leaves notes with specific 
instructions for his wife. 

There may be an evolutionary basis for one parent knowing better what to put in a child's lunch. 
Women who breast-feed are arguably baby's first lunch box. But even if mothers are more naturally 
inclined toward nurturing, fathers can match that skill with knowledge and effort. If women want to 
succeed more at work and if men want to succeed more at home, these expectations have to be 
challenged. As Gloria Steinem once observed, "It's not about biology, but about consciousness." 7 

We overcome biology with consciousness in other areas. For example, storing large amounts of fat 
was necessary to survive when food was scarce, so we evolved to crave it and consume it when it's 
available. But in this era of plenty, we no longer need large amounts of fuel in reserve, so instead of 
simply giving in to this inclination, we exercise and limit caloric intake. We use willpower to combat 
biology, or at least we try. So even if "mother knows best" is rooted in biology, it need not be written 
in stone. A willing mother and a willing father are all it requires. Yes, someone needs to remember 
what goes into the lunch box, but as Katie will attest, it does not have to be Mom. 

As women must be more empowered at work, men must be more empowered at home. I have seen 
so many women inadvertently discourage their husbands from doing their share by being too 
controlling or critical. Social scientists call this "maternal gatekeeping," which is a fancy term for 
"Ohmigod, that's not the way you do it! Just move aside and let me!" 8 When it comes to children, 
fathers often take their cues from mothers. This gives a mother great power to encourage or impede 
the father's involvement. If she acts as a gatekeeper mother and is reluctant to hand over 
responsibility, or worse, questions the father's efforts, he does less. 

Whenever a married woman asks me for advice on coparenting with a husband, I tell her to let him 
put the diaper on the baby any way he wants as long as he's doing it himself. And if he gets up to deal 
with the diaper before being asked, she should smile even if he puts that diaper on the baby's head. 



Over time, if he does things his way, he'll find the correct end. But if he's forced to do things her way, 
pretty soon she'll be doing them herself 

Anyone who wants her mate to be a true partner must treat him as an equal — and equally capable — 
partner. And if that's not reason enough, bear in mind that a study found that wives who engage in 
gatekeeping behaviors do five more hours of family work per week than wives who take a more 
collaborative approach. 

Another common and counterproductive dynamic occurs when women assign or suggest tasks to 
their partners. She is delegating, and that's a step in the right direction. But sharing responsibility 
should mean sharing responsibility. Each partner needs to be in charge of specific activities or it 
becomes too easy for one to feel like he's doing a favor instead of doing his part. 

Like many pieces of advice, letting a partner take responsibility and do his share in his own way is 
easy to say and hard to do. My brother, David, and sister-in-law, Amy, were very aware of this tension 
when they first became parents. "There were many times when our daughter was more easily consoled 
by me," Amy said. "It's really hard to listen to your baby cry while your struggling husband with no 
breasts tries desperately and sometimes awkwardly to comfort her. David was insistent that rather than 
handing the baby to me when she was crying, we allow him to comfort her even if it took longer. It 
was harder in the short run, but it absolutely paid off when our daughter learned that Daddy could take 
care of her as well as Mommy." 

I truly believe that the single most important career decision that a woman makes is whether she 
will have a life partner and who that partner is. I don't know of one woman in a leadership position 
whose life partner is not fully — and I mean fully — supportive of her career. No exceptions. And 
contrary to the popular notion that only unmarried women can make it to the top, the majority of the 
most successful female business leaders have partners. Of the twenty-eight women who have served 
as CEOs of Fortune 500 companies, twenty-six were married, one was divorced, and only one had 
never married.' 0 Many of these CEOs said they "could not have succeeded without the support of their 
husbands, helping with the children, the household chores, and showing a willingness to move." 

Not surprisingly, a lack of spousal support can have the opposite effect on a career. In a 2007 study 
of well-educated professional women who had left the paid workforce, 60 percent cited their husbands 
as a critical factor in their decision.'" These women specifically listed their husbands' lack of 
participation in child care and other domestic tasks and the expectation that wives should be the ones 
to cut back on employment as reasons for quitting. No wonder when asked at a conference what men 
could do to help advance women's leadership, Harvard Business School professor Rosabeth Moss 
Kanter answered, "The laundry." Tasks like laundry, food shopping, cleaning, and cooking are 
mundane and mandatory. Typically, these tasks fall to women. 

In January 2012, I received a letter from Ruth Chang, a doctor with two young children who had 
seen my TEDTalk. She had been offered a new job overseeing seventy-five doctors in five medical 
clinics. Her first instinct was to say no out of concern that she could not handle the expanded 
responsibility in addition to taking care of her family. But then she wavered, and in that moment, Dr. 
Chang wrote me, "I heard your voice saying, 'Sit at the table' and I knew I had to accept the 



promotion. So that evening, I told my husband I was taking the job ... and then handed him the 
grocery list." Sharing the burden of the mundane can make all the difference. 

My career and marriage are inextricably intertwined. During that first year Dave and I were parents, 
it became clear that balancing two careers and two cities was not adding up to one happy family. We 
needed to make some changes. But what? I loved my job at Google and he felt enormously loyal to his 
team in L.A. We struggled through the commuting for another long year of marital less-than-bliss. By 
then, Dave was ready to leave Yahoo. He limited his job search to the San Francisco area, which was a 
sacrifice on his part, since more of his professional interests and contacts were in L.A. He eventually 
became CEO of SurveyMonkey and was able to move the company headquarters from Portland to the 
Bay Area. 

Once we were in the same city, it still took us some time to figure out how to coordinate our work 
schedules. Even though Dave and I are extraordinarily fortunate and can afford exceptional child care, 
there are still difficult and painful decisions about how much time our jobs require us to be away from 
our family and who will pick up the slack. We sit down at the beginning of every week and figure out 
which one of us will drive our children to school each day. We both try to be home for dinner as many 
nights as we can. (At dinner, we go around the table and share the best and worst event from our day; I 
refrain from saying so, but my best is usually being home for dinner in the first place.) If one of us is 
scheduled to be away, the other almost always arranges to be home. On weekends, I try to focus 
completely on my kids (although I have been known to sneak off a few e-mails from the bathroom of 
the local soccer field). 

Like all marriages, ours is a work in progress. Dave and I have had our share of bumps on our path 
to achieving a roughly fifty-fifty split. After a lot of effort and seemingly endless discussion, we are 
partners not just in what we do, but in who is in charge. Each of us makes sure that things that need to 
get done do indeed get done. Our division of household chores is actually pretty traditional. Dave pays 
bills, handles our finances, provides tech support. I schedule the kids' activities, make sure there is 
food in the fridge, plan the birthday parties. Sometimes I'm bothered by this classic gender division of 
labor. Am I perpetuating stereotypes by falling into these patterns? But I would rather plan a Dora the 
Explorer party than pay an insurance bill, and since Dave feels the exact opposite, this arrangement 
works for us. It takes continual communication, honesty, and a lot of forgiveness to maintain a rickety 
balance. We are never at fifty-fifty at any given moment — perfect equality is hard to define or 
sustain — but we allow the pendulum to swing back and forth between us. 

In the coming years, our balancing act may get harder. Our children are still young and go to sleep 
early, which gives me plenty of time to work at night and even to watch what Dave considers to be 
truly bad TV. As the kids get older, we will have to adjust. Many of my friends have told me that 
teenage children require more time from their parents. Every stage of life has its challenges. 
Fortunately, I have Dave to figure it out with me. He's the best partner I could imagine — even though 
he's wrong about my TV shows being bad. 

Having a true partner like Dave is still far too rare. While we expect women to be nurturing, we 
don't have the same expectations of men. My brother, David, once told me about a colleague who 
bragged about playing soccer the afternoon that his first child was born. To David's credit, instead of 



nodding and smiling, he spoke up and explained that he didn't think that was either cool or 
impressive. This opinion needs to be voiced loudly and repeatedly on soccer fields, in workplaces, and 
in homes. 

My brother had a wonderful role model in my father, who was an engaged and active parent. Like 
most men of his generation, my father did very little domestic work, but unlike most men of his 
generation, he was happy to change diapers and give baths. He was home for dinner every night, since 
his ophthalmology practice required no travel and involved few emergencies. He coached my 
brother's and sister's sports teams (and would have happily coached mine if I had been the slightest 
bit coordinated). He helped me with my homework regularly and was my most enthusiastic fan when I 
participated in oratory contests. 

Studies from around the world have concluded that children benefit greatly from paternal 
involvement. Research over the last forty years has consistently found that in comparison to children 
with less-involved fathers, children with involved and loving fathers have higher levels of 
psychological well-being and better cognitive abilities.' 4 When fathers provide even just routine child 
care, children have higher levels of educational and economic achievement and lower delinquency 
rates.' 5 Their children even tend to be more empathetic and socially competent. 16 These findings hold 
true for children from all socioeconomic backgrounds, whether or not the mother is highly involved. 

We all need to encourage men to lean in to their families. Unfortunately, traditional gender roles are 
reinforced not just by individuals, but also by employment policies. Most companies in the United 
States offer more time off for maternity than paternity leave, and men take far fewer extended breaks 

17 

from work for family reasons. Our laws support this double standard. In the United States, only five 
states provide any income replacement for the care of a new baby (which is a large problem in and of 
itself). In three of these states, this benefit is only offered to mothers and is characterized as a 
pregnancy disability benefit. Only two states offer a paid family leave benefit that fathers can use.' 8 In 
general, fathers do not take much time off for a new child; a survey of fathers in the corporate sector 
found that the vast majority took off one week or less when their partners gave birth, hardly enough 
time to start out as an equal parent.' 9 I'm proud that even before I arrived, Facebook offered equal time 
for maternity and paternity leave. 

When family friendly benefits like paternity leave or reduced work hours are offered, both male and 
female employees often worry that if they take advantage of these programs, they will be seen as 
uncommitted to their jobs. And for good reason. Employees who use these benefits often face steep 
penalties ranging from substantial pay cuts to lost promotions to marginalization." Both men and 

21 

women can be penalized at work for prioritizing family, but men may pay an even higher price." 
When male employees take a leave of absence or just leave work early to care for a sick child, they 
can face negative consequences that range from being teased to receiving lower performance ratings to 
reducing their chance for a raise or promotion." 

Fathers who want to drop out of the workforce entirely and devote themselves to child care can face 
extremely negative social pressure. Currently, fathers make up less than 4 percent of parents who 
work full-time inside the home, and many report that it can be very isolating." My friend Peter Noone 
spent several years as a stay-at-home father and found that while people claimed to respect his choice, 



he did not feel welcomed into the social circles in his neighborhood. As a man at the playground or in 
the not- so-tactfully-named "Mommy and Me" classes, strangers viewed him with a certain amount of 

24 

distrust. The friendly and easy connections that the women made were not extended to him. Time 
and again, he was reminded that he was outside the norm. 

Gender- specific expectations remain self-fulfilling. The belief that mothers are more committed to 
family than to work penalizes women because employers assume they won't live up to expectations of 
professional dedication. The reverse is true for men, who are expected to put their careers first. We 
judge men primarily by their professional success and send them a clear message that personal 
achievements are insufficient for them to be valued or feel fulfilled. This mind-set leads to a grown 
man bragging on the soccer field that he left his postpartum wife and newborn at the hospital to go 
kick a ball. 

Making gender matters even worse, men's success is viewed not just in absolute terms, but often in 
comparison to their wives'. The image of a happy couple still includes a husband who is more 
professionally successful than the wife. If the reverse occurs, it's perceived as threatening to the 
marriage. People frequently pull me aside to ask sympathetically, "How is Dave? Is he okay with, you 
know, all your [whispering] successl" Dave is far more self-confident than I am, and given his own 
professional success, these comments are easy for him to brush off. More and more men will have to 
do the same, since almost 30 percent of U.S. working wives now outearn their husbands. 25 As that 
number continues to grow, I hope the whispering stops. 

Dave and I can laugh off concerns about his supposedly fragile ego, but for many women, this is no 
laughing matter. Women face enough barriers to professional success. If they also have to worry that 
they will upset their husbands by succeeding, how can we hope to live in an equal world? 

When looking for a life partner, my advice to women is date all of them: the bad boys, the cool 
boys, the commitment-phobic boys, the crazy boys. But do not marry them. The things that make the 
bad boys sexy do not make them good husbands. When it comes time to settle down, find someone 
who wants an equal partner. Someone who thinks women should be smart, opinionated, and 
ambitious. Someone who values fairness and expects or, even better, wants to do his share in the 
home. These men exist and, trust me, over time, nothing is sexier. (If you don't believe me, check out 
a fabulous little book called Porn for Women. One page shows a man cleaning a kitchen while 
insisting, "I like to get to these things before I have to be asked." Another man gets out of bed in the 
middle of the night, wondering, "Is that the baby? I'll get her.") 26 

Kristina Salen, the leader of Fidelity's media and internet investment group, told me that when she 
was dating, she wanted to see how much a boyfriend would support her career, so she devised a test. 
She would break a date at the last minute claiming there was a professional conflict and see how the 
guy would react. If he understood and simply rescheduled, she would go out with him again. When 
Kristina wanted to take a relationship to the next level, she gave him another test. While working in 
emerging markets in the late 1990s, she would invite the guy to visit her for the weekend ... in Sao 
Paulo. It was a great way to find out if he was willing to fit his schedule around hers. The trials paid 
off. She found her Mr. Right and they have been happily married for fourteen years. Not only is her 



husband, Daniel, completely supportive of her career, he's also the primary caregiver for their two 
children. 

Even after finding the right guy — or gal — no one comes fully formed. I learned from my mother to 
be careful about role definition in the beginning of a relationship. Even though my mother did most of 
the household work, my father always vacuumed the floor after dinner. She never had to persuade him 
to do this chore; it was simply his job from day one. At the start of a romance, it's tempting for a 
woman to show a more classic "girlfriendy" side by volunteering to cook meals and take care of 
errands. And, suddenly, we're back in 1955. If a relationship begins in an unequal place, it is likely to 
get more unbalanced when and if children are added to the equation. Instead, use the beginning of a 
relationship to establish the division of labor, just as Nora Ephron's dialogue in When Harry Met Sally 
reminds us: 

harry: You take someone to the airport, it's clearly the beginning of the relationship. That's why I 
have never taken anyone to the airport at the beginning of a relationship. 

SALLY: Why? 

harry: Because eventually things move on and you don't take someone to the airport and I never 
wanted anyone to say to me, "How come you never take me to the airport anymore?" 

If you want a fifty-fifty partnership, establish that pattern at the outset. A few years ago, Mark 
Zuckerberg and his partner, now wife, Priscilla Chan, made a donation to improve the Newark, New 
Jersey, public school system and needed someone to run their foundation. I recommended Jen 
Holleran, who had deep knowledge and experience in school reform. She also had fourteen-month-old 
twins and had cut her hours by two-thirds since their birth. Her husband, Andy, is a child psychiatrist 
who was involved with raising the kids when he was home. But once Jen had reduced her workload, 
she ended up being responsible for all of the household work, including running errands, paying bills, 
cooking, and scheduling. When the offer came from Mark and Priscilla, Jen wasn't sure she was ready 
to upset the current order by committing to a full-time job with frequent travel. I urged her to set up 
the relationship dynamic she wanted sooner rather than later. Jen remembers my suggesting, "If you 
want an equal partnership, you should start now." 

Jen and Andy discussed the opportunity and decided she should take the job because of the impact 
she could have. And who would pick up the slack? Andy would. He rearranged his work so he could 
be home with the boys each morning and night, and even more when Jen travels. He now pays all the 
bills and squeezes in grocery runs as much as she does. He cooks and cleans more, knows the details 
of the schedule, and is happy to be the number one, in-demand parent for half the week. A year and a 
half into this new arrangement, Andy told me that he loves his time alone with their boys and the 
increased role that he has in their lives. Jen loves her job and is glad that she and her husband now 
have a more equal marriage. "My time is now as valuable as his," she told me. "As a result, we are 
happier." 

Research supports Jen's observation that equality between partners leads to happier relationships. 
When husbands do more housework, wives are less depressed, marital conflicts decrease, and 

27 

satisfaction rises." When women work outside the home and share breadwinning duties, couples are 



more likely to stay together. In fact, the risk of divorce reduces by about half when a wife earns half 
the income and a husband does half the housework." 8 For men, participating in child rearing fosters the 
development of patience, empathy, and adaptability, characteristics that benefit all of their 

29 

relationships." For women, earning money increases their decision-making ability in the home, 
protects them in case of divorce, and can be important security in later years, as women often outlive 
their husbands. " Also — and many might find this the most motivating factor — couples who share 
domestic responsibilities have more sex. 31 It may be counterintuitive, but the best way for a man to 
make a pass at his wife might be to do the dishes. 

I also feel strongly that when a mother stays at home, her time during the day should still be 
considered real work — because it is. Raising children is at least as stressful and demanding as a paying 
job. It is unfair that mothers are frequently expected to work long into the night while fathers who 
work outside the home get the chance to relax from their day jobs. When the father is home, he should 
take on half the child care and housework. Also, most employed fathers interact with other grown-ups 
all day, while mothers at home are often starved for adult conversation by evening. I know a woman 
who gave up a career as a lawyer to be a stay-at-home mom and always insisted that when her 
husband, a TV writer, got home from work, he asked her, "How was your day?" before he launched 
into an account of his own. 

True partnership in our homes does more than just benefit couples today; it also sets the stage for 
the next generation. The workplace has evolved more than the home in part because we enter it as 
adults, so each generation experiences a new dynamic. But the homes we create tend to be more 
rooted in our childhoods. My generation grew up watching our mothers do the child care and 
housework while our fathers earned the wages. It's too easy for us to get stuck in these patterns. It is 
no surprise that married and cohabitating men whose mothers were employed while they were 
growing up do more housework as adults than other men. " The sooner we break the cycle, the faster 
we will reach greater equality. 

One of the reasons Dave is a true partner is because he grew up in a home where his father set an 
extraordinary example. Sadly, Dave's father, Mel, passed away before I had a chance to meet him, but 
he clearly was a man way ahead of his time. Mel's mother worked side by side with her husband 
running the family's small grocery store, so Mel grew up accepting women as equals, which was 
unusual in those days. As a single man, he became interested in the women's movement and read 
Betty Friedan's The Feminine Mystique. He was the one who introduced his wife (and Dave's 
mother), Paula, to this feminist wake-up call in the 1960s. He encouraged Paula to set up and lead 
PACER, a national nonprofit to help children with disabilities. A law professor, Mel often taught 
classes at night. Since he wanted the family to have at least one meal together each day, he decided it 
would be breakfast and prepared the meal himself, complete with fresh-squeezed orange juice. 

A more equal division of labor between parents will model better behavior for the next generation. I 
have heard so many women say that they wished their partners helped more with child care, but since 
it's only a few more years until their kids are off to school, it's not worth the battle to change the 
dynamic. In my opinion, it is always worth the battle to change an undesirable dynamic. I also worry 
that these women will face the same dynamic when it comes time to care for aging parents. Women 
provide more than twice as much care not only for their own parents, but for their in-laws as well. 



This is an additional burden that needs to be shared. And children need to see it being shared so that 
their generation will follow that example. 

In 2012, Gloria Steinem sat down in her home for an interview with Oprah Winfrey. Gloria 
reiterated that progress for women in the home has trailed progress in the workplace, explaining, 
"Now we know that women can do what men can do, but we don't know that men can do what 
women can do." 34 1 believe they can and we should give them more chances to prove it. 

This revolution will happen one family at a time. The good news is that men in younger generations 
appear more eager to be real partners than men in previous generations. A survey that asked 
participants to rate the importance of various job characteristics found that men in their forties most 
frequently selected "work which challenges me" as very important, while men in their twenties and 
thirties most frequently selected having a job with a schedule that "allows me to spend time with my 
family." If these trends hold as this group ages, it could signal a promising shift. 

Wonderful, sensitive men of all ages are out there. And the more women value kindness and 
support in their boyfriends, the more men will demonstrate it. Kristina Salen, my friend who devised 
the tests to screen her dates, told me that her son insists that when he grows up, he wants to take care 
of his children "like Daddy does." She and her husband were thrilled to hear this. More boys need that 
role model and that choice. As more women lean in to their careers, more men need to lean in to their 
families. We need to encourage men to be more ambitious in their homes. 

We need more men to sit at the table . . . the kitchen table. 



9 



The Myth of Doing It All 

Having it all." Perhaps the greatest trap ever set for women was the coining of this phrase. Bandied 
about in speeches, headlines, and articles, these three little words are intended to be aspirational but 
instead make all of us feel like we have fallen short. I have never met a woman, or man, who has 
stated emphatically, "Yes, I have it all." Because no matter what any of us has — and how grateful we 
are for what we have — no one has it all. 

Nor can we. The very concept of having it all flies in the face of the basic laws of economics and 
common sense. As Sharon Poczter, professor of economics at Cornell, explains, "The antiquated 
rhetoric of 'having it all' disregards the basis of every economic relationship: the idea of trade-offs. 
All of us are dealing with the constrained optimization that is life, attempting to maximize our utility 
based on parameters like career, kids, relationships, etc., doing our best to allocate the resource of 
time. Due to the scarcity of this resource, therefore, none of us can 'have it all,' and those who claim 
to are most likely lying." 1 

"Having it all" is best regarded as a myth. And like many myths, it can deliver a helpful cautionary 
message. Think of Icarus, who soared to great heights with his man-made wings. His father warned 
him not to fly too near the sun, but Icarus ignored the advice. He soared even higher, his wings 
melted, and he crashed to earth. Pursuing both a professional and personal life is a noble and 
attainable goal, up to a point. Women should learn from Icarus to aim for the sky, but keep in mind 
that we all have real limits. 

Instead of pondering the question "Can we have it all?," we should be asking the more practical 
question "Can we do it all?" And again, the answer is no. Each of us makes choices constantly 
between work and family, exercising and relaxing, making time for others and taking time for 
ourselves. Being a parent means making adjustments, compromises, and sacrifices every day. For 
most people, sacrifices and hardships are not a choice, but a necessity. About 65 percent of married- 
couple families with children in the United States have two parents in the workforce, with almost all 
relying on both incomes to support their household." Being a single working parent can be even more 
difficult. About 30 percent of families with children are led by a single parent, with 85 percent of 
those led by a woman. 

Mothers who work outside the home are constantly reminded of these challenges. Tina Fey noted 
that when she was promoting the movie Date Night with Steve Carell, a father of two and star of his 
own sitcom, reporters would grill Fey on how she balances her life, but never posed that question to 
her male costar. As she wrote in Bossypants, "What is the rudest question you can ask a woman? 



'How old are you?' 'What do you weigh?' 'When you and your twin sister are alone with Mr. Hefner, 
do you have to pretend to be lesbians?' No, the worst question is 'How do you juggle it 
all?' ... People constantly ask me, with an accusatory look in their eyes. 'You're fucking it all up, 
aren't you?' their eyes say." 4 

Fey nails it. Employed mothers and fathers both struggle with multiple responsibilities, but mothers 
also have to endure the rude questions and accusatory looks that remind us that we're shortchanging 
both our jobs and our children. As if we needed reminding. Like me, most of the women I know do a 
great job worrying that we don't measure up. We compare our efforts at work to those of our 
colleagues, usually men, who typically have far fewer responsibilities at home. Then we compare our 
efforts at home to those of mothers who dedicate themselves solely to their families. Outside observers 
reminding us that we must be struggling — and failing — is just bitter icing on an already soggy cake. 

Trying to do it all and expecting that it all can be done exactly right is a recipe for disappointment. 
Perfection is the enemy. Gloria Steinem said it best: "You can't do it all. No one can have two full- 
time jobs, have perfect children and cook three meals and be multi- orgasmic 'til 
dawn . . . Superwoman is the adversary of the women's movement." 

Dr. Laurie Glimcher, dean of Weill Cornell Medical College, said the key for her in pursuing her 
career while raising children was learning where to focus her attention. "I had to decide what mattered 
and what didn't and I learned to be a perfectionist in only the things that mattered." In her case, she 
concluded that scientific data had to be perfect, but reviews and other mundane administrative tasks 
could be considered good enough at 95 percent. Dr. Glimcher also said she made it a priority to get 
home at a reasonable hour, adding that when she got there, she refused to worry about whether "the 
linens were folded or the closets were tidy. You can't be obsessive about these things that don't 
matter." 6 

A few years before I became a mother, I spoke on a women's panel for a local business group in 
Palo Alto. One of the other panelists, an executive with two children, was asked the (inevitable) 
question about how she balances her work and her children. She started her response by saying, "I 
probably shouldn't admit this publicly and then she confessed that she put her children to sleep in 
their school clothes to save fifteen precious minutes every morning. At the time, I thought to myself, 
Yup, she should not have admitted that publicly. 

Now that I'm a parent, I think this woman was a genius. We all face limits of time and patience. I 
have not yet put my children to sleep in their school clothes, but there are mornings when I wish I had. 
I also know that all the planning in the world cannot prepare us for the constant challenges of 
parenting. In hindsight, I appreciate my fellow panelist's candor. And in the spirit of that candor, I 
probably shouldn't admit this publicly either . . . 

Last year, I was traveling with my children to a business conference. Several other Silicon Valley 
folks were attending too, and John Donahoe, the CEO of eBay, kindly offered us a ride on the eBay 
plane. When the flight was delayed for several hours, my main concern was keeping my kids occupied 
so they would not disturb the other adult passengers. I made it through the delay by allowing them to 
watch endless TV and eat endless snacks. Then just as the flight finally took off, my daughter started 
scratching her head. "Mommy! My head itches!" she announced loudly, speaking over the headset she 



was wearing (as she watched even more TV). I didn't think anything of it until her itching grew frantic 
and her complaints grew louder. I urged her to lower her voice, then examined her head and noticed 
small white things. I was pretty sure I knew what they were. I was the only person bringing young 
children on this corporate plane — and now my daughter most likely had licel I spent the rest of the 
flight in a complete panic, trying to keep her isolated, her voice down, and her hands out of her hair, 
while I furiously scanned the web for pictures of lice. When we landed, everyone piled into rental cars 
to caravan to the conference hotel, but I told them to go ahead without me; I just needed to "pick 
something up." I dashed to the nearest pharmacy, where they confirmed my diagnosis. Fortunately, we 
had avoided direct contact with anyone else on the plane, so there was no way for the lice to have 
spread, which saved me from the fatal embarrassment of having to tell the group to check their own 
heads. We grabbed the shampoo that I needed to treat her and, as it turned out, her brother — and spent 
the night in a marathon hair-washing session. I missed the opening night dinner, and when asked why, 
I said my kids were tired. Frankly, I was too. And even though I managed to escape the lice, I could 
not stop scratching my head for several days. 

It is impossible to control all the variables when it comes to parenting. For women who have 
achieved previous success by planning ahead and pushing themselves hard, this chaos can be difficult 
to accept. Psychologist Jennifer Stuart studied a group of Yale graduates and concluded that for such 
women, "the effort to combine career and motherhood may be particularly fraught. The stakes are 
high, as they may expect nothing less than perfection, both at home and in the workplace. When they 
fall short of lofty ideals, they may retreat altogether — from workplace to home or vice versa." 7 

Another one of my favorite posters at Facebook declares in big red letters, "Done is better than 
perfect." I have tried to embrace this motto and let go of unattainable standards. Aiming for perfection 
causes frustration at best and paralysis at worst. I agree completely with the advice offered by Nora 
Ephron in her 1996 Wellesley commencement speech when she addressed the issue of women having 
both a career and family. Ephron insisted, "It will be a little messy, but embrace the mess. It will be 
complicated, but rejoice in the complications. It will not be anything like what you think it will be 
like, but surprises are good for you. And don't be frightened: you can always change your mind. I 
know: I've had four careers and three husbands." 

I was extremely fortunate that early in my career I was warned about the perils of trying to do it all 
by someone I deeply admired. Larry Kanarek managed the Washington, D.C., office of McKinsey & 
Company where I interned in 1994. One day, Larry gathered everyone together for a talk. He 
explained that since he was running the office, employees came to him when they wanted to quit. 
Over time, he noticed that people quit for one reason only: they were burnt out, tired of working long 
hours and traveling. Larry said he could understand the complaint, but what he could not understand 
was that all the people who quit — every single one — had unused vacation time. Up until the day they 
left, they did everything McKinsey asked of them before deciding that it was too much. 

Larry implored us to exert more control over our careers. He said McKinsey would never stop 
making demands on our time, so it was up to us to decide what we were willing to do. It was our 
responsibility to draw the line. We needed to determine how many hours we were willing to work in a 
day and how many nights we were willing to travel. If later on, the job did not work out, we would 
know that we had tried on our own terms. Counterintuitively, long-term success at work often depends 



on not trying to meet every demand placed on us. The best way to make room for both life and career 
is to make choices deliberately — to set limits and stick to them. 

During my first four years at Google, I was in the office from 7:00 a.m. to 7:00 p.m. every day at a 
minimum. I ran the global operating teams and thought it was critical that I stay on top of as many 
details as possible. No one ever demanded that I work this schedule; typical of Silicon Valley, Google 
was not the type of place to set hours for anyone. Still, the culture in those early days promoted 
working around the clock. When my son arrived, I wanted to take the three months of maternity leave 
Google offered, but I worried that my job would not be there when I returned. Events leading up to his 
birth did not put my mind at ease. Google was growing quickly and reorganizing frequently. My team 
was one of the largest in the company, and coworkers often suggested ways to restructure, which 
usually meant that they would do more and I would do less. In the months before my leave, several 
colleagues, all men, ramped up these efforts, volunteering to "help run things" while I was gone. Some 
of them even mentioned to my boss that I might not return, so it made sense to start sharing my 
responsibilities immediately. 

I tried to take Larry Kanarek's advice and draw my own line. I decided that I wanted to focus 
entirely on my new role as a mother. I was determined to truly unplug. I even made this decision 
public — a trick that can help a commitment stick by creating greater accountability. I announced that I 
was going to take the full three months off. 

No one believed me. A group of my colleagues bet on how long I would be off e-mail after giving 
birth, with not a single person taking "more than one week" as his or her wager. I would have been 
offended, except they knew me better than I knew myself. I was back on e-mail from my hospital 
room the day after giving birth. 

Over the next three months, I was unable to unplug much at all. I checked e-mail constantly. I 
organized meetings in my living room, during which I sometimes breast-fed and probably freaked 
several people out. (I tried to set these gatherings for times when my son would be sleeping, but babies 
make their own schedules.) I went into the office for key meetings, baby in tow. And while I had some 
nice moments with my son, I look back on that maternity leave as a pretty unhappy time. Being a new 
mother was exhausting, and when my son slept, I worked instead of rested. And the only thing worse 
than everyone knowing that I was not sticking to my original commitment was that / knew it too. I was 
letting myself down. 

Three months later, my non-leave maternity leave ended. I was returning to a job I loved, but as I 
pulled the car out of the driveway to head to the office for my first full day back, I felt a tightness in 
my chest and tears started to flow down my cheeks. Even though I had worked throughout my "time 
off," I had done so almost entirely from home with my son right next to me. Going back to the office 
meant a dramatic change in the amount of time I would see him. If I returned to my typical twelve- 
hour days, I would leave the house before he woke up and return after he was asleep. In order to spend 
any time with him at all, I was going to have to make changes . . . and stick to them. 

I started arriving at work around 9:00 a.m. and leaving at 5:30 p.m. This schedule allowed me to 
nurse my son before I left and get home in time to nurse again before putting him to sleep. I was 
scared that I would lose credibility, or even my entire job, if anyone knew that these were my new in- 



the-office hours. To compensate, I started checking e-mails around 5:00 a.m. Yup, I was awake before 
my newborn. Then once he was down at night, I would jump back on my computer and continue my 
workday. I went to great lengths to hide my new schedule from most people. Camille, my ingenious 
executive assistant, came up with the idea of holding my first and last meetings of the day in other 
buildings to make it less transparent when I was actually arriving or departing. When I did leave 
directly from my office, I would pause in the lobby and survey the parking lot to find a colleague-free 
moment to bolt to my car. (Given my awkwardness, we should all be relieved that I once worked for 
the Treasury Department and not the CIA.) 

Looking back, I realize that my concern over my new hours stemmed from my own insecurity. 
Google was hard charging and hypercompetitive, but it also supported combining work and 
parenthood — an attitude that clearly started at the top. Larry and Sergey came to my baby shower and 
each gave me a certificate that entitled me to one hour of babysitting. (I never used the certificates, 
and if I could find them, I bet I could auction them off for charity, like lunch with Warren Buffett.) 
Susan Wojcicki, who blazed a trail by having four children while being one of Google's earliest and 
most valuable employees, brought her children to the office when her babysitter was sick. Both my 
boss, Omid, and David Fischer, the most senior leader on my team, were steadfast supporters and did 
not allow others to take over parts of my job. 

Slowly, it began to dawn on me that my job did not really require that I spend twelve full hours a 
day in the office. I became much more efficient — more vigilant about only attending or setting up 
meetings that were truly necessary, more determined to maximize my output during every minute I 
spent away from home. I also started paying more attention to the working hours of those around me; 
cutting unnecessary meetings saved time for them as well. I tried to focus on what really mattered. 
Long before I saw the poster, I began to adopt the mantra "Done is better than perfect." Done, while 
still a challenge, turns out to be far more achievable and often a relief. By the time I took my second 
maternity leave, I not only unplugged (mostly), but really enjoyed the time with both my children. 

My sister-in-law, Amy, a doctor, experienced almost the exact same evolution in attitude. "When I 
had my first child, I worked twelve-hour days while trying to pump at work," she told me. "I wanted 
to feel connected to my baby in the limited hours that I was home, so I made myself her sole caregiver 
many nights. I believed that others were demanding this of me — my bosses at work and my daughter 
at home. But in truth, I was torturing myself." With the birth of her second child, Amy adjusted her 
behavior. "I took three months off and handled my return to work in my own way, on my own terms. 
And despite what I had previously feared, my reputation and productivity weren't hurt a bit." 

I deeply understand the fear of appearing to be putting our families above our careers. Mothers 
don't want to be perceived as less dedicated to their jobs than men or women without family 
responsibilities. We overwork to overcompensate. Even in workplaces that offer reduced or flextime 

9 

arrangements, people fear that reducing their hours will jeopardize their career prospects. And this is 
not just a perception problem. Employees who make use of flexible work policies are often penalized 
and seen as less committed than their peers.'" And those penalties can be greater for mothers in 
professional jobs." This all needs to change, especially since new evidence suggests working from 

12 

home might actually be more productive in certain cases. " 



It is difficult to distinguish between the aspects of a job that are truly necessary and those that are 
not. Sometimes the situation is hard to read and the lines are hard to draw. Amy told me about a 
conference dinner she attended with a group of fellow physicians, including one who had given birth 
to her first child several weeks earlier. About two hours into the meal, the new mom was looking 
uncomfortable, glancing repeatedly at her cell phone. As a mother herself, Amy was sensitive to the 
situation. "Do you need to leave and pump?" she whispered to her colleague. The new mom 
sheepishly admitted that she had brought her baby and her mother to the conference. She was looking 
at her cell phone because her mother was texting her that the baby needed to be fed. Amy encouraged 
the new mom to leave immediately. Once she left, the young mother's mentor, an older male 
physician, admitted that he had no idea that she had brought her baby. If he had known, he would have 
encouraged her to leave earlier. She was torturing herself unnecessarily. This is one instance where I 
would have recommended not to sit at the table. 

Technology is also changing the emphasis on strict office hours since so much work can be 
conducted online. While few companies can provide as much flexibility as Google and Facebook, 
other industries are starting to move in a similar direction. Still, the traditional practice of judging 
employees by face time rather than results unfortunately persists. Because of this, many employees 
focus on hours clocked in the office rather than on achieving their goals as efficiently as possible. A 
shift to focusing more on results would benefit individuals and make companies more efficient and 
competitive. 

In his latest book, General Colin Powell explains that his vision of leadership rejects "busy 
bastards" who put in long hours at the office without realizing the impact they have on their staff. He 
explains that "in every senior job I've had I've tried to create an environment of professionalism and 
the very highest standards. When it was necessary to get a job done, I expected my subordinates to 
work around the clock. When that was not necessary, I wanted them to work normal hours, go home at 
a decent time, play with the kids, enjoy family and friends, read a novel, clear their heads, daydream, 
and refresh themselves. I wanted them to have a life outside the office. I am paying them for the 
quality of their work, not for the hours they work. That kind of environment has always produced the 

14 

best results for me." It is still far too rare to work for someone as wise as General Powell. 

A related issue that affects many Americans is the extension of working hours. 15 In 2009, married 
middle-income parents worked about eight and a half hours more per week than in 1979. 16 This trend 

17 

has been particularly pronounced among professionals and managers, especially men. A survey of 
high-earning professionals in the corporate world found that 62 percent work more than fifty hours a 
week and 10 percent work more than eighty hours per week. Technology, while liberating us at times 
from the physical office, has also extended the workday. A 2012 survey of employed adults showed 
that 80 percent of the respondents continued to work after leaving the office, 38 percent checked e- 
mail at the dinner table, and 69 percent can't go to bed without checking their in-box." 

My mother believes that my generation is suffering greatly from this endless work schedule. During 
her childhood and mine, a full-time job meant forty hours a week — Monday through Friday, 9:00 a.m. 
to 5:00 p.m. She tells me over and over, "There's too much pressure on you and your peers. It's not 
compatible with a normal life." But this is the new normal for many of us. 



The new normal means that there are just not enough hours in the day. For years, I attempted to 
solve this problem by skimping on sleep, a common but often counterproductive approach. I realized 
my mistake partially from observing my children and seeing how a happy child can melt into a puddle 
of tears when he's shy a couple hours of sleep. It turns out that adults aren't much different. Sleeping 
four or five hours a night induces mental impairment equivalent to a blood alcohol level above the 

20 

legal driving limit." Sleep deprivation makes people anxious, irritable, and confused. (Just ask Dave.) 
If I could go back and change one thing about how I lived in those early years, I would force myself to 
get more sleep. 

It's not only working parents who are looking for more hours in the day; people without children 
are also overworked, maybe to an even greater extent. When I was in business school, I attended a 
Women in Consulting panel with three speakers: two married women with children and one single 
woman without children. After the married women spoke about how hard it was to balance their lives, 
the single woman interjected that she was tired of people not taking her need to have a life seriously. 
She felt that her colleagues were always rushing off to be with their families, leaving her to pick up 
the slack. She argued, "My coworkers should understand that I need to go to a party tonight — and this 
is just as legitimate as their kids' soccer game — because going to a party is the only way I might 
actually meet someone and start a family so I can have a soccer game to go to one day!" I often quote 
this story to make sure single employees know that they, too, have every right to a full life. 

My own concerns about combining my career and family rose to the forefront again when I was 
considering leaving Google for Facebook. I had been at Google for six and a half years and had strong 
leaders in place for each of my teams. By then, Google had more than 20,000 employees and business 
procedures that ran smoothly and allowed me to make it home for dinner with my children almost 
every night. Facebook, on the other hand, had only 550 employees and was much more of a start-up. 
Late night meetings and all-night hackathons were an accepted part of the culture. I worried that 
taking a new job might undermine the balance I had worked hard to achieve. It helped that Dave was 
working as an entrepreneur-in-residence at a venture capital firm, so he had almost complete control 
of his schedule. He assured me that he would take on more at home to make this work for our family. 

My first six months at Facebook were really hard. I know I'm supposed to say "challenging," but 
"really hard" is more like it. A lot of the company followed Mark's lead and worked night-owl 
engineering hours. I would schedule a meeting with someone for 9:00 a.m. and the person would not 
show up, assuming that I meant 9:00 p.m. I needed to be around when others were and I worried that 
leaving too early would make me stand out like a sore — and old — thumb. I missed dinner after dinner 
with my kids. Dave told me that he was home with them and they were fine. But I was not. 

I thought about Larry Kanarek's speech back at McKinsey and realized that if I didn't take control 
of the situation, my new job would prove unsustainable. I would resent not seeing my family and run 
the risk of becoming the employee who quit with unused vacation time. I started forcing myself to 
leave the office at five thirty. Every competitive, type-A fiber of my being was screaming at me to 
stay, but unless I had a critical meeting, I walked out that door. And once I did it, I learned that I 
could. I am not claiming, nor have I ever claimed, that I work a forty-hour week. Facebook is 
available around the world 24/7, and for the most part, so am I. The days when I even think of 
unplugging for a weekend or vacation are long gone. And unlike my job at Google, which was based 



almost exclusively in California, my Facebook role requires a lot of travel. As a result, I have become 
even more vigilant about leaving the office to have dinner with my children when I'm not on the road. 

I still struggle with the trade-offs between work and home on a daily basis. Every woman I know 
does, and I know that I'm far luckier than most. I have remarkable resources — a husband who is a real 
partner, the ability to hire great people to assist me both in the office and at home, and a good measure 
of control over my schedule. I also have a wonderful sister who lives close by and is always willing to 
take care of her niece and nephew, occasionally at a moment's notice. She's even a pediatrician, so my 
kids are not just in loving hands, they're in medically trained hands. (Not all people are close to their 
family, either geographically or emotionally. Fortunately, friends can be leaned on to provide this type 
of support for each other.) 

If there is a new normal for the workplace, there is a new normal for the home too. Just as 
expectations for how many hours people will work have risen dramatically, so have expectations for 
how many hours mothers will spend focused on their children. In 1975, stay-at-home mothers spent an 
average of about eleven hours per week on primary child care (defined as routine caregiving and 
activities that foster a child's well-being, such as reading and fully focused play). Mothers employed 
outside the home in 1975 spent six hours doing these activities. Today, stay-at-home mothers spend 
about seventeen hours per week on primary child care, on average, while mothers who work outside 
the home spend about eleven hours. This means that an employed mother today spends about the same 
amount of time on primary child care activities as a nonemployed mother did in 1975."' 

My memory of being a kid is that my mother was available but rarely hovering or directing my 
activities. My siblings and I did not have organized playdates. We rode our bikes around the 
neighborhood without adult supervision. Our parents might have checked on our homework once in a 
while, but they rarely sat with us while we completed it. Today, a "good mother" is always around and 
always devoted to the needs of her children. Sociologists call this relatively new phenomenon 
"intensive mothering," and it has culturally elevated the importance of women spending large amounts 
of time with their children."" Being judged against the current all-consuming standard means mothers 
who work outside the home feel as if we are failing, even if we are spending the same number of 
hours with our kids as our mothers did. 

When I drop my kids off at school and see the mothers who are staying to volunteer, I worry that 
my children are worse off because I'm not with them full-time. This is where my trust in hard data and 
research has helped me the most. Study after study suggests that the pressure society places on women 
to stay home and do "what's best for the child" is based on emotion, not evidence. 

In 1991, the Early Child Care Research Network, under the auspices of the National Institute of 
Child Health and Human Development, initiated the most ambitious and comprehensive study to date 
on the relationship between child care and child development, and in particular on the effect of 
exclusive maternal care versus child care. The Research Network, which comprised more than thirty 
child development experts from leading universities across the country, spent eighteen months 
designing the study. They tracked more than one thousand children over the course of fifteen years, 
repeatedly assessing the children's cognitive skills, language abilities, and social behaviors. Dozens of 
papers have been published about what they found." 3 In 2006, the researchers released a report 



summarizing their findings, which concluded that "children who were cared for exclusively by their 

24 

mothers did not develop differently than those who were also cared for by others."" They found no 
gap in cognitive skills, language competence, social competence, ability to build and maintain 
relationships, or in the quality of the mother-child bond. 25 Parental behavioral factors — including 
fathers who are responsive and positive, mothers who favor "self-directed child behavior," and parents 
with emotional intimacy in their marriages — influence a child's development two to three times more 
than any form of child care." 6 One of the findings is worth reading slowly, maybe even twice: 
"Exclusive maternal care was not related to better or worse outcomes for children. There is, thus, no 
reason for mothers to feel as though they are harming their children if they decide to work." 27 

Children absolutely need parental involvement, love, care, time, and attention. But parents who 
work outside the home are still capable of giving their children a loving and secure childhood. Some 
data even suggest that having two parents working outside the home can be advantageous to a child's 
development, particularly for girls." 8 

Although I know the data and understand intellectually that my career is not harming my children, 
there are times when I still feel anxious about my choices. A friend of mine felt the same way, so she 
discussed it with her therapist and, later, shared this insight: "My therapist told me that when I was 
worrying about how much I was leaving my girls, that separation anxiety is actually more about the 
mom than the kids. We talk about it as though it is a problem for children, but actually it can be more 
of an issue for the mom." 

I always want to do more for my children. Because of work obligations, I've missed doctor's 
appointments and parent-teacher conferences and have had to travel when my kids were sick. I haven't 
missed a dance recital yet, but it probably will happen. I have also missed a level of detail about their 
lives. I once asked a mother at our school if she knew any of the other kids in the first-grade class, 
hoping for a familiar name or two. She spent twenty minutes reciting from memory the name of every 
child, detailing their parents, siblings, which class they had been in the year before, and their interests. 
How could she possibly know all this? Was I a bad mother for not knowing any of this? And why 
should it even bother me? 

I knew the answer to that last question. It bothered me because like most people who have choices, I 
am not completely comfortable with mine. Later that same year, I dropped my son off at school on St. 
Patrick's Day. As he got out of the car wearing his favorite blue T-shirt, the same mother pointed out, 
"He's supposed to be wearing green today." I simultaneously thought, Oh, who the hell can remember 
that it's St. Patrick's Day? and I'm a bad mom. 

Guilt management can be just as important as time management for mothers. When I went back to 
my job after giving birth, other working mothers told me to prepare for the day that my son would cry 
for his nanny. Sure enough, when he was about eleven months old, he was crawling on the floor of his 
room and put his knee down on a toy. He looked up for help, crying, and reached for her instead of 
me. It pierced my heart, but Dave thought it was a good sign. He reasoned that we were the central 
figures in our son's life, but forming an attachment to a caregiver was good for his development. I 
understood his logic, especially in retrospect, but at the time, it hurt like hell. 



To this day, I count the hours away from my kids and feel sad when I miss a dinner or a night with 
them. Did I have to take this trip? Was this speech really critical for Facebook? Was this meeting truly 
necessary? Far from worrying about nights he misses, Dave thinks we are heroes for getting home for 
dinner as often as we do. Our different viewpoints seem inextricably gender based. Compared to his 
peers, Dave is an exceptionally devoted dad. Compared to many of my peers, I spend a lot more time 
away from my children. A study that conducted in-depth interviews with mothers and fathers in dual- 
earner families uncovered similar reactions. The mothers were riddled with guilt about what their jobs 

29 

were doing to their families. The fathers were not." As Marie Wilson, founder of the White House 
Project, has noted, "Show me a woman without guilt and I'll show you a man." 30 

I know that I can easily spend time focusing on what I'm not doing; like many, I excel at self- 
flagellation. And even with my vast support system, there are times when I feel pulled in too many 
directions. But when I dwell less on the conflicts and compromises, and more on being fully engaged 
with the task at hand, the center holds and I feel content. I love my job and the brilliant and fascinating 
people I work with. I also love my time with my kids. A great day is when I rush home from the 
craziness of the office to have dinner with my family and then sit in the rocking chair in the corner of 
my daughter's room with both of my kids on my lap. We rock and read together, just a quiet (okay, 
not always quiet), joyful moment at the end of their day. They drift off to sleep and I drift (okay, run) 
back to my laptop. 

It's also fun when my two worlds collide. For a period of time, Mark hosted Monday-night strategy 
sessions at his house. Because I wouldn't be making it home for dinner, my kids came into the office. 
Facebook is incredibly family friendly, and my children were in heaven, entranced by pizza, endless 
candy, and the huge pile of Legos that the engineers kindly share with young visitors. It made me 
happy that my kids got to know my colleagues and my colleagues got to know them. Mark had been 
teaching my son how to fence, so they would sometimes practice with pretend foils, which was 
adorable. Mark also taught both my kids various office pranks, which was slightly less adorable. 

I would never claim to be able to find serenity or total focus in every moment. I am so far from that. 
But when I remember that no one can do it all and identify my real priorities at home and at work, I 
feel better, and I am more productive in the office and probably a better mother as well. Stanford 
professor Jennifer Aaker's work shows that setting obtainable goals is key to happiness. 3 ' Instead of 
perfection, we should aim for sustainable and fulfilling. The right question is not "Can I do it all?" but 
"Can I do what's most important for me and my family?" The aim is to have children who are happy 
and thriving. Wearing green T-shirts on St. Patrick's Day is purely optional. 

If I had to embrace a definition of success, it would be that success is making the best choices we 
can ... and accepting them. Journalist Mary Curtis suggested in The Washington Post that the best 
advice anyone can offer "is for women and men to drop the guilt trip, even as the minutes tick away. 
The secret is there is no secret — just doing the best you can with what you've got." 32 

In December 2010, I was standing with Pat Mitchell, waiting to go onstage to give my TED Talk. 
The day before, I had dropped my daughter off at preschool and told her I was flying to the East Coast 
so I wouldn't see her that night. She clung to my leg and begged me not to leave. I couldn't shake that 
image and, at the last minute, asked Pat if I should add it to my speech. "Absolutely tell that story," 



said Pat. "Other women go through this, and you'll help them by being honest that this is hard for you 
too." 

I took a deep breath and stepped onstage. I tried to be authentic and shared my truth. I announced to 
the room — and basically everyone on the internet — that I fall very short of doing it all. And Pat was 
right. It felt really good not just to admit this to myself, but to share it with others. 

10 



Let's Start Talking About It 



Sometimes i wonder what it would be like to go through life without being labeled by my gender. I don't 
wake up thinking, What am I going to do today as Facebook's female COO?, but that's often how I'm 
referred to by others. When people talk about a female pilot, a female engineer, or a female race car 
driver, the word "female" implies a bit of surprise. Men in the professional world are rarely seen 
through this same gender lens. A Google search for "Facebook's male CEO" returns this message: 
"No results found." 

As Gloria Steinem observed, "Whoever has power takes over the noun — and the norm — while the 
less powerful get an adjective."' Since no one wants to be perceived as less powerful, a lot of women 
reject the gender identification and insist, "I don't see myself as a woman; I see myself as a novelist/ 
athlete/professional/fill-in-the -blank." They are right to do so. No one wants her achievements 
modified. We all just want to be the noun. Yet the world has a way of reminding women that they are 
women, and girls that they are girls. 

In between my junior and senior years of high school, I worked as a page in Washington, D.C., for 
my hometown congressman, William Lehman. The Speaker of the House at the time was the 
legendary Massachusetts representative Tip O'Neill, and Congressman Lehman promised to introduce 
me to him before the summer ended. But as the days ticked by, it didn't happen. And it didn't happen. 
Then, on the very last day of the session, he made good on his promise. In the hall outside the House 
floor, he pulled me over to meet Speaker O'Neill. I was nervous, but Congressman Lehman put me at 
ease by introducing me in the nicest way possible, telling the Speaker that I had worked hard all 
summer. The Speaker looked at me, then reached over and patted my head. He turned to the 
congressman and remarked, "She's pretty." Then he turned his attention back to me and asked just one 
question: "Are you a pom-pom girl?" 

I was crushed. Looking back, I know his words were intended to flatter me, but in the moment, I 
felt belittled. I wanted to be recognized for the work I had done. I reacted defensively. "No," I replied. 
"I study too much for that." Then a wave of terror struck me for speaking up to the man who was third 
in line for the presidency. But no one seemed to register my curt and not-at-all clever response. The 
Speaker just patted me on the head — again! — and moved along. My congressman beamed. 



Even to my teenage self, this sexism seemed retro. The Speaker was born in 1912, eight years 
before women were given the right to vote, but by the time I met him in the halls of Congress, society 
had (mostly) evolved. It was obvious that a woman could do anything a man could do. My childhood 
was filled with firsts — Golda Meir in Israel, Geraldine Ferraro on the Mondale ticket, Sandra Day 
O'Connor on the Supreme Court, Sally Ride in space. 

Given all these strides, I headed into college believing that the feminists of the sixties and seventies 
had done the hard work of achieving equality for my generation. And yet, if anyone had called me a 
feminist, I would have quickly corrected that notion. This reaction is prevalent even today according 
to sociologist Marianne Cooper (who also contributed her extraordinary research assistance to this 
book). In her 2011 article, "The New F-Word," Marianne wrote about college English professor 
Michele Elam, who observed something strange in her Introduction to Feminist Studies course. Even 
though her students were interested enough in gender equality to take an entire class on the subject, 
very few "felt comfortable using the word 'feminism.' " And even "fewer identified themselves as 
feminists." As Professor Elam noted, it was as if "being called a feminist was to suspect that some foul 

2 

epithet had been hurled your way."" 

It sounds like a joke: Did you hear the one about the woman taking a feminist studies class who got 
angry when someone called her a feminist? But when I was in college, I embraced the same 
contradiction. On one hand, I started a group to encourage more women to major in economics and 
government. On the other hand, I would have denied being in any way, shape, or form a feminist. 
None of my college friends thought of themselves as feminists either. It saddens me to admit that we 
did not see the backlash against women around us. We accepted the negative caricature of a bra- 
burning, humorless, man-hating feminist. She was not someone we wanted to emulate, in part because 
it seemed like she couldn't get a date. Horrible, I know — the sad irony of rejecting feminism to get 
male attention and approval. In our defense, my friends and I truly, if naively, believed that the world 
did not need feminists anymore. We mistakenly thought that there was nothing left to fight for. 

I carried this attitude with me when I entered the workforce. I figured if sexism still existed, I would 
just prove it wrong. I would do my job and do it well. What I didn't know at the time was that 
ignoring the issue is a classic survival technique. Within traditional institutions, success has often been 
contingent upon a woman not speaking out but fitting in, or more colloquially, being "one of the 
guys." The first women to enter corporate America dressed in manly suits with button-down shirts. 
One veteran banking executive told me that she wore her hair in a bun for ten years because she did 
not want anyone to notice she was a woman. While styles have relaxed, women still worry about 
sticking out too much. I know an engineer at a tech start-up who removes her earrings before going to 
work so coworkers won't be reminded that she is — shhh! — not a man. 

Early in my career, my gender was rarely noted (except for the occasional client who wanted to fix 
me up with his son). Manly suits were no longer in fashion, and I neither hid nor emphasized 
femininity. I have never reported directly to a woman — not once in my entire career. There were 
higher-level women at the places I worked, but I wasn't close enough to see how they dealt with this 
issue on a daily basis. I was never invited to attend a single meeting that discussed gender, and there 
were no special programs for women that I can recall. That all seemed fine. We were fitting in, and 
there was no reason to call attention to ourselves. 



But while gender was not openly acknowledged, it was still lurking below the surface. I started to 
see differences in attitudes toward women. I started noticing how often employees were judged not by 
their objective performance, but by the subjective standard of how well they fit in. Given that the 
summer outing at McKinsey was a deep-sea fishing trip and most company dinners ended with 
whiskey sipping and cigar smoking, I sometimes struggled to pass the "fitting in" test. One night, 
encouraged by the male partners, I puffed away on a cigar — just one of the guys. Except that the 
smoking nauseated me and I reeked of cigar smoke for days. If that was fitting in, I stuck out. 

Others also seemed aware that I was not one of the guys. When I was named the Treasury 
Department's chief of staff in 1999, several people remarked to me, "It must have helped that you 
were a woman." It was infuriating. Their intent may not have been malicious, but the implication was 
clear: I had not gotten the job on merit. I also figured that for every person pointing out my 
"advantage" to my face, there were probably a dozen others saying it less politely behind my back. I 
considered my possible responses. I could explain that the last time I checked there was no affirmative 
action for women at Treasury. I could mention that my credentials lined up with those of the men who 
had previously held this position. If there was enough time, I could recount centuries of discrimination 
against women. Or I could just slap the person across the face. I tried all these options at least once. 
Okay, not the slap. But of the responses I did try, none of them worked. 

It was a no-win situation. I couldn't deny being a woman; even if I tried, people would still figure it 
out. And defending myself just made me seem . . . defensive. My gut and the signals I received from 
others cautioned me that arguing the issue would make me sound like a strident feminist. And I still 
did not want that. I also worried that pointing out the disadvantages women face in the workforce 
might be misinterpreted as whining or asking for special treatment. So I ignored the comments. I put 
my head down and worked hard. 

Then, as the years ticked by, I started seeing female friends and colleagues drop out of the 
workforce. Some left by choice. Others left out of frustration, pushed out the door by companies that 
did not allow flexibility and welcomed home by partners who weren't doing their share of the 
housework and child rearing. Others remained but scaled back their ambitions to meet outsized 
demands. I watched as the promise my generation had for female leadership dwindled. By the time I 
had been at Google for a few years, I realized that the problem wasn't going away. So even though the 
thought still scared me, I decided it was time to stop putting my head down and to start speaking out. 

Fortunately, I had company. In 2005, my colleagues Susan Wojcicki and Marissa Mayer and I all 
noticed that the speakers who visited the Google campus were fascinating, notable, and almost always 
male. In response, we founded Women ©Google and kicked off the new series with luminaries Gloria 
Steinem and Jane Fonda, who were launching the Women's Media Center. As a former aerobics 
instructor, I was excited to meet Jane Fonda — and sucked in my stomach the whole time. From what I 
knew about the women's rights movement, I expected Gloria Steinem to be formidable and brilliant, 
which she was. But she was also charming and funny and warm — the absolute opposite of my childish 
image of the humorless feminist. 

After the Women@Google event, Gloria invited me to speak at the Women's Media Center in New 
York. I said yes without hesitating. The day before the talk, I headed to the airport with Kim Malone 



Scott, who ran the Google publishing teams. Kim is an experienced writer, so I figured she would help 
me craft a speech during the long flight. By the time I got through all of my backlogged e-mails, it was 
almost midnight. I turned to Kim for help and saw that she had fallen asleep. Long before Facebook 
made it popular, I thought about giving her a poke. But I couldn't bear to wake her up. Staring at the 
blank computer screen, I was at a complete loss. I had never spoken about being a woman in public 
before. Not once. I had no talking points or notes to turn to. Then I realized how striking this 
was . . . and that I actually had quite a lot to say. 

I began my talk the next day by explaining that in business we are taught to fit in, but that I was 
starting to think this might not be the right approach. I said out loud that there are differences between 
men and women both in their behavior and in the way their behavior is perceived by others. I admitted 
that I could see these dynamics playing out in the workforce, and that, in order to fix the problems, we 
needed to be able to talk about gender without people thinking we were crying for help, asking for 
special treatment, or about to sue. A lot poured out of me that day. Then I returned to Northern 
California and put the conversation on hold. 

In the following four years, I gave two talks on women in the workplace, both behind closed doors 
to professional women's groups at nearby Stanford. Then one day, Pat Mitchell called to tell me that 
she was launching TEDWomen and invited me to speak on social media. I told her I had another 
subject in mind and started pulling together a talk on how women can succeed in the workforce (a talk 
that TED later named "Why We Have Too Few Women Leaders"). Very quickly, I became excited. 
And just as quickly, I learned that no one else shared my excitement. Friends and colleagues — both 
male and female — warned me that making this speech would harm my career by instantly typecasting 
me as a female COO and not a real business executive. In other words, I wouldn't be blending in. 

I worried they might be right. Speaking at TED would be different from my previous keynotes. 
Although I would be addressing a sympathetic room, the talk would be posted on the web, where 
anyone could watch, and judge, and criticize. 

Inside Facebook, few people noticed my TEDTalk, and those who did responded positively. But 
outside of Facebook, the criticism started to roll in. One of my colleagues from Treasury called to say 
that "others" — not him, of course — were wondering why I gave more speeches on women's issues 
than on Facebook. I had been at the company for two and a half years and given countless speeches on 
rebuilding marketing around the social graph and exactly one speech on gender. Someone else asked 
me, "So is this your thing now?" 

At the time, I didn't know how to respond. Now I would say yes. I made this my "thing" because 
we need to disrupt the status quo. Staying quiet and fitting in may have been all the first generations of 
women who entered corporate America could do; in some cases, it might still be the safest path. But 
this strategy is not paying off for women as a group. Instead, we need to speak out, identify the 
barriers that are holding women back, and find solutions. 

The response to my TEDTalk showed me that addressing these issues openly can make a difference. 
Women forwarded the video to their friends, colleagues, daughters, and sisters. I began receiving e- 
mails and letters from women all over the world who wanted to share their stories of how they gained 
the courage to reach for more opportunities, sit at more tables, and believe more in themselves. 



One of my favorite letters came from Sabeen Virani, a consultant in Dubai and the only woman in 
an office of more than three hundred employees. She responded to my story about the executive who 
could not point me to the women's bathroom because, as she explained, in her workplace, the 
women's bathroom did not even exist. Sabeen described how during her first week on the project, the 
client took her team out to dinner, but she couldn't join because the restaurant didn't allow women. 
Talk about not sitting at the table — she couldn't even get into the restaurant! Some of the men were 
openly hostile to Sabeen. Others just ignored her. But rather than give up and transfer to a friendlier 
office, she decided that she could demonstrate to everyone that women are competent professionals. In 
the end, she won her coworkers over and the client converted a bathroom into a women's bathroom 
just for her. She sent me a photo of her standing in front of a door with a printed sign that read simply 
and powerfully "Toilets for women only." 

It was also enormously gratifying that men reacted positively to the talk too. Dr. John Probasco of 
the Johns Hopkins University School of Medicine told me that my story about women being more 
reluctant than men to raise their hands rang true for him so he decided to do away with the old hand- 
raising system during rounds. Instead, he started calling on male and female students evenly. He 
quickly realized that the women knew the answers just as well — or even better — than the men. In one 
day he increased female participation. By making one small change to his behavior, he changed a 
much larger dynamic. 

Major changes can result from these kinds of "nudge techniques," small interventions that 
encourage people to behave in slightly different ways at critical moments. 4 The simple act of talking 
openly about behavioral patterns makes the subconscious conscious. For example, Google has an 
unusual system where engineers nominate themselves for promotions, and the company found that 
men nominated themselves more quickly than women. The Google management team shared this data 
openly with the female employees, and women's self-nomination rates rose significantly, reaching 
roughly the same rates as men's. 

All the feedback from TED convinced me that I should keep speaking up and encouraging others to 
do the same. It is essential to breaking the logjam. Talking can transform minds, which can transform 
behaviors, which can transform institutions. 

I know it isn't easy. Anyone who brings up gender in the workplace is wading into deep and muddy 
waters. The subject itself presents a paradox, forcing us to acknowledge differences while trying to 
achieve the goal of being treated the same. Women, especially those at junior levels, worry that raising 
gender issues makes them appear unprofessional or as if they are blaming others. I have listened to 
women vent frustration over being undervalued and even demeaned on a daily basis at work. When I 
ask if they have aired any of these complaints to their superiors, they've responded, "Oh no! I 
couldn't." There is so much fear that speaking up will make the situation worse or even result in being 
penalized or fired. It seems safer to bear the injustice. 

For men, raising this subject can be even harder. A male friend who runs a large organization once 
confided in me, "It's easier to talk about your sex life in public than to talk about gender." The fact 
that he wouldn't go on record with this quote shows he meant it. Vittorio Colao, CEO of Vodafone, 
told me that he showed my TEDTalk to his senior management team because he shares my belief that 



women sometimes hold themselves back. He also believed this message was easier to hear from a 
woman than a man. His point is valid. If a man had delivered the same message or even gently pointed 
out that women might be taking actions that limited their options, he would have been pilloried. 

Shutting down discussion is self-defeating and impedes progress. We need to talk and listen and 
debate and refute and instruct and learn and evolve. And since the majority of managers are men, we 
need them to feel comfortable addressing these issues directly with female employees. When a woman 
sits on the side of a room, a man needs to be able to wave her over to the table and explain why so she 
will know to sit at the table the next time. 

Ken Chenault, CEO of American Express, is a leader on this front. Ken openly acknowledges that 
in meetings, both men and women are more likely to interrupt a woman and give credit to a man for 
an idea first proposed by a woman. When he witnesses either of these behaviors, he stops the meeting 
to point it out. Coming from the top, this really makes employees think twice. A more junior woman 
(or man) can also intervene in the situation when a female colleague has been interrupted. She can 
gently but firmly tell the group, "Before we move on, I'd like to hear what [senior woman] had to 
say." This action not only benefits the senior woman but can raise the stature of the junior woman as 
well, since speaking up for someone else displays both confidence and a communal spirit. The junior 
woman comes across as both competent and nice. 

At Facebook, I teach managers to encourage women to talk about their plans to have children and 
help them continue to reach for opportunities. I give men the option of quoting me if the words don't 
feel right coming out of their mouths. Still, this approach is a bit of a crutch and it does not translate to 
other companies. It would be preferable if everyone had permission to talk about this subject both 
publicly and behind closed office doors. 

One stumbling block is that many people believe that the workplace is largely a meritocracy, which 
means we look at individuals, not groups, and determine that differences in outcomes must be based 
on merit, not gender. Men at the top are often unaware of the benefits they enjoy simply because 
they're men, and this can make them blind to the disadvantages associated with being a woman. 
Women lower down also believe that men at the top are entitled to be there, so they try to play by the 
rules and work harder to advance rather than raise questions or voice concerns about the possibility of 
bias. As a result, everyone becomes complicit in perpetuating an unjust system. 

At the same time, we must be careful not to inject gender into every discussion. I know a male CEO 
who is enormously dedicated to hiring and promoting women. When a female employee kicked off a 
negotiation by insisting that she should have a higher title and was underleveled because she was a 
woman, it immediately put him on the defense. She was speaking her truth, but in this case, her truth 
was an accusation with legal ramifications. As soon as she framed the issue in those terms, the CEO 
had no choice but to put their friendly talks on hold and call in HR. It might have served her better to 
explain how she was contributing to the company and ask for the promotion first. 

Even today, mentioning gender in work situations often makes people visibly uncomfortable. To 
their credit, many institutions have worked hard to sensitize people to these issues, especially sexual 
harassment. But while human resources seminars can raise consciousness and help protect employees, 
they have also raised the specter of legal action, which can create real barriers to these conversations. 



The federal and state laws that are designed to protect employees against discrimination specify only 
that an employer cannot make decisions based on certain protected characteristics such as gender, 
pregnancy, and age. But companies usually take the policy a step further and teach managers not to 
ask anything related to these areas. Anyone making even a benign inquiry such as "Are you married?" 
or "Do you have kids?" can later be accused of basing a personnel decision on this information. As a 
result, a manager who is trying to help a female employee by pointing out a gender-driven style 
difference could be charged with discrimination for doing so. 

The first time I asked a prospective employee if she was considering having children soon, I 
understood that doing so could expose me and my company to legal risk. Unlike many women, I was 
in a position to evaluate that risk and chose to take it. The laws that protect women and minorities and 
people with disabilities, among others, from discrimination are essential, and I am not suggesting they 
be circumvented. But I have also witnessed firsthand how they can have a chilling effect on discourse, 
sometimes even to the detriment of the people they are designed to defend. I don't have a solution to 
this dilemma and will leave it to public policy and legal experts to solve. I do think this is worth some 
serious attention so we can find a way to deal with these issues in a way that protects but doesn't 
suppress. 

Most people would agree that gender bias exists ... in others. We, however, would never be swayed 
by such superficial and unenlightened opinions. Except we are. Our preconceived notions about 
masculinity and femininity influence how we interact with and evaluate colleagues in the workplace. 
A 2012 study found that when evaluating identical resumes for a lab manager position from a male 
student and a female student, scientists of both sexes gave better marks to the male applicant. Even 
though the students had the same qualifications and experience, the scientists deemed the female 
student less competent and offered her a lower starting salary and less mentoring. Other studies of job 
applicants, candidates for scholarships, and musicians auditioning for orchestras have come to the 
same conclusion: gender bias influences how we view performance and typically raises our 
assessment of men while lowering our assessment of women. 6 Even today, gender-blind evaluations 

7 

still result in better outcomes for women. Unfortunately, most jobs require face-to-face interviews. 

All of us, myself included, are biased, whether we admit it or not. And thinking that we are 
objective can actually make this even worse, creating what social scientists call a "bias blind spot." 
This blind spot causes people to be too confident about their own powers of objectivity so that they 
fail to correct for bias. 8 When evaluating identically described male and female candidates for the job 
of police chief, respondents who claimed to be the most impartial actually exhibited more bias in favor 
of male candidates. This is not just counterproductive but deeply dangerous. Evaluators in that same 
study actually shifted hiring criteria to give men an advantage. When a male applicant possessed a 
strong educational record, that quality was considered critical to the success of a police chief. But 
when a male applicant possessed a weaker educational record, that quality was rated as less important. 
This favoritism was not shown to female applicants. If anything, the reverse happened. When a 
woman possessed a particular skill, ability, or background, that quality tended to carry less weight. 
The infuriating takeaway from this study is that "merit" can be manipulated to justify discrimination/ 

Social scientists are uncovering new examples of bias all the time. In 2012, a series of studies 
compared men in more "modern" marriages (whose wives worked outside the home full-time) to men 



in more "traditional" marriages (whose wives worked at home). The researchers wanted to determine 
if a man's home arrangement affected his professional behavior. It did. Compared to men in modern 
marriages, men in more traditional marriages viewed the presence of women in the workforce less 
favorably. They also denied promotions to qualified female employees more often and were more 
likely to think that companies with a higher percentage of female employees ran less smoothly. The 
researchers speculated that men in traditional marriages are not overtly hostile toward women but 
instead are "benevolent sexists" — holding positive yet outdated views about women. 10 (Another term I 
have heard is "nice guy misogynists.") These men might even believe that women have superior 
strengths in certain areas like moral reasoning, which makes them better equipped to raise children — 
and perhaps less equipped to succeed in business." In all likelihood, men who share this attitude are 
unaware of how their conscious and unconscious beliefs hurt their female colleagues. 

Another bias arises from our tendency to want to work with people who are like us. Inno visor, a 
consulting firm, conducted research in twenty-nine countries and found that when men and women 
select a colleague to collaborate with, both were significantly more likely to choose someone of the 

12 L3 

same gender. " Yet diverse groups often perform better. Armed with this information, managers 
should take a more active role in mixing and matching when assigning teams. Or, at the very least, 
managers should point out this tendency to give employees the motivation to shake things up. 

My own attempts to point out gender bias have generated more than my fair share of eye rolling 
from others. At best, people are open to scrutinizing themselves and considering their blind spots; at 
worst, they become defensive and angry. One common instance of bias crops up during job 
performance evaluations. When reviewing a woman, the reviewer will often voice the concern, "While 
she's really good at her job, she's just not as well liked by her peers." When I hear language like that, I 
bring up the Heidi/Howard study and how success and likeability are negatively correlated for women. 
I ask the evaluator to consider the possibility that this successful female may be paying a gender-based 
penalty. Usually people find the study credible, nodding their heads in agreement, but then bristle at 
the suggestion that this might be influencing the reaction of their management team. They will further 
defend their position by arguing that it cannot be gender related because — aha! — both men and 
women have problems with that particular female executive. But the success and likeability penalty is 
imposed by both men and women. Women perpetuate this bias as well. 

Of course, not every woman deserves to be well liked. Some women are disliked for behaviors that 
they would do well to change. In a perfect world, they would receive constructive feedback and the 
opportunity to make those changes. Still, calling attention to this bias forces people to think about 
whether there is a real problem or a perception problem. The goal is to give women something men 
tend to receive automatically — the benefit of the doubt. 

In turn, women might also want to give their bosses the benefit of the doubt. Cynthia Hogan served 
as chief counsel for the Senate Judiciary Committee under then-senator Joe Biden before leaving in 
1996 after her first child was born. Her plan was to return to the workforce a few years later. But when 
her second child was born prematurely, those plans changed. A full twelve years later, Vice President- 
Elect Biden called Cynthia to ask her to join his staff as chief legal counsel in the White House. "My 
first reaction was that I no longer owned any clothes other than yoga pants!" Cynthia said. But her 
larger concern was whether she could manage the long hours in the White House and still see her 



family. She put it beautifully: "I knew that whether this would work depended on two men. So first I 
asked my husband if he could step in and take on more of the responsibility for the kids. He said, 'Of 
course, it's your turn.' And then I told the Vice President-elect that I really wanted to have dinner 
with my kids most nights. And his response was, 'Well, you have a phone and I can call you when I 
need you after dinnertime.' "' 4 

Cynthia believes that the lesson of her story is "Don't be afraid to ask," even if it seems like a long 
shot. Being offered a senior job, especially after being at home for so long, presented a great 
opportunity. Many women would have accepted it without even trying to carve out the time they 
needed for their families. Others would have turned it down, assuming that having dinner at home 
most nights was not negotiable. Being forthright led to opportunity. 

Every job will demand some sacrifice. The key is to avoid unnecessary sacrifice. This is especially 
hard since our work culture values complete dedication. We worry that even mentioning other 
priorities makes us less valuable employees. I have faced this too. As I described, once I had children, 
I changed my working hours to be home for dinner. But only fairly recently did I start talking about 
this change. And while the impact of my actually leaving work early was negligible, admitting that I 
went home at five thirty turned out to be kind of a big deal. 

I first openly discussed my office hours at the launch of Facebook Women, an in-house resource 
group. The initial meeting, run by Lori Goler and Facebook's head of engineering, Mike Schroepfer, 
was open to any Facebook employee, including men. During the Q&A, I was asked the (inevitable) 
question about how I balanced my job and family. I talked about leaving work to have dinner with my 
children and then getting back online after they went to bed. I said that I was sharing my schedule 
because I wanted to encourage others to personalize their schedules too. Even though I had planned in 
advance to discuss this, I felt nervous. Years of conditioning had taught me never to suggest that I was 
doing anything other than giving 100 percent to my job. It was scary to think that someone, even 
people working for me, might doubt my diligence or dedication. Fortunately, it didn't happen. A few 
people at Facebook thanked me for mentioning it, but that was it. 

A few years later, producer Dyllan McGee interviewed me for her Makers video series. We spoke 
on a wide range of subjects, including my daily work schedule. The video was posted to the web and 
was instantly the subject of heated debate. Thanks to social media (serves me right), everyone had an 
opinion about my leaving the office at five thirty. I got flowers with an anonymous thank- you note. 
Mike Callahan, Yahoo's general counsel at the time, told me that several of the more senior women in 
his legal department said my admission struck a chord and they were going to follow my example. 
Author Ken Auletta said that I could not have gotten more headlines if I had murdered someone with 
an ax. While I was glad to jump-start the discussion, all the attention gave me this weird feeling that 
someone was going to object and fire me. I had to reassure myself that this was absurd. Still, the 
clamor made me realize how incredibly hard it would be for someone in a less-senior position to ask 
for or admit to this schedule. We have a long way to go before flextime is accepted in most 
workplaces. It will only happen if we keep raising the issue. 

The discussions may be difficult, but the positives are many. We cannot change what we are 
unaware of, and once we are aware, we cannot help but change. 



Even a well-established institution like Harvard Business School (HBS) can evolve rapidly when 
issues are addressed head-on. Historically at HBS, American male students have academically 
outperformed both female and international students. When Nitin Nohria was appointed dean in 2010, 
he made it his mission to close this gap. He began by appointing Youngme Moon as senior associate 
dean of the MBA program, the first woman to hold that position in the school's century-plus history. 
He also created a new position for Robin Ely, an expert on gender and diversity. 

Associate Dean Moon, working with Professor Frances Frei, spent the first year rigorously 
examining the school's culture. They visited each classroom and discussed the challenges women and 
international students faced. Then they used that knowledge to create what Dean Nohria calls "a level 
of mindfulness." Without calling for major overhauls, they tackled the soft stuff — small adjustments 
students could make immediately, like paying more attention to the language they used in class. They 
laid out a new, communal definition of leadership: "Leadership is about making others better as a 
result of your presence and making sure that impact lasts in your absence." They held students 
responsible for the impact their behavior had on others. Those who violated that principle, or even 
hosted an event where that principle was violated, were held accountable. The second year, HBS 
introduced small group projects to encourage collaboration between classmates who would not 
naturally work together. They also added a year-long field course, which plays to the strengths of 
students who are less comfortable contributing in front of large classes. 

By commencement, the performance gap had virtually disappeared. Men, women, and international 
students were represented proportionally in the honors awarded. There was another benefit too. In a 
result many considered surprising, overall student satisfaction went up, not just for the female and 
international students, but for American males as well. By creating a more equal environment, 
everyone was happier. And all of this was accomplished in just two short years. 1 

Social gains are never handed out. They must be seized. Leaders of the women's movement — from 
Susan B. Anthony to Jane Addams to Alice Paul to Bella Abzug to Flo Kennedy to so many others — 
spoke out loudly and bravely to demand the rights that we now have. Their courage changed our 
culture and our laws to the benefit of us all. Looking back, it made no sense for my college friends and 
me to distance ourselves from the hard- won achievements of earlier feminists. We should have 
cheered their efforts. Instead, we lowered our voices, thinking the battle was over, and with this 
reticence we hurt ourselves. 

Now I proudly call myself a feminist. If Tip O'Neill were alive today, I might even tell him that I'm 
a pom-pom girl for feminism. I hope more women, and men, will join me in accepting this 
distinguished label. Currently, only 24 percent of women in the United States say that they consider 
themselves feminists. Yet when offered a more specific definition of feminism — "A feminist is 
someone who believes in social, political, and economic equality of the sexes" — the percentage of 
women who agree rises to 65 percent. That's a big move in the right direction. 

Semantics can be important, but I don't think progress turns on our willingness to apply a label to 
ourselves. I do think progress turns on our willingness to speak up about the impact gender has on us. 
We can no longer pretend that biases do not exist, nor can we talk around them. And as Harvard 



Business School has demonstrated, the result of creating a more equal environment will not just be 
better performance for our organizations, but quite likely greater happiness for all. 



11 



Working Together Toward Equality 



I began this book by acknowledging that women in the developed world are better off than ever, but the 
goal of true equality still eludes us. So how do we move forward? First, we must decide that true 
equality is long overdue and will be achieved only when more women rise to the top of every 
government and every industry. Then we have to do the hard work of getting there. All of us — men 
and women alike — have to understand and acknowledge how stereotypes and biases cloud our beliefs 
and perpetuate the status quo. Instead of ignoring our differences, we need to accept and transcend 
them. 

For decades, we have focused on giving women the choice to work inside or outside the home. We 
have celebrated the fact that women have the right to make this decision, and rightly so. But we have 
to ask ourselves if we have become so focused on supporting personal choices that we're failing to 
encourage women to aspire to leadership. It is time to cheer on girls and women who want to sit at the 
table, seek challenges, and lean in to their careers. 

Today, despite all of the gains we have made, neither men nor women have real choice. Until 
women have supportive employers and colleagues as well as partners who share family 
responsibilities, they don't have real choice. And until men are fully respected for contributing inside 
the home, they don't have real choice either. Equal opportunity is not equal unless everyone receives 
the encouragement that makes seizing those opportunities possible. Only then can both men and 
women achieve their full potential.' 

None of this is attainable unless we pursue these goals together. Men need to support women and, I 
wish it went without saying, women need to support women too. Stanford professor Deborah 
Gruenfeld makes the case: "We need to look out for one another, work together, and act more like a 
coalition. As individuals, we have relatively low levels of power. Working together, we are fifty 

2 

percent of the population and therefore have real power."" As obvious as this sounds, women have not 
always worked together in the past. In fact, there are many discouraging examples where women have 
actually done the opposite. 

We are a new generation and we need a new approach. 

In the summer of 2012, my former Google colleague Marissa Mayer was named CEO of Yahoo. 
Like several of her friends and the Yahoo board, I knew that she was heading into her third trimester 



of pregnancy. Of course, many men take big jobs when their wives are weeks away from giving birth, 
and no one raises it as an issue, but Marissa's condition quickly became headline news. She was 
heralded as the first pregnant CEO of a Fortune 500 company. Feminists cheered. Then Marissa let it 
be known: "My maternity leave will be a few weeks long, and I'll work throughout it." Many 
feminists stopped cheering. Since taking such a short leave is not feasible or desirable for everyone, 
they argued that Marissa was hurting the cause by setting up unreasonable expectations. 

So was this one giant leap forward for womankind and one baby step back? Of course not. Marissa 
became the youngest CEO of a Fortune 500 company . . . while pregnant. She decided how she wanted 
to manage her career and family and never claimed that her choice should apply to anyone else. If she 
had cut Yahoo's maternity leave to two weeks for all employees, then concern would have been in 
order. She did not do this, but she was still roundly criticized. Even a European cabinet member 

4 

weighed in. Like any individual, Marissa knows best what she is capable of given her particular 
circumstances. And as journalist Kara Swisher also noted, Marissa "has a husband who can actually 
take care of the child, and no one seems to remember that." Women who want to take two weeks 
off ... or two days ... or two years ... or twenty years deserve everyone's full support. 

As Marissa's experience demonstrates, women in powerful positions often receive greater scrutiny. 
Because the vast majority of leaders are men, it is not possible to generalize from any one example. 
But the dearth of female leaders causes one woman to be viewed as representative of her entire 
gender. 6 And because people often discount and dislike female leaders, these generalizations are often 
critical. This is not just unfair to the individuals but reinforces the stigma that successful women are 
unlikeable. A perfect and personal example occurred in May 2012, when a Forbes blogger posted an 
article entitled "Sheryl Sandberg Is the Valley's 'It' Girl — Just Like Kim Polese Once Was." He 
began his comparison by describing Kim, an early tech entrepreneur, as a "luminary" in the mid-1990s 
who never really earned her success, but was "in the right place at the right time [and was] young, 
pretty and a good speaker." The blogger then argued, "I think Polese is a good cautionary tale 
for ... Sheryl Sandberg." 7 Ouch. 

Kim and I had never met or spoken before this incident, but she defended both of us. In a published 
response, she described reading the blog post and how her "immediate thought was — how sad. How 
sad that as an industry and a society we haven't advanced over these past two decades when it comes 
to views on women and leadership. As with all the past lazy, stereotype-ridden articles like this one, it 
gets the facts wrong." After correcting the facts, she continued, "Views like these are all too 
commonplace, and part of a pervasive pattern that belittles, demeans and marginalizes women as 
leaders." 8 So many other readers joined her in calling the post sexist that the blogger posted an 
apology and retraction. 

I was grateful for Kim's vocal support. The more women can stick up for one another, the better. 
Sadly, this doesn't always happen. And it seems to happen even less when women voice a position 
that involves a gender-related issue. The attacks on Marissa for her maternity leave plans came almost 
entirely from other women. This has certainly been my experience too. Everyone loves a fight — and 
they really love a cat-fight. The media will report endlessly about women attacking other women, 
which distracts from the real issues. When arguments turn into "she said/she said," we all lose. 



Every social movement struggles with dissension within its ranks, in part because advocates are 
passionate and unlikely to agree on every position and solution. Betty Friedan famously and foolishly 
refused to work with — or even to shake hands with — Gloria Steinem. They both did so much to 
further women's rights. But what if they had been able to work together? Couldn't they have furthered 
the cause even more? 

There are so many of us who care deeply about these matters. We should strive to resolve our 
differences quickly, and when we disagree, stay focused on our shared goals. This is not a plea for less 
debate, but for more constructive debate. In Marissa's case, it would have been great to keep the focus 
on her breakthrough achievements. Thanks to her high-profile appointment, other companies might 
consider hiring pregnant women for big jobs, and expectant mothers might be more inclined to apply 
for them. By diminishing Marissa's accomplishment, the attacks diminished us all. 

It is a painful truth that one of the obstacles to more women gaining power has sometimes been 
women already in power. Women in the generations ahead of me believed, largely correctly, that only 
one woman would be allowed to ascend to the senior ranks in any particular company. In the days of 
tokenism, women looked around the room and instead of bonding against an unfair system, they often 
viewed one another as competition. Ambition fueled hostility, and women wound up being ignored, 
undermined, and in some cases even sabotaged by other women. 

In the 1970s, this phenomenon was common enough that the term "queen bee" was used to describe 
a woman who flourished in a leadership role, especially in male -dominated industries, and who used 
her position to keep other female "worker bees" down. For some, it was simple self-preservation. For 
others, it reflected their coming-of-age in a society that believed men were superior to women. In this 
sense, queen bee behavior was not just a cause of gender discrimination but also a consequence of that 
discrimination. Queen bees internalized the low status of women and in order to feel worthy 
themselves wanted only to associate with men. Often, these queen bees were rewarded for maintaining 
the status quo and not promoting other women. 10 

Unfortunately, this "there can be only one" attitude still lingers today. It makes no sense for women 
to feel that we are competing against one another anymore, but some still do. In certain instances, 
women question their female colleagues' level of career commitment, aggressiveness, and leadership 
abilities." One study found that female professors believed that male Ph.D. students were more 
committed to their careers than female Ph.D. students, even though a survey of the students found no 
gender difference in their reported levels of commitment. 12 Other research suggests that once a woman 
achieves success, particularly in a gender-biased context, her capacity to see gender discrimination is 
reduced. 

It's heartbreaking to think about one woman holding another back. As former secretary of state 
Madeleine Albright once said, "There's a special place in hell for women who don't help other 
women."' 4 And the consequences extend beyond individual pain. Women's negative views of female 
coworkers are often seen as an objective assessment — more credible than the views of men.' 5 When 
women voice gender bias, they legitimize it. Obviously, a negative attitude cannot be gender based if 
it comes from another woman, right? Wrong. Often without realizing it, women internalize 



disparaging cultural attitudes and then echo them back. As a result, women are not just victims of 
sexism, they can also be perpetrators. 

There is hope that this attitude is changing. A recent survey found that "high-potential women" 
working in business want to "pay it forward," and 73 percent have reached out to other women to help 
them develop their talents.' 6 Almost all of the women I have encountered professionally have gone out 
of their way to be helpful. When I was a lowly summer intern at McKinsey, I met Diana Farrell, a star 
consultant, at a company-wide conference in Colorado. Diana had just spoken at a panel that I 
attended and we bumped into each other afterward — where else? — in the women's room. We ended 
up having a talk that continued beyond the sinks, and she became a close friend and trusted advisor. 
Years later, she was one of the few who encouraged me to join Google. 

The more women help one another, the more we help ourselves. Acting like a coalition truly does 
produce results. In 2004, four female executives at Merrill Lynch started having lunch together once a 
month. They shared their accomplishments and frustrations. They brainstormed about business. After 
the lunches, they would all go back to their offices and tout one another's achievements. They 
couldn't brag about themselves, but they could easily do it for their colleagues. Their careers 
flourished and each rose up the ranks to reach managing director and executive officer levels.' 7 The 
queen bee was banished, and the hive became stronger. 

I know that not every woman encounters this kind of positive female support, and yet oddly, we 
often expect it. Most women don't assume that men will reach out and help, but with our own gender, 
we assume there will be a connection. We imagine women will act communally and maybe we do so 
out of our own bias. Once in my career, I felt that a senior woman treated me poorly. She would 
complain about me and my team behind my back but would not discuss any concerns she had with 
me, even when I asked directly. When I first met her, I had high hopes that she would be an ally. 
When she turned out to be not just unhelpful but actually spiteful, I was not just disappointed; I felt 
betrayed. 

Sharon Meers explained to me that this feeling of betrayal was predictable. Both men and women 
do, in fact, demand more time and warmth from women in the workplace. We expect greater niceness 
from women and can become angry when they don't conform to that expectation. "I think that's a big 
part of the protest about executive women being 'mean' to other women," Sharon told me. "I think it's 
about a double standard we have when we look at female versus male superiors." 

I now recognize that had this senior woman been a man and acted the same way, I still would have 
been frustrated, but I wouldn't have taken it so personally. It's time to drop the double standard. 
Gender should neither magnify nor excuse rude and dismissive treatment. We should expect 
professional behavior, and even kindness, from everyone. 

Any coalition of support must also include men, many of whom care about gender inequality as 
much as women do. In 2012, Kunal Modi, a student at Harvard's Kennedy School, wrote an article 
imploring men to "Man Up on Family and Workplace Issues." He argued that "for the sake of 
American corporate performance and shareholder returns, men must play an active role in ensuring 
that the most talented young workers (often women ...) are being encouraged to advocate for their 
career advancement.... So men, let's get involved now — and not in a patronizing manner that 



marginalizes this as some altruistic act on behalf of our mothers, wives, and daughters — but on behalf 
of ourselves, our companies, and the future of our country." 18 

I applaud Kunal's message, especially his focus on active engagement. Men of all ages must 
commit to changing the leadership ratios. They can start by actively seeking out qualified female 
candidates to hire and promote. And if qualified candidates cannot be found, then we need to invest in 
more recruiting, mentoring, and sponsoring so women can get the necessary experience. 

An "us versus them" crusade will not move us toward true equality. Nor will an "us versus us" 
crusade, which U.C. Hastings law professor Joan Williams calls the "gender wars." These wars are 
being waged on many fronts, but the mommy wars, which pit mothers who work outside the home 
against mothers who work inside the home, attract the most attention. As Professor Williams explains, 
"These mommy wars are so bitter because both groups' identities are at stake because of another clash 
of social ideals: The ideal worker is defined as someone always available for work, and the 'good 
mother' is defined as always available to her children. So ideal-worker women need to prove that, 
although they weren't always there, their children are fine, fine, fine.. . . Women who have rejected the 
ideal-worker norm and settled for a slower career (or no career) need to prove that their compromise 
was necessary for the good of their families. So you have each group of women judging the other, 

19 

because neither group of women has been able to live up to inconsistent ideals." 

Professor Williams is absolutely right. One of the conflicts inherent in having choice is that we all 
make different ones. There is always an opportunity cost, and I don't know any woman who feels 
comfortable with all her decisions. As a result, we inadvertently hold that discomfort against those 
who remind us of the path not taken. Guilt and insecurity make us second-guess ourselves and, in turn, 
resent one another. 

In a letter to The Atlantic in June 2012, Barnard president Debora Spar wrote about this messy and 
complicated emotion, exploring why she and so many successful women feel so guilty. She decided 
that it's because women "have been subtly striving all our lives to prove that we have picked up the 
torch that feminism provided. That we haven't failed the mothers and grandmothers who made our 
ambitions possible. And yet, in a deep and profound way, we are failing. Because feminism wasn't 
supposed to make us feel guilty, or prod us into constant competitions over who is raising children 
better, organizing more cooperative marriages, or getting less sleep. It was supposed to make us free — 
to give us not only choices but the ability to make these choices without constantly feeling that we'd 
somehow gotten it wrong.""" 

Stay-at-home mothers can make me feel guilty and, at times, intimidate me. There are moments 
when I feel like they are judging me, and I imagine there are moments when they feel like I am 
judging them. But when I push past my own feelings of guilt and insecurity, I feel grateful. These 
parents — mostly mothers — constitute a large amount of the talent that helps sustain our schools, 
nonprofits, and communities. Remember that mom who pointed out that my son should be wearing a 
green T-shirt on St. Patrick's Day? She is a tireless volunteer in the classroom and our community. So 
many people benefit from her hard work. 

Society has long undervalued the contributions of those who work without a salary. My mother felt 
this slight keenly. For seventeen years, she worked more than full-time as a mother and on behalf of 



Soviet Jewry. She understood that the compensation for her efforts was making a difference in the 
lives of persecuted people halfway across the world, but many people in her own neighborhood did 
not consider her work to be as important as a "real job." She was still regarded as "just a housewife" — 
undercutting the very real but unpaid work of raising children and advocating for human rights. 

We all want the same thing: to feel comfortable with our choices and to feel validated by those 
around us. So let's start by validating one another. Mothers who work outside the home should regard 
mothers who work inside the home as real workers. And mothers who work inside the home should be 
equally respectful of those choosing another option. 

A few years ago on a visit to the U.S. Naval Academy, I met an extraordinary woman who was 
about to join the U.S. Submarine Force as one of its first female officers. She was nervous about her 
new role and aware that there were risks in being an officer and not a gentleman. I asked her to let me 
know how it went. A year later, she followed up with a heartfelt e-mail. "Truthfully I was prepared for 
opposition and the possibility of being discounted," she wrote. "But it did not happen. I was respected 
the moment I stepped on board and I can truly say that I am a valued part of the crew." Unfortunately, 
she told me that she encountered resentment from another source — the navy wives. At an onshore 
"welcome" dinner, the wives of her colleagues pounced and accused her of being a "bra-burning 
feminist out to prove a point." They forced her to defend her career choice, reputation, and personal 
life. "I was shocked! Talk about uncomfortable!" she wrote. "I did my best to answer their questions 
and stand my ground. Eventually they backed off and started in on my husband!" 

We must work harder to rise above this. The gender wars need an immediate and lasting peace. 
True equality will be achieved only when we all fight the stereotypes that hold us back. Feeling 
threatened by others' choices pulls us all down. Instead, we should funnel our energy into breaking 
this cycle. 

Sharon Meers tells a story about a school parents' night she attended in which the children 
introduced their parents. Sharon's daughter Sammy pointed at her father and said, "This is Steve, he 
makes buildings, kind of like an architect, and he loves to sing." Then Sammy pointed at Sharon and 
said, "This is Sharon, she wrote a book, she works full-time, and she never picks me up from school." 
To Sharon's credit, hearing this account did not make her feel guilty. Instead, she said, "I felt mad at 
the social norms that make my daughter feel odd because her mother doesn't conform to those 
norms." 

The goal is to work toward a world where those social norms no longer exist. If more children see 
fathers at school pickups and mothers who are busy at jobs, both girls and boys will envision more 
options for themselves. Expectations will not be set by gender but by personal passion, talents, and 
interests. 

I am fully aware that most women are not focused on changing social norms for the next generation 
but simply trying to get through each day. Forty percent of employed mothers lack sick days and 
vacation leave, and about 50 percent of employed mothers are unable to take time off to care for a sick 

21 22 

child." Only about half of women receive any pay during maternity leave." These policies can have 
severe consequences; families with no access to paid family leave often go into debt and can fall into 



23 

poverty." Part-time jobs with fluctuating schedules offer little chance to plan and often stop short of 

24 

the forty-hour week that provides basic benefits." 

Too many work standards remain inflexible and unfair, often penalizing women with children. Too 
many talented women try their hardest to reach the top and bump up against systemic barriers. So 
many others pull back because they do not think they have a choice. All of this brings me back to 
Leymah Gbowee's insistence that we need more women in power. When leadership insists that these 
policies change, they will. Google put in pregnancy parking when I asked for it and it remains there 
long after I left. We must raise both the ceiling and the floor. 



my mother had fewer choices than I did, but with my father's support, she has always worked hard. 
During my childhood, she chose to be a devoted mother and volunteer. When I left for college, she 
went back to school to study teaching English as a second language. She taught full-time for fifteen 
years and felt that teaching was her calling. "At one point, I was asked to become the administrator for 
the entire school," my mother told me. "I said no, preferring to stay in the classroom and work with 
my students. I was exactly where I wanted to be." 

In 2003, my mother left the workforce to take care of her ailing parents. She was sorry to leave her 
teaching career, but family has always been her top priority. After my grandparents passed away, she 
reentered the workforce. She founded Ear Peace: Save Your Hearing, a nonprofit to prevent noise- 
induced hearing loss in young people. At the age of sixty-five, she has returned to her love of 
teaching, running workshops and speaking to students from elementary to high school. 

My mother has leaned in her entire life. She raised her children, helped her parents spend their final 
years in dignity and comfort, and continues to be a dedicated and loving wife, mother, and 
grandmother. She has always contributed to her community and the world. She is my inspiration. 

My mother wants to see society achieve true equality. She sees the barriers that women still face, 
but she also sees new opportunities. She believes that what I have achieved, and much more, is 
possible for many others. I agree. And more important, so many women that I have encountered agree. 
Filled with energy, optimism, and self-confidence, they are scrambling along that jungle gym and 
moving toward their long-term dream. 

It's up to us to end the self-fulfilling belief that "women can't do this, women can't do that." 
Throwing up our hands and saying "It can't be done" ensures that it will never be done. 

I have written this book to encourage women to dream big, forge a path through the obstacles, and 
achieve their full potential. I am hoping that each woman will set her own goals and reach for them 
with gusto. And I am hoping that each man will do his part to support women in the workplace and in 
the home, also with gusto. As we start using the talents of the entire population, our institutions will be 
more productive, our homes will be happier, and the children growing up in those homes will no 
longer be held back by narrow stereotypes. 



I know that for many women, getting to the top of their organization is far from their primary focus. 
My intention is not to exclude them or ignore their valid concerns. I believe that if more women lean 
in, we can change the power structure of our world and expand opportunities for all. More female 
leadership will lead to fairer treatment for all women. Shared experience forms the basis of empathy 
and, in turn, can spark the institutional changes we need. 

Critics have scoffed at me for trusting that once women are in power, they will help one another, 
since that has not always been the case." I'm willing to take that bet. The first wave of women who 
ascended to leadership positions were few and far between, and to survive, many focused more on 
fitting in than on helping others. The current wave of female leadership is increasingly willing to 
speak up. The more women attain positions of power, the less pressure there will be to conform, and 
the more they will do for other women. Research already suggests that companies with more women 
in leadership roles have better work-life policies, smaller gender gaps in executive compensation, and 
more women in midlevel management. 26 

The hard work of generations before us means that equality is within our reach. We can close the 
leadership gap now. Each individual's success can make success a little easier for the next. We can do 
this — for ourselves, for one another, for our daughters, and for our sons. If we push hard now, this 
next wave can be the last wave. In the future, there will be no female leaders. There will just be 
leaders. 

When Gloria Steinem marched in the streets to fight for the opportunities that so many of us now 
take for granted, she quoted Susan B. Anthony, who marched in the streets before her and concluded, 
"Our job is not to make young women grateful. It is to make them ungrateful so they keep going."" 7 
The sentiment remains true today. We need to be grateful for what we have but dissatisfied with the 
status quo. This dissatisfaction spurs the charge for change. We must keep going. 

The march toward true equality continues. It continues down the halls of governments, 
corporations, academia, hospitals, law firms, nonprofits, research labs, and every organization, large 
and small. We owe it to the generations that came before us and the generations that will come after to 
keep fighting. I believe women can lead more in the workplace. I believe men can contribute more in 
the home. And I believe that this will create a better world, one where half our institutions are run by 
women and half our homes are run by men. 

I look toward the world I want for all children — and my own. My greatest hope is that my son and 
my daughter will be able to choose what to do with their lives without external or internal obstacles 
slowing them down or making them question their choices. If my son wants to do the important work 
of raising children full-time, I hope he is respected and supported. And if my daughter wants to work 
full-time outside her home, I hope she is not just respected and supported, but also liked for her 
achievements. 

I hope they both end up exactly where they want to be. And when they find where their true 
passions lie, I hope they both lean in — all the way. 



Let's Keep Talking . 



My goal is that this book is not the end of the conversation, but the beginning. 

I invite you to continue the discussion with me by joining the Lean In Community at 
www.facebook.com/leaninorg. Let's keep talking about these issues and supporting one another. 
Women and men of all ages are welcome. 

I also encourage you to visit www.leanin.org for practical education and personal experiences that 
can help you reach your goals. Here you can explore topics critical to your success — from negotiating 
effectively to understanding your strengths. You also can create and join Lean In Circles, small peer 
groups that meet in person for ongoing encouragement and development. 



Acknowledgments 



I am grateful to the many people who believed in these ideas and gave so much of themselves to make 
the publication of Lean In possible. 

My deepest thanks go to my writing partner Nell Scovell. Nell and I have been working together on 
speeches, starting with the 2011 Forrestal Lecture at the U.S. Naval Academy, where I first used the 
phrase "lean in." When I was considering writing this book, I realized that I was willing to do it only if 
Nell collaborated with me. Nell responded that she was "not just in, but all in," which says everything 
about her commitment. She took a break from her work as a television writer/producer and journalist 
to make this a priority. She put in nights, early mornings, weekends, and holidays to accommodate my 
limited schedule. Most of all, she was insistent that we keep searching until we found the right way to 
talk about these complicated and emotional issues. Nell's talent with words is matched only by her 
sense of humor and her unshakable belief that having more women in leadership positions will result 
in a fairer and better world. I am grateful to her not just for her expertise and complete dedication, but 
for her friendship, which I have come to cherish. Her heart rings true and clear on this book's every 
page. 

Marianne Cooper also has lived and breathed this book for the past year and a half. As a sociologist 
at the Clayman Institute for Gender Research at Stanford University and an expert on gender and 
social inequality, Marianne brought her vast knowledge to bear as this book's lead researcher. She is 
meticulous in her approach and has an unparalleled talent for synthesizing research so it is concise, 
understandable, and convincing. I learned a great deal from her clear thinking, deep insight, and 
analytical rigor. 

This book would not have been written if it were not for Jennifer Walsh. Through the depth of her 
conviction, the sheer force of her will, and her absolute refusal to take no for an answer, Jennifer 
convinced me to write this book. She told me that this process would be an important personal journey 
for me, and she was right. She stayed by my side from beginning to end, providing guidance and 
encouragement and reminding me at key moments why I was doing this. 

My editor, Jordan Pavlin, believed in this project so much that she dedicated many hours over many 
months before I fully committed. She was instrumental in helping flesh out the initial ideas and turn 
those ideas into outlines and finally into chapters. Jordan never read an anecdote she did not think 
could be expanded, and she continually pushed me to share more of my experiences and emotions. I 
also owe my deepest gratitude to Sonny Mehta, editor in chief of Knopf, whose unflagging support 
kept this project on the fast track. 

David Dreyer and Eric London were indispensable to the writing of this book. As trusted advisors 
and brilliant craftsmen, they pored over each and every draft from the very first to the very last. They 



applied their impeccable judgment and communications expertise to all matters, from suggesting 
sweeping structural changes to honing minute details. They always (always) stayed on point, were 
able to see issues from multiple angles, and delivered their advice with speed and a sense of humor. 
Elliot Schrage, Brandee Barker, Sarah Feinberg, Debbie Frost, and especially Ashley Zandy provided 
invaluable support and advice. Gina Bianchini, Rachel Thomas, and Debi Hemmeter turned their 
passion for and commitment to this book's message into establishing the Lean In Community. 

If you read this book, you know the importance I place on feedback, and I am especially grateful to 
the many people who provided it. From the moment I decided to do this, my sister-in-law, Amy 
Schefler, jumped in to help. She sent detailed thoughts on topics I should cover as I was working on 
the initial outline, interviewed all her friends, shared her own stories, and read every draft of each 
chapter multiple times. Her enthusiasm and passion for this project — as well as her love and support — 
were truly inspiring. 

Gloria Steinem has shared her wisdom with me since I was lucky enough to meet her six years ago. 
My understanding of the challenges that women face owes much to the time she has generously spent 
with me. No one has thought about women — and all of humanity — more deeply than Gloria. And she 
considers every issue with humility, humor, and a profound desire to build a just world. As an activist, 
her efforts continue to move us all toward the goal of true equality. As a writer, her words often 
provide the best single-sentence summary on any topic, which is why she is quoted so frequently in 
this book. The phrase "internalize the revolution" comes from her and echoes her book Revolution 
from Within. It is with love and gratitude that I quote her words in these pages. 

Arianna Huffington has been a constant source of support in every aspect of my life for many years. 
She sent comments on drafts from all around the world, adding her insight and deep understanding of 
cultural trends. Oprah Winfrey encouraged me to focus on my intent for this book. When I was 
hesitant to share something personal, I heard her voice in my head — or in the text messages she sent — 
reminding me of the power of being authentic. Gene Sperling is one of the busiest people I know, and 
yet he found the time to write page after page of key suggestions. His ability to cut to the heart of the 
matter on issues that concern public policy and the problems that affect people from every life 
circumstance is matchless. 

Mindy Levy, my childhood friend, was visiting with her family when I roped her into looking at a 
chapter. She turned out to be a master of structure and organization, which she then applied to future 
drafts. Mellody Hobson encouraged me to speak from the heart with conviction and confidence. She 
sets the example of what it means to be a woman, unapologetically. Karen Kehela Sherwood helped 
crystallize several key ideas, including the "aha" moment of realizing that how women are perceived 
when negotiating can be used as a negotiation tool. And just as she did for so many of my papers for 
so many years, my college roommate Carrie Weber stayed up many late nights line editing every 
sentence. She helped in ways that only someone who is both a dear friend and an accomplished author 
could. 

Many others generously read drafts and offered thoughts, sometimes under demanding deadlines. 
Deep thanks to Stephanie Flanders, Molly Graham, Larry Summers, Bill McKibben, Tina Bennett, 
Scott and Clia Tierney, Amanda McCall, Jami Passer, Michelle Ebersman, Stephen Paul, Diana 



Farrell, Adam Freed, Phil Deutch, Marne Levine, Joel Kaplan, Eric Antonow, Lorna Borenstein, 
Marcus Buckingham, Michael Grimes, Anna Fieler, Kim Scott, Kim Jabal, Carole Geithner, Don 
Graham, Zander Lurie, and Michael Balaoing. 

Many people contributed to the research that underpins this book. Shelley Correll and Lori 
Mackenzie of the Clayman Institute for Gender Research at Stanford connected me with Marianne, 
then supported her so that she could dedicate so much time to this project. Mana Nakagawa, a Ph.D. 
candidate in the International Comparative Education program at Stanford University, did the 
international research needed to make the book relevant for a global audience. Professor Deborah 
Gruenfeld of the Stanford Graduate School of Business started educating me on gender issues more 
than five years ago and has been doing it ever since. Kathleen McCartney, dean of the Harvard 
Graduate School of Education, explained the NICHD study on early child care and child development. 
Professor Jennifer Aaker of the Stanford Graduate School of Business shared her research on the 
importance of setting goals to pursuing happiness. Harvard professor Hannah Riley Bowles 
interrupted her vacation to spend hours on the phone discussing her work on negotiation. Professor 
Francis Flynn of the Stanford Graduate School of Business walked me step by step through the 
findings of his breakthrough Heidi/Howard study. Sharon Meers generously shared all of the research 
she spent years doing for her book Getting to 50/50. Christine Silva, senior director of research at 
Catalyst, provided important detail on several studies. Kim Parker, senior researcher with the Pew 
Social & Demographic Trends project, discussed Pew's research report on gender and career 
aspirations. And special thanks to Phil Garland, vice president of methodology at SurveyMonkey, for 
his insightful comments on many drafts as well as assistance with statistical analysis. 

The team at WME has been on top of every aspect of this book. Ari Emanuel kicked this whole 
thing off by introducing me to Jennifer, and I am grateful for his friendship as well as his ever- 
amusing and supportive check-in calls. I am indebted to Tracy Fisher, Theresa Brown, Margaret Riley, 
Kathleen Nishimoto, and Caitlin Moore for all their efforts. The team at Knopf showed remarkable 
dedication and enthusiasm in this process: Tony Chirico, Paul Bogaards, Chris Gillespie, Peter 
Mendelsund, Erinn Hartman, Elizabeth Lindsay, Caroline Bleeke, Katherine Hourigan, and Lydia 
Buechler. It was a joy to work closely with Ellen Feldman and Amy Ryan, and I grew to depend on 
their precision with words, careful attention to detail, and endless patience. Thank you to Divesh 
Makan of Iconiq for his organizational and structural help and to Gary Stiffelman of Ziffren 
Brittenham for his diligence. I also want to thank Jill Gillett and Chris Sanagustin for their support of 
Nell's work on this project. Much appreciation goes to Markus Dohle and Madeline Mcintosh of 
Random House for their steadfast belief in this book. 

A special thanks to all the women and men who reached out to me after my TEDTalk and other 
speeches to share their stories, struggles, and triumphs. I would not have kept talking about this 
subject or written this book had it not been for their responses and thoughts. When I needed 
inspiration, I read and reread their e-mails and letters. 

I am also indebted to the many people who have given me opportunities and guidance over the 
course of my career. Larry Summers offered to advise my senior thesis, gave me my first job out of 
college, and has been an important part of my life ever since. Lant Pritchett, my first boss, taught me 
to look hard at the data and speak the unvarnished truth. Eric Schmidt, Larry Page, Sergey Brin, and 



Omid Kordestani hired me at Google despite my complete lack of any relevant experience and 
supported me throughout my many years working for them. Richard Skolnik, Salim Habayeb, and 
Maria Clark invited me to join their team in India at the World Bank. Doug Elmendorf helped me start 
a group for women in economics when I was in college and taught me so much over the course of 
many years. Don Graham, Pat Mitchell, John Doerr, Dan Rosensweig, Michael Lynton, Bob Iger, 
Howard Schultz, and Bob Rubin have all given me key advice at critical junctures in my career. Fred 
Kofman shared his insights on leadership, authenticity, and responsibility. 

I am lucky to work every day with extraordinary people at Facebook. Camille Hart has worked by 
my side for more than ten years. So much of what I am able to do is because of her expertise, great 
judgment, and relentless pursuit of efficiency. My colleagues Chris Cox, Mike Schroepfer, Elliot 
Schrage, David Ebersman, Ted Ullyot, Libby Leffler, Charlton Gholson, Kelly Hoffman, Anikka 
Fragodt, Eric Antonow, David Fischer, Lori Goler, and Dan Rose challenge me to live up to their high 
standards and provide the friendship and support that makes coming to work every day worthwhile. 
Mark Zuckerberg gave me the opportunity of a lifetime and has continued to inspire and support me 
ever since. He has taught me by his example to chart my own course and has encouraged me to do 
what I would do if I were not afraid. 

I am blessed to be surrounded by loving friends through this project and all else. I am so grateful for 
my childhood friends Eve Greenbarg, Mindy Levy, Jami Passer, Beth Redlich, Elise Scheck, Pam 
Srebrenik, Brook Rose, Merle Safer-stein, and Amy Trachter; and my closest adulthood friends Carrie 
Weber, Marne Levine, Phil Deutch, Katie and Scott Mitic, Craig and Kirsten Nevill-Manning, Adam 
Freed, Joel Kaplan, Clia and Scott Tierney, Kim Jabal, Lorna Borenstein, David Lawee, Chamath 
Palihapitiya, Zander Lurie, Kim Keating, Diana Farrell, Scott Pearson, Lori Talingting, and Larry 
Brilliant. 

The boundless support of my family has been the foundation of my life. My deepest gratitude and 
love to my parents Adele and Joel Sandberg, my brother David Sandberg, my sister Michelle 
Sandberg, my mother-in-law Paula Goldberg, my siblings-in-law Amy Schefler, Marc Bodnick, and 
Rob and Leslye Goldberg, and my goddaughter Elise Geithner. 

This book does not just recommend true partnership; it is a product of several true partnerships. 
Colin Summers, Nell's husband, slowed down his architecture career to become the primary caregiver 
for their children. In twenty years, his encouragement of her career has never faltered. His 
contributions to this mission included reading many drafts of this book, discussing its contents over 
countless meals, and attending several school events alone. Whenever someone suggests that mothers 
are better suited to raising children, Nell knows in the deepest way possible that fathers can parent 
with as much love, devotion, and joy. 

Scott Saywell, Marianne's husband, encouraged her to take on this project despite her initial 
reluctance. When my offer came, she had her own book to write and a second baby with food allergies 
who was not sleeping well. Scott insisted they would figure out a way to make it work, then 
reorganized his schedule so that it did. He was more than just supportive, he was excited for Marianne. 

And finally, I want to thank my truly amazing husband, Dave Goldberg. Dave is my best friend, 
closest advisor, dedicated coparent, and the love of my life. We both knew that my writing this book 



would come primarily at the expense of our time together, and so writing Lean In was as much his 
decision as mine. He supported me every step of the way, as he always does, with patience, great 
insight, humor, and love. 
